"The reaction i face when i express a view for religion."
"Sheet Music for the Star Spangled Banner (Sporting Event Version)"
"shit man  still am not perfect"
"When you poke someone and they think it was somebody else."
"life is unfair"
"In there? But... it's cold"
"Dafuq are these cubes?"
"This person seems to have adapted very well at being FOREVER ALONE!"
"Just a baby anteater..."
"Parker..."
"Now that's just cruel."
"Poor Peter"
"Favourite brand of rice?"
"Hey Parker..."
"Yep. That most definitely is going to leave a mark."
"This isn't going to end well."
"An Indian Sikh Nihang (warrior) performs a fire breathing act at a demonstration of gatka skills during a procession from Sri Akal Takhat to the Golden Temple"
"I just purchased one"
"She deserved worse...."
"What I feel like every time I go to a job interview"
"Does anyone know where and what this is?"
"Why were u crying"
"First time at the beach."
"This should be considered assault."
"Old school humor"
"Public Transportation: Not always the best option"
"Going on Reddit and then suddenly realizing it's my cake day."
"Self-defense mechanism. The Animal Kingdom is extraordinary."
"Activate Defense Mechanism."
"You really want me to believe that she tripped and fell on your dick......"
"I’m laughing way too hard at this"
"how to win a staring contest- dog style"
"When I'm having a bad day and someone asks what's wrong."
"dog slapping man = uncontrollable laughter"
"My wifes reaction when I leave the toilet seat up."
"How I feel when my friends force me into watching a scary movie"
"Hey you guys!"
"Whenever I'm feeling down  all I have to do is look at this again. a"
"On the Anniversary of His Death"
"I can imagine Bill Gates has said this"
"My coworkers started talking about religion..."
"Perfect Aim"
"Took me a while to beat it...I think the name added to the lethality"
"Wth Reddit? Why'd you have to do that?"
"The joys of picking your own character name [FIXED] [FIXED]"
"Not just any plant  but a.."
"How I feel when people karma whore on their cake day"
"Where am I..?"
"Hey listen"
"Found this on a different subreddit. Thought it might help someone"
"Dear hunters!"
"Let's play a game"
"The reason i downvote public restrooms"
"Gravity as it shifts to the East"
"Trying to prove a point on the internet..."
"BOMBARDMENT!"
"When I critisize or make fun of the bible in r/christianity"
"STFU"
"Most popular kid in the world (Also  I WANT SAUCE)"
"What I feel like when I'm at the gym"
"Thats Nasty"
"Thats Nasty"
"Roses are red  violets are blue"
"Baby elephants holding each others trunks"
"Just walk right into the street  looking where you're going is for losers"
"Slow Motion Bee Crash"
"Who needs a cat? (X-post r/Funny)"
"We've all gone to certain lengths to fit in…"
"World History With the Pope"
"Don't you gimme that look!"
"Here's my WTF for the day."
"Please tell me this is real!"
"an ostrich skiing?"
"Haters gonna hate  ostrich gonna..."
"Yesterday at work I saved a kid  this is how I walked off the unit at the end of the day"
"Ski Sunday"
"Gets me every time."
"When a post makes it to the front page in less than an hour."
"Does this belong here?"
"STAHP"
"The day the earth stood still..."
"I don't always smell like a man  but when I do I stay thirsty...?"
"Better add a second flip-flop  just to be extra safe."
"What could possibly go wrong.."
"Cigarettes WILL kill you."
"Damn Door."
"How I feel when I'm starving but my wife isn't ready to head to the restaurant"
"How i feel about reposts"
"How to find love while being a male engineer"
"Listen up engineering students."
"How it feels to get downvoted on r/aww"
"Just Bob Marley and Jimi Hendrix juggling a soccer ball before a show."
"Bob Marley and Jimi Hendrix playing soccer."
"Who I'm voting for this election"
"cat in a box"
"Anus Kitty"
"God is my Co-pilot"
"That worked out well."
"God makes a great co-pilot"
"Women that have a gender identity outside of the home will have failing marriages."
"People with gangster facebook names...."
"Seems appropriate"
"Go Go Power Rangers! [improved]"
"How i feel being able to sit down after having to walk around working for 8 hours."
"No time to explain get in bananas!"
"I should've known better."
"Hard Work"
"After a night out at the bars"
"Smile"
"Fuck Physics"
"After opening every link ever posted here  I can finally say that she does..."
"Shake shake senora"
"Spider webs. NOPE."
"Think of the activities you can do here."
"For your viewing pleasure: 9 dancing."
"SO that is where colds come from...wait  what?"
"Colds"
"How I feel submitting something funny to Reddit"
"Deal with it"
"It's that time of year again."
"Happy Holidays To All!"
"Let me ruin Christmas for you (x-post from r/funny)"
"Anytime is fine with me  really..."
"when do we want it!?"
"Being from Canada  this is what I think every time someone from a different country says they're getting snow....."
"Worst name ever."
"Except that"
"I laughed for about five minutes when I saw this  it just slays me."
"Google Image Search: &quot;Snake in a Can&quot;"
"Strahov Library"
"only in Ireland"
"Almost!"
"How I like to imagine everyone boasting about weed on the internet"
"Found a baby dolphin with its umbilical cord still attached"
"Dubai in the Clouds"
"Police and rioters come together to help fat man out of trousers"
"Dutch Renaissance self-shot"
"First post  be gentle"
"Why I never post pics of my bike (x-post from r/funny)"
"Now this is a mindfuck."
"Wait for it..."
"Fuck it."
"tolerance"
"Too many friends."
"I am babysitting my nieces and nephews for New Years..."
"Pick a dot and follow it around."
"Don't fuck with tiny hippo"
"Ain't No One F--ks with Tiny Hippo (x-post from r/aww)"
"Ain't no one"
"The Tiny Hippo."
"Bruce Lee"
"Bruce Lee"
"Well there's your problem..."
"I don't have a cat and it's my cake day  this is the best I could do."
"How I feel when I've already gone through the front page  and I see a Blue Link."
"Something to drive your OCD crazy"
"Foreplay explained in one SFW image"
"good guy osama?! newspaper article from 1993"
"Found this interesting... Osama 1993"
"Fortunately  I'm never hungry in the morning"
"A donor heart beating in a mechanical system which keeps it warm  oxygenated  with nutrient enriched blood pumping through. Fucking Amazing  and Beautiful"
"Oh  come on!"
"Yes  Please Start Wandows Ngrmadly"
"Ermahgawd! Wandowers!!"
"Reinebringen  Lofoten  Norway"
"Wow  the view from Mount Reinebringen."
"Not even sure what to say about this."
"Streaker in College Football Game (xpost r/CFB)"
"Hey  is this seat free?"
"Rengar's Ultimate"
"No Billboards in Space"
"There are suddenly so many atheist around here..."
"Sleeping Sperm Whales Off the Coast of the Azores  Portugal"
"A pod of sleeping sperm whales"
"Sounds Real Enough"
"Welcome to Australia  watch out for the snake eating spiders."
"I thought things like this only happened in Australia"
"Dog stole my sledge."
"hijacking this sled"
"You're really not fooling anyone  Charles."
"shut up  charles! (x-post from r/cats)"
"All the Grand Theft Auto legends in one picture."
"&quot;Grand Theft Auto legends&quot; fan art"
"What I feel like after reading any political thread on reddit"
"Radical Islam"
"Hey  sexy!"
"When I'm drinking from a cup and the ice suddenly shifts"
"Take a ride with Hitler"
"Wow  it's that serious?"
"So America was pretty hardcore about carpooling during WW2..."
"Mom disapproves"
"When I see a fellow Catholic trying to argue with an atheist."
"Even better than the Tony Hawk games"
"Even better than the Tony Hawk games"
"Relatable Romney: &quot;Of course I enjoy a good snowball fight! Heck  Paul Ryan and I pretty much had one the other day.&quot;"
"want to know what you look like right now?"
"Whenever someone asks me &quot;why&quot;"
"The doors are so useful"
"Watching all my friends enjoy the Steam sales while I'm away from home for 2 weeks and won't be able to buy any games"
"The identical quadruplets in China with number 1  2  3  4 shaved on their heads to make it easier for teachers and classmates to tell them apart."
"WAT (NSFW)"
"Does THIS look unsure to you?"
"Dog hug  isn't that cute?"
"Hugs"
"Bondage Hank Hill"
"Damn nature  you scary!"
"Map of contradictions in the bible"
"Not today"
"zebra power"
"Not today-"
"Slippy Knows Best"
"Why  Slippy...?"
"really? you are going to take another picture..."
"What Cancer does to bones"
"You like to pee on the train standing up?"
"Also not an environmentalist  this picture is cool too though"
"State wildlife officials try to identify species of a softball size blue eyeball found at Pompano Beach  FL."
"Just taking a dog for a walk.."
"Just taking a dog for a walk.."
"tribute to redditors"
"Saw this on my facebook feed. Had to share."
"I see your plush narwhal and narwhal sculpture  and raise you a...."
"Amusing Ourselves to Death"
"A bunch of free bunnies"
"YES  the blood of my victims shall taste like victory!"
"yeees  the jam pleases me"
"This fucked with my mind for longer than it should have."
"Ron"
"I'm curious..."
"Reddit loves bacon  right? Does it love my first attempt at making bacon at home? [FIXED]"
"Discovering something that is on your list of 'things to do before you die' in an unexpected place [NSFW]"
"Dancing pirate in the background of a porno [NSFW]"
"Fathers day in Detroit."
"You did well on your tx state midterms? Good Job!"
"Auschwitz personnel at a weekend retreat  1944. [468x297]"
"My Facebook news feed  every day."
"How TV commercials remind us of the upcoming school year."
"Thanks! Wasn't sure what those buttons meant."
"Freddie Mercury"
"As a Canadian  this is how I feel about those heat wave posts."
"Five Second Rule"
"A subtle way to introduce believers to Atheism"
"dad trol level:reality"
"Bragging"
"Banana.."
"There is no explanation"
"How you feel when a sibling gets yelled at for something you did."
"When I find out my ex girlfriend from high school became a Mormon and had four kids."
"Living with a lesbian  this is how I feel every time I overhear lady lovin'"
"Find the black guy?"
"Tanning Fail"
"Pie chart"
"Mario is multi-cultural!"
"I always wondered about these parallels. This cannot just be coincidence."
"people change"
"For my second cakeday I thought I'd show my best colourizations and some restorations that I've been doing for fun. Hope you enjoy!"
"how i feel every time i click a gross NSFW link"
"How I feel every time I step foot in Wal-Mart"
"When I realized my engineering final was actually last Thursday"
"Oh. So that's where my flamingo went..."
"Woke up this morning to see this..."
"Jabba: 1  Christians/Atheists/Solo: 0"
"This is a fact when watching old cartoons"
"It's like deja vu"
"Don't cover it!"
"PUBLIC SERVICE ANNOUNCEMENT: Make sure to set your fantasy football roster ASAP"
"Dark Cat Rises"
"Hipster Pug"
"I already called Xzibit...."
"Makes me chuckle every time"
"Do or do not... there is no try (pic)"
"You mean they became stairs?"
"Pens"
"Trying to reddit on campus during finals week"
"Just found out it was my cake day  couldn't find anything to post so I googled &quot;cake day posts&quot; - this sums my adventure up pretty well"
"How to collect welfare!"
"Damn..."
"Just adopted this little guy a few weeks ago."
"Lick attack"
"Shit like a man"
"The Mighty Upvote"
"Liu Kang wins.... [NSFW]"
"Test your might"
"&quot;Murica&quot;"
"Not sure how the creepy picture relates to the ad..."
"I was not aware babies could apply for that position."
"Walking my fish."
"Losing an argument on the internet"
"Atheist Extremists"
"MFW I log on to Facebook and find out that five days ago I &quot;liked&quot; Orgasms.org..."
"The day after my mother's birthday"
"Cartman in a bus"
"I can show you the world...."
"LOL THIS KID IS CRYING OVER SPILLED CHOCOLATE MILK AND THAT DAD IS JUST TAKING A PICTURE. xd TOP NOT FRONT PAGE MATERIAL."
"Protects your hair while you eat...because getting food in your hair would look ridiculous."
"Brilliant jump(x-post from /r/anypic)"
"This kills the man (From my Facebook feed)"
"My favorite Pingu gif"
"Amazing sunset"
"Some people say that a dog is a man's best friend but this guy is truly something else"
"Come in so."
"I think he thinks it's a game."
"How I feel when somebody posts a pic of a youtube comment"
"What you didnt get to see @ Stratos jump."
"Jump from the edge of the world"
"Yeah big deal its another bike g--- Are you fucking kidding me!?"
"Derp Jesus"
"This indecisive little aww is a little two-faced"
"How to win at NFL: Be magic"
"How i feel thinking i missed my first cakeday but didn't"
"ALL GLORY TO HYPNOGIRL"
"How to make out with different animals"
"Every Time I See A Hot Girl In Public"
"Mary Sayboldt - Realist."
"The Cat Hotel"
"As requested Sir Scoots with his Dirty Money Upvotes"
"This guy is in my friend's class."
"This is what venom does to blood"
"If you love Nicolas Cage and pickles you'll love this!"
"Scooby?"
"Wish I had this in my dorm"
"Never gonne give you up"
"In Sovied Russia you don't worry in the hotel  the room will be removed"
"I came here to solve for X..."
"A kitten in some holiday lights"
"Am I the only one that thinks this?"
"It's not that hard."
"I'm sorry pinata bro"
"Shuttle Endeavour passing the University of Texas Tower"
"...the fuck is this?"
"Protester gasses the police on March 24 in Brussels."
"searched wtf on google and this guy appeared..."
"Whenever I downvote a comment to -1"
"Anytime I read my Ex's status updates and tweets"
"no need to act like an animal  use chopsticks......."
"My cat won't leave me alone when I'm eating a snack either."
"How I feel when my submission gets all downvotes"
"Gotta love the Holiday Spirit"
"The most fabulous of all Klansmen."
"You can see the evil in his eyes."
"Apparently there are 75 band names in this pic"
"You gonna light that pipe?"
"You light that pipe!"
"All hell broke loose ..."
"Imagine..."
"Scorpion fly"
"ARISE! [NSFW]"
"Well  whatever gets you off... NSFW"
"How I expect the upcoming week will treat me"
"When I think things are going well in inferno."
"Indeed  you do not see that everyday..."
"not everyday do you see..."
"The United States Embassy has its own custom-made M&amp;Ms."
"Just a baby elephant playing"
"Definitely going to feed my future babies grapefruit"
"Sexy mother / daughter shot"
"So this showed up in my Facebook feed."
"Devilishly handsome dog."
"NOOOOOO"
"Come on! Do it! You chicken?! baaawwwwk bawk bawk bawk"
"An oldie but a goody"
"Max has seen some shit"
"Hverfjall Crater  Iceland"
"Buzz Kill."
"Science fair entry"
"white girl ain't even wasted... god this is awkward i had to take a shot"
"Pretty sure its a repost...but its so good."
"Mexico"
"The Mexican wave"
"Ever wonder how the Star Wars crawls were filmed?"
"Dickey Mouse"
"Doesn't even have a name..."
"Why I love Morgan Freeman"
"Howl's Moving Castle (for those that remember)"
"The utensil we all dream of."
"My friends parking violation. Made my day."
"What the fuck"
"I don't always care about my eyebrows. But when I do..."
"I came here too fuck bitches."
"How YOU doin'?"
"A powerful image I first saw here"
"r/aww could use a little otter love  cant they?"
"Still my all-time favorite pic. [FIXED]"
"When you've gamed so much  you're actually thinking of doing something productive for a change."
"How I feel today when my financial aid was disbursed."
"Exactly how I feel this morning after finding out I won $780 for winning my fantasy golf league"
"Selfish Hedgehogs"
"Should've cam whored Neal!"
"Shaaark!"
"First time Daddy sees his 3-week-old"
"Those Navy Seal dogs have nothing on this guy ..."
"Ocean Gangnam Style (x-post from /r/gifs)"
"I searched &quot;Swag Cat&quot; on google. I was not disappointed."
"Batman Dreams na na na nana na"
"TA-DA!"
"North Korea VS South Korea"
"best places"
"Must of been awkward."
"Bert and Ernie in HD"
"Don't you fucking lie to me you bastard."
"Evolution Graffiti"
"Evolution graffiti"
"My brother in-law made his cat a maze today from Officework boxes."
"If Michael Bay made a movie of the Tour de France..."
"So brave."
"Back in the day it's like  cats  cats  cats"
"My initial reaction to the cucumber story"
"My reaction to most of /r/funny/new."
"watch out..."
"Four Seasons Hotel - Bora Bora"
"Don't fall asleep in class"
"Everytime someone posts an OC..."
"Slow and steady wins the ra... oh. (xWTFpost)"
"Gilligan is one cool dog"
"Snake's doing it wrong."
"Star nosed mole.. All I can see are fingers and vaginas."
"Lady falling down slide"
"How I react when I walk into a spider web"
"Adorable no matter what they do"
"Anytime I try and submit a link  this is how I feel."
"How i feel when someone says the punch line to a joke before I do."
"Hi. This is not my reddit account  it was just open on this computer. I'm hoping this is the owners face after he get's back.[Fixed]"
"Karma karma karma karma baby chameleon"
"Baby Chameleon!"
"Shaved kitties look strange."
"Awww  a lion hug"
"Where black people go to get semi-decent donuts."
"When I somehow win an online argument that I didn't think I could win"
"Dodgeball Skills"
"Suddenly  WWE"
"Suddenly  WWE"
"My little girl cried after seeing this"
"Oh snap.."
"Every time I'm closing in to the first page"
"They're real!!"
"Gravity sucks."
"Its been a wonderful year as a redditor and this still makes laugh whenever I look upon it."
"When I realized my neutral face gives off a 'don't talk to me aura'"
"The 90's captured in a single image."
"OH LAWDY YES!!"
"Melting chocolate in a cup"
"To infinity and beyond!"
"Oh Buzz..."
"Pounced!"
"It probably would make finding Bane so much easier"
"Fishing with Moses sucks..."
"What is love..."
"I don't normally shit while away from home..."
"How I felt when I posted an article criticising PC gaming on r/pcgaming"
"well  a flying disco midget kicking some asses. [GIF]"
"&quot;Mr Magoo&quot; who is not my friend on Facebook just sent me a link to this picture with him saying &quot;rub shit on my belly&quot; and a phone number  i rang the number its a girl i don't know.."
"&quot;God prefers kind atheists over hateful Christians.&quot;"
"What's the time?"
"That face..."
"How I feel going to 8 o'clock class in Nebraska now that the temperature dropped."
"We've all done this before  right? [NSFW]"
"I found this and I left speechless."
"How I feel trying to reach the front page."
"A visual representation of what happens when you stick your dick in crazy"
"How I feel at work on a Monday morning"
"Nice save"
"Workaholics"
"My reaction while reading top post from r/TIL"
"MFW while reading top posts from r/TIl"
"Drop of water in front of a map."
"Vampires"
"I was bored and made this  I don't know when it'll come in handy though."
"Judgement day (x-post)"
"This funnel cloud touched down in Orchard  IA on June 10  2008"
"When it comes to creative album titles no one does it quite like this guy"
"I saved this as &quot;rainbow cum shots&quot;. I don't know what I was expecting."
"For Jesus  Walking on Water Has its Cons Too..."
"Just opened Youtube ..."
"I've failed you guys..."
"Realization after reaching the 70th page of /r/funny today..."
"Haha  this dumb frog is totaAAHHHH!"
"Sad photo or saddest photo?"
"Baby fennec fox"
"&quot;I've made a huge mistake..&quot;"
"My kind of Party"
"This looks like a good place to sleep"
"A wild Snorlax appears!"
"Who's got a Poke-flute?"
"Meanwhile on acid"
"How I feel reading Facebook post while at work"
"Thanks to pornhub"
"Bat out of hell."
"How I felt when I got my first upvote"
"Living in Ohio when people are talking about it"
"After waking up and seeing one of my posts did really well!"
"Prime minister of Norway  Jens Stoltenberg and Minister of Trade and Industry  Trond Giske pointing at a sign."
"The Norwegian prime minister (Jens Stoltenberg) and minister of industry and trade (Trond Giske) visiting a Norwegian county."
"Saw this in the kids clothes section..."
"Still gets me every time"
"Chernobyl Ferris Wheel {1920x1200} (x-post from r/Wallpapers)"
"An egg inside of an egg. This is...the Eggception."
"Yo Dawg [GIF]"
"Yo Dawg"
"Let's start being honest about these things......"
"Halloween candy a week later"
"What are we doing tonight Tard?"
"Father where are you?"
"My teammates in every shooter I've ever played online."
"So this is a thing..."
"Unicorn cat"
"My Final Four starting line-up..."
"Some men..."
"DIDNEY WORL?"
"DIDNEY WORL !!"
"Truly gangsta."
"Happy 60th  John Goodman!"
"OH NO!!!"
"What seems to be the problem officer?"
"Transform!"
"Trapped A Spider Under The CD Cover. Then  The Next Morning..."
"When people see me pull out a pack of gum."
"Dildo Suit (NSFW)"
"My reaction to the Olympic games celebration"
"Who's karma is it anyway?"
"I googled big bug bites..."
"I just hooked up my brand new computer to my 46 inch TV."
"Whenever I try and post something new to reddit.[NSFW]"
"My reaction when my 13 year-old sister asked to join Reddit..."
"I just knew cats were doing this!"
"Everything about being a slave sucked.."
"The red eyes make it believable."
"Finishing a paper at 5 in the morning..."
"Breaking Bad deleted scene."
"Minimal Fucks Given"
"The Slip and Slide"
"The $50 Lesson"
"Taps"
"Babe Ruth with future president George H. Bush (1948)"
"Being the only high one at a party full of drunk people"
"How i feel when i realize the truth about karma"
"Soon."
"How the internet feels about Romney's social media campaign"
"When I see a DIY project album with more than 5 pictures"
"Every time I see a long 4chan post..."
"So Hostess is going out of business? What do you mean  &quot;No more Twinkies?&quot;"
"The first time someone touched my penis. (SFW)"
"It's shit like this  Maury"
"Just some guinea pig swimming lessons"
"Pupsack repost /r/pics"
"Awww  it's funny 'cause he thinks he is gonna die."
"Shots shots shots shots shots shots"
"This is how we shall rid the world of the Jersey Shore"
"Invisible giant sits wherever he wants."
"pimpin alive."
"Twilight: It's a lot like Soccer..."
"It's a bird it's a plane  ouch."
"Stephen Hawking experiencing zero gravity"
"Father and son"
"Being the sober person and everyone else is drunk.."
"The Winged Laser Grizzlies will never stop. (Animated)"
"Celebrities photos with bikes Photoshopped out of them. (x-post from /r/mildlyinteresting)"
"New development in Sandy's path"
"So  I started shopping for my girlfriend's Christmas present..."
"When my Girlfriend asks for a back massage."
"How I feel as a medical student trying to read abdominal CT scans"
"Rare picture of NASL Sound Guy"
"An accident happened here in Rabat (Morocco) yesterday. I have no idea how that car got there."
"An accident happened here in Rabat (Morocco) yesterday. I have no idea how that car got there."
"Blue is one of us (x-post from r/Funny)"
"Oh God  Why"
"Meowth  that's right"
"'I can show you the world&quot;"
"The meaning of the internet"
"I think a lobotomy might disagree."
"Shit's on fire  yo"
"Been Laughing My Ass Off"
"not a single fuck"
"Gods will at bible camp (x-post from /funny)"
"I must've missed this scene in Star Wars. May the beers be with you!"
"he's got my vote"
"Waiting for up votes."
"Nice Save!!...Ooopss!!"
"Good job  stud"
"Hey  Robby...! [FB]"
"We are too evenly matched.."
"Ouch."
"I always seem to laugh at this"
"repost but i cant find it now &quot;headlights on girl&quot;"
"Bloodbath in 3  2  1"
"Big Ears"
"I have never seen anything quite like a Fennec Fox till today. Big ear love!"
"there aren't enough BABY foxes on r/aww"
"Face Palm"
"And for my next trick..."
"And for my next trick..."
"Where's Wall-e?"
"It's been quite a while..."
"I don't think this will be useful"
"Cafeteria Ninja"
"Lunch Tray Ninja"
"Damn Ninja"
"Stealth cat...watching...and waiting..."
"Soon..."
"Double major in ballet and bodybuilding"
"He never let go of his dreams"
"Ultimate argument ender"
"Amazing animated 3d-gif of IC1396 by J-P Metsävainio"
"Betty White's social networking"
"Betty White on facebook"
"on scumbag fat girl"
"When I found out I could upvote by pressing the 'A' button"
"This makes me uncomfortable on so many levels."
"Eye don't know what to say"
"I heard you guys like cute things."
"After Zilean connects with his time bomb"
"But unfortunately no more then two...rats"
"An LSD user dream"
"Crazy cat lady starter kit."
"Funny  and yet sad and true."
"Dog Jump Fail"
"My SO left yesterday for 4 months..."
"Saw this on Facebook. I don't think they're doing it right."
"The most impressive part of the space jump"
"Felix Baumgartner and Vladimir Putin"
"My cat Sam. Isn't he just precious?"
"I didn't know how to react upon seeing this in my bathroom..."
"Then  there's Denny [Pic][x-post from r/funny]"
"Want some fries with that?"
"My face when I realized I missed my first cakeday due to the first day of classes."
"The Black Analogy"
"But  I am so lone..."
"The first time I walked into a Vegas strip club."
"Hot right now..."
"None of you fags will every get to fuck ME"
"Giant harvestmen take over rooftops in Seattle"
"Xbox Car."
"I used to read Word Up magazine"
"Not Suspicious At All"
"Nah bro  ain't even tired."
"Reddit in one picture"
"How I feel when my comment receives several upvotes"
"For my cake day I present my favorite birthday related gif"
"AWwwAAAHHHHHHH!?!!??!!?"
"Waking up to a bunch of karma for a silly comment you barely remember posting"
"Get to fuck"
"How I feel downvoting something with 0 points"
"Let go!"
"Long live the King!"
"...planking? Yeah  let's go with that."
"Australian supermarket reponds to customer on Facebook"
"This is what it feels like to be high on religion."
"Man orders custom size 14.5 slipper  company sends size 1450 instead."
"When I'm asked if im a boob or ass guy.."
"Googled &quot;fuck&quot;  wish I hadn't..."
"If Fairly Odd Parents was on MTV."
"&quot;What do you mean everyone?&quot;"
"Family Guy got it pretty accurate"
"Moose hunters"
"Hunting..."
"Hunting Season has begun..."
"The tables have turned"
"How To Make Your Fish Nervous"
"Fingernail nubs (not mine lol)"
"I created a budget 3 monitor stand. Cost £25 (~$40 USD). Details in imgur album."
"As a lifelong Colt fan seeing Peyton playing for Denver last night..."
"Lincoln cannot catch a break. At least they sent the best this time."
"Lincoln CANNOT catch a break"
"Lincoln Can Not Catch a Break."
"Think this was a coincidence?"
"Meanwhile on china airways"
"My friend's dogs doing some star wars cosplay"
"this belongs here"
"seems legit..."
"Wow  a childs skull before losing its teeth."
"A child's skull before losing baby teeth."
"Sorry guys"
"For you Dexter fans"
"How have I not seen this before (Alison Brie and Gillian Jacobs) NSFW"
"Where were they when I went to Community College?"
"First World Atheist Problems."
"Redditor holds Adam Sandler at gunpoint to wear a t-shirt while paparazzi takes a photo to publish. All for the celebrity karma"
"Oh Deadpool"
"You can smell it from here"
"Midget Kung-fu"
"I keep making sound effects every time I watch this"
"Alex Morgan's Hit On Jenny Bindon With Andy Gray Commentary."
"Alex Morgan's Hit On Jenny Bindon With Andy Gray Commentary. [x/post from /r/soccer]"
"Well now i will never forget where my driveway is"
"Everyone here thinks they are"
"I like to move it move it!"
"No. Way."
"Candles can be lit by their vapor trail"
"How i feel down voting posts with the punch line in the title"
"Tunak Borat...Tunak"
"Wow that car is so shiny...oh wait  if you just touch there..."
"Holy Crap! You can find Jesus in the strangest places"
"OMG - It's jesus."
"This is how I feel when it comes to most things in the bible"
"Woke up to this on Google Happy 70th Bob Ross"
"Liam Neeson vs. Chuck Norris"
"After being on reddit for a year and finally seeing reposts hit the front page."
"Waking up Saturday and thinking it's Monday."
"Well  I understand the reaction!"
"The old fire prank."
"When friends of my ex try to corner me at a party to start gossiping."
"Push it to the limit!"
"Thug live"
"How I feel as Marine Biologist around my immunologist  and pharmacologist friends. (x-post from r/funny)"
"Aquaman's Revenge"
"Here's a puppy licking some lime"
"time for noms.. Aww WTF is this?!?!"
"I find it impossible to be in a bad mood every time I see this picture."
"How I Looked Like Dancing To This Song At The Club"
"Psy - Right in the Childhood"
"Why Reddit's Olympic shooting logo is funny..."
"Patience."
"Today is my birthday. This is how I feel because nobody knows."
"My kind of dog."
"Helpful Dog"
"Dick Pic's (SFW)"
"Well  at least she's protecting herself."
"Overly Attached Slut"
"Umm...Yeah...I'll just leave this here..."
"how to get where you're going."
"Rock and Roll Destination Index"
"I think we can all relate."
"Hot-tub party"
"If they fits... they sits"
"Hair swap"
"Missingo the fear."
"Harry Potter  First Days of Filming"
"I see one hockey gif just got popular  why not my favorite."
"An average Saturday night."
"I... what..."
"Malachite doesn't have anything on Bismuth"
"Those are all nice rocks  but this is Serious Bismuth"
"I don't always go on facebook..."
"Reason reddit is better than facebook"
"When I get that feeling..."
"Self Water boarding"
"How I feel trying to post dog photos on /r/aww - Imgur"
"Thank God!"
"Classic Will Smith"
"Thanks for ruining memes  Reddit."
"Hot ass"
"Entry speed...incredible!"
"I already have a PrayStation!"
"The Igloo Village in Kakslauttanen  Finland"
"Finland"
"The mighty Nicholas Cage produces dubstep."
"Oh  just a couple of pandas."
"...oh god"
"Whose Line is it Anyway?"
"Coolest Umbrella Ever!"
"TF2 in a nutshell"
"Douche bags these days..."
"Advice From The Master"
"Spot the differences"
"Ever feeling down?"
"Posted in my dorm building. Good information to know."
"Some good lessons posted in my dorm building."
"Random  Lucky shot! What do you think Reddit?"
"Apparantly the odds of seeing this are 1:300 000!"
"Caught in a landslide"
"Fanta Sea"
"I googled &quot;The most American picture ever&quot;"
"How the word &quot;Boob&quot; was invented."
"Ever Google 'scissoring' with the safe search on?"
"I know that feel bro"
"OM NOM NOM."
"Dubanana kitty"
"Discuss"
"I mean  the wall makes a decent point."
"it's like he did nothing wrong"
"Slowest moving deer in the world"
"The inimitable Sir David Attenborough"
"David Attenborough's Response To Viewers Wanting Him To Acknowledge &quot;Evidence Of The Almighty&quot;"
"Just kill him"
"Not everybody hates a bath!"
"UP Tang Clan"
"Seeing a post I upvoted in the morning from r/new on the front page after coming back from lunch"
"Since Disney is making a Star Wars movie... [ credits to Peter Hyoguchi facebook page ]"
"How Girls Rate Guys VS. How Guys Rate Girls"
"Reddit in RL"
"Still better than Apple maps"
"Pretty much sums it up perfectly."
"&quot;You are not the father&quot; - Turkish Edition. [X-post from r/funny]"
"stop it! [fixed]"
"Chill Frog."
"This needs to be Re-posted"
"Whitehaven Beach  Australia"
"Desert Rivers  Mexico"
"Crazy picture from Sitka  Alaska"
"gimme fuel  gimme fire!!!!"
"This is why you use a cup."
"Got this in my mail today  seems legit. Looks like I'm getting an iPad2!"
"That moment..."
"Don't touch me!"
"Teamwork"
"Logical Brian"
"All I wanted was 1 good photo to send to gramgram...damn it"
"Sunrise reflected in a bubble"
"sunset reflection"
"Norwegian sunrise reflected in a bubble (x/post from r/perfecttiming)"
"Dont worry fellow  that evil dog is gone..."
"Strong bond between lion and man (found in gifs)"
"You BOTH don't have shit on this"
"Every time my parents leave the house"
"Whenever my friends play MMOs"
"Can't be unseen"
"Open the Rainbow bridge!"
"They rapin' everybody out here!"
"When i heard honey boo-boo is going to hollywood"
"How I feel going to work at my new job"
"Oh irony."
"A challenger appears for greatest GIF on the internet."
"Drop the bass"
"This little guy followed me around for a couple of days."
"C-c-c-c-ombo breaker!!"
"Drawing Something is doing it right..."
"about all these Draw Something posts lately..."
"Nice save bro"
"How I feel when I hand in an assignment on time"
"How i feel winning 5 dollars on a scratch-off"
"This faggotry."
"Ground control to major dog"
"Wiggle wiggle wiggle wiggle wiggle...yeah!"
"The Transformers are here!!!! And...they...are smaller than i imagined..."
"Good costume or  greatest costume?"
"When I see an interesting link  click it  and my internet goes out."
"Mfw I missed my cakeday for the second year in a row.."
"So this is why grandma is always in such a good mood."
"Wtf nature?"
"So this lady usually charge $ 1 for the visit  $ 7 per photo  and $ 10 to film her passion fruit tree... I wonder why"
"Saw this gif on here the other day  thought of this."
"A mountain of bison bones from 1870s"
"This is why we can't have nice things"
"So..found this on my laptop earlier..."
"Go to the pet spa  they said. Try this new hair cut  they said."
"strange cat haircut"
"And he shall be known as Polygon Cat"
"Company cuts cost on security"
"&quot;That's it guys  i'm done for the day..&quot;"
"i think its there first time seeing a ball and they entered a team"
"The X-files"
"Ghetto Boombox"
"Just got some new speakers for the ride  what do you guys think?"
"You can do it baby panda."
"In a kingdom far  far away..."
"Hmmm  nope. [xpost from /r/gifs]"
"I see what you did there.."
"When Somebody Says My Zombie Apocalypse Plan Is Stupid"
"Swimmer trapped by beach balls."
"Trapped by beach balls."
"That's gonna leave a mark...."
"The original &quot;stahp&quot;."
"STAHP"
"Earth  Jupiter and Venus from the skyline of Mars."
"Truer words were never spoken."
"The book created for Redditors"
"This is why I love living in Washington"
"Waking Up Next To A Hog"
"Oh Billy Mays and your silly prices."
"Genie sex"
"How I feel on my Cake Day"
"Zebra..."
"And slide..."
"Skyrim DDR"
"Surprise"
"Rainbow Leaf Beetle"
"rainbow leaf beetle"
"chrysolina cerealis"
"Sea-horse"
"internet stopped working...."
"Well  when you put it that way..."
"Just a little joey to brighten your day."
"They said I could be anything"
"Yummmmm!"
"That's unforunate."
"Aww ):"
"Gangnam Fries.."
"McGangnam"
"R/GoneWild + R/WTF ="
"how i dance at parties"
"Was listening to &quot;Shots&quot; by LMFAO and happened to stumble upon this beauty right when they started singing &quot;wiggle wiggle wiggle wiggle&quot; (NSFW)"
"Could you help him out!"
"This can't be real  anyone on reddit know the story behind the picture?"
"Yeah."
"It is he I am looking for."
"Why God Doesn't Have a PHD"
"Seven hours  one image."
"I nearly died laughing. &quot;trust&quot;"
"LOOK OUT  here comes the spider man"
"Cookie cutter shark...not the name I would have chosen."
"My reaction when my boss tries to be friendly by telling a joke  then walks out of the room."
"Kame hame ha!"
"Anon Ackbar. A shitty shoop I did  but I still thought it was funny."
"My GF told me I could box up what I don't think she needs  so it can be sold at a silent auction..."
"this is what i thought when my dad offered me a shot"
"The most rapiest skunk in the world."
"The most interesting skunk in the world"
"When I get mass downvotes"
"Every time!"
"This was on /r/wtf but it definitely belongs here more"
"Meanwhile in russia"
"How I feel upvoting someone I'm having an argument with"
"nomnomnom"
"He don't give a shit."
"Facebook"
"Facebook saves lives"
"If you played with this guy..."
"Really into that music. Heh."
"Waitaminute."
"Mind blown. I love you  Pixar."
"Trolls Do It For The Lulz"
"My reaction when I discovered /r/gentlemanboners"
"When my girlfriend tries to finish a sentence for me"
"I'm coming for ya  buddy!"
"It's not like I needed to sleep this month"
"The more you look...the more of your soul they devour"
"Obama reading Where The Wild Things Are -- primed for photoshopping"
"This is just screaming for it"
"Why I wish I had a twin."
"How I feel about the recent Atheism / Theism war (Where is your science now?)"
"That moment when you notice a lot of redditors live in your city"
"Finally i can finally relax"
"Party like Ke$ha"
"True pain"
"My ass is high as fuck right now"
"When donkeys fly..."
"When my gf shows me the Gangman Style Video"
"Missing Tortoise!"
"Not sure which part of this is funnier"
"Classroom-ception"
"Disposable canvas"
"a little creature i know my fellow redditors are very very fond of"
"Ready  set  go"
"It's full of baby fat"
"Cat Man..."
"How I feel browsing the frontpage of Reddit..."
"God of Reddit?"
"How I picture trolls"
"If you could stop time ..."
"Amazing picture from National Geographic"
"Kowloon Walled City  Hong Kong."
"Goodness"
"from Hitler to Super Wizard"
"We have a winner"
"Sexy and I know it (I work out)"
"Asked my wife what she wanted to do tonight (Friday)  she said &quot;Clean the house.&quot;"
"After my front page post was removed by mods"
"Classic"
"Meanwile in russian subway"
"Found this while trying to find a picture of Ron Swanson and Tammy 2 (nsfw?)"
"Best picture on the Internet"
"Trolldad"
"I must go  my planet needs me"
"DEATH TO ALL JUICE"
"My friend was telling me all about how he got on the front page today"
"imgur: This is why I'm going to take pottery classes"
"Awesome!"
"Ball..? BALL!"
"Would you like some water?"
"A newborn baby gorilla at Melbourne Zoo gets a checkup"
"Required read for all Freshmen."
"Seems totally fair"
"Soon.."
"How it feels getting Upvotes on my first post ever."
"GODDAMMIT DIEGO"
"Pregnant Breakdancing."
"Anyone else feel like this guy when they're high?"
"Head in the Clouds"
"This isn't a gif to me anymore. It's a beautiful movie."
"Oh nothing  just a cop texting while driving..."
"A sheriff texting (with both hands) while driving. Classy."
"Here's a cop 2 handed texting while driving - Imgur"
"Right then  where to begin..."
"I hate my life."
"I see what you did there  Youtube..."
"I Have The Powerpoint!!"
"Usain Bolt holding out the baton to an official and then pulling it away is one of the greatest things ever"
"Would you live here?"
"Welcome to my redneck mansion"
"Found this guy on the internet."
"Report for Booty"
"One Hundred and Twenty Kilometers"
"His shit MUST be good!"
"Roman baseball"
"Saw this picture posted in a friend's Facebook feed..."
"Dum Da Dum Doi Doi"
"I Missed Out Celebrating My 1st Reddit Birthday...So I Googled &quot;Reddit Birthday&quot; and..."
"It's my reddit birthda.. ohh. Okay."
"Irony"
"There are two ways to read the sign..."
"How I picture people who downvote every comment in a post"
"Can you see the ghost in the picture!?"
"Can you see the ghost in this picture?!"
"This is how I picture a Reddit meet if a female enters the room. [FIXED]"
"Just act natural"
"Look at the painting my gf painted the other day(Upvote so her work can be seen)"
"It happens to me  too."
"Yeah  that's right Mickey Mouse  cheer on for the cat!"
"This kind of attitude is not OK"
"If I had one hour to live..."
"If i had one hour to live.."
"An hour left to live"
"One last time....."
"Wife of a fallen Marine  sleeps by his casket the night before his burial  playing music which reminded her of him"
"Dis my best friend"
"You are here"
"How I feel every time I use my card and don't know how much money I actually have on it"
"How i felt when my girlfriend finally got her period"
"Whenever I try No-Scoping."
"lets go play tha game...:)"
"The Dark Side of religion"
"Googled &quot;Worst day ever&quot;."
"Being gay  I'm pretty sure this is what a vagina looks like."
"Hillbilly - Imgur"
"First try at downvote gif...How i do?"
"NOPE NOPE NOPE"
"Smashing"
"President Obama's bullet-proof Cadillac &quot;Limo One&quot; nicknamed &quot;The Beast&quot;"
"Pretty death!"
"Well  it's true."
"Hurricane Sandy floods NYC street [1024x1365]"
"When I try to get to the front page"
"This Gif really sparked my interest"
"Spongebob Hankpants."
"Propane and propane accessories."
"When you spend too much time watching cartoons  the shows start blurring together"
"WBC  meet Hell's Angels."
"1%'s Motorcycle Club stop WBC protests...guess a beatdown is scarier than the wrath of God"
"So school's starting in a week  and people are posting their schedules on Facebook  and this is all I can think of."
"I know its old but this is my favorite gif"
"Nice girl...wtf?!"
"Boing! (X-post from /r/gifs)"
"&quot;Honey  help me pick out a color for our wallpaper.&quot;"
"Cat Hypnosis"
"Stunning eyes."
"Shower Rage"
"This is what happens when you mess with a professional boxer"
"Rock It"
"Guitar"
"Say hello to my little string"
"This moment is the reason why I won't use the public restrooms anymore  and why I won't sleep tonight."
"My reaction every time."
"Wait...How much money?"
"Haters gunna hate"
"If you do this  Fuck You"
"he's got my vote"
"Nappy kitty &amp; Spastic kitty"
"Sometimes when i just cant get the rest my god damned shredded cheese out of the god damned carton hole for my god damned lunchables cheese pizza..."
"Come at me bro"
"The Creek"
"Condensed sulfer burns blue in the crater of the Kawah Ljen volcano - East Java  Indonesia"
"Photo of maggot x100 magnification OR I want to suck your derp"
"Paint me like one of your french girls"
"How i feel about being downvoted on everthing i post."
"The Ron Swanson Pyramid of Greatness"
"Modern-Day Guerrilla Warfare"
"This is fuck?"
"Appropriate review."
"With Disney buying LucasArts  this needs to happen"
"This needs to happen"
"Cox dancing."
"Wow. Just fucking wow."
"This has gone too far."
"Which is it Obama?"
"Canned humour"
"Most redditors can agree."
"There is something here  bro... I can feel it..."
"The Crooked House (Sopot  Poland)"
"Naysayers shall say nay (intersected mail from r/funny)"
"Surf's up"
"Failure to connect"
"This came up on my newsfeed today and I nearly shit myself"
"I obviously have the power"
"Damnit DrHetterscheidt."
"The picture says it all... This movie just looks incredible"
"John Goodman seems a tad miffed"
"nice kitty"
"Meanwhile in India"
"Incest is Wincest."
"&quot;We didn't meet until adulthood  so it doesn't count as incest.&quot;"
"&quot;SpongeBob SquarePants is why violent crime exists&quot;"
"Probably happier than 85% of us."
"Chill bear is chillin"
"Some friends of mine went fishing. It ended up being a pain in the ass"
"Spear fishing gone wrong. (NSFW)"
"Portable Rocket Launcher"
"Portable Rocket Launcher"
"DAMMIT CARL!!"
"This always makes me laugh"
"Hey carl..."
"Finally found something good on facebook..."
"No work today."
"Apple vs Samsung  how it works..."
"If you voted for Barack Obama..."
"Repost  but it made my Thursday a little better."
"Someone's idea of a clever portrait?"
"He wants to sleep with you..."
"Haikus are fun."
"Pretty cool picture of ice  growing out of a hole in a rail."
"Link leads a traumatic life"
"Penguin on the edge of infinity"
"Well..would you look at that."
"Saw this earlier....the fuck?"
"You're no Gentleman"
"Damn  it feels good to be a gangsta"
"This made me feel better about being a chubby guy [FIXED]"
"Rap is easy"
"So these guys were riding around college station last night..."
"Hearing players complain about The Sniper"
"The Most Awesome Picture on the internet  according to google."
"The Best Cat On The Internet"
"Mandarin Dragonet"
"So this is the typical reddit user  huh?"
"Typed in &quot;typical redditor&quot; on Google Images....this was the first result"
"Quotes that inspired you. Or you found life changing."
"MERLKBERHNS"
"Yeah it's a repost  but I love this pic"
"Just scrolling down facebook then..."
"I'd love to"
"My dick. (Wrongfully posted to r/WTF)"
"I always knew something was off about Pooh"
"Hey Pooh.."
"After I eat Five Guys."
"Nothing to do here"
"Found this gif on 4chan  thought you guys might like it"
"I truly don't understand why this exists."
"Its...almost like watching Shark Week"
"The only acceptable &quot;Duckface&quot;"
"STAHP"
"STAHP"
"I want a panda"
"Ten MILLION times better than the movie theater."
"Saw this on r/gaming and shat bricks  how did I never know about this!?"
"I see your libraries and raise you WonderWorks  Orlando"
"Hey I just met you..."
"I feel horrible for laughing  but it's my cake day so I think I am safe"
"How I feel as a Motorcyclist in Oregon"
"Jesus had human needs..."
"God help meh!! (repost)"
"Simba  are you even LISTENING to Mufasa?"
"Bill Belichick is a baby."
"Is it just me or was this game the most under rated game in the whoooole thing?"
"Please give this seat to the elderly or disabled."
"Happy 10th Anniversary"
"Oh Sam I am..."
"Why they're awesome."
"This is quite frightening."
"These jellyfish look like alien lifeforms"
"How much wood would a woodchuck chuck if a woodchuck could chuck wood? (nsfw)"
"Hello. My name is bird."
"This has got to be a joke  right?"
"A collage of why growing up in the 90s was the best."
"What I think of every time someone blames something on Obama"
"Ummm.... huh.. at least they look warm.... [NSFW]"
"I'm at a loss of words."
"Greatest Presidential Portrait Ever."
"Must... return... shopping... cart..."
"Young David Suzuki doppelgänger meets actual David Suzuki. Ridiculousness ensues."
"For some reason r/aww wasn't loving this Sloth as much as I do."
"Used to..."
"A mate dressed up as Mr Gangnam Style for Halloween - thought I'd make him move!"
"Wasn't thinking 4th dimensionally"
"A pandafull of AWW!"
"I'm so fucking sick of these people.."
"Earth Lovin'"
"Must have been hump day"
"Come J.O. on my train set. NSFW"
"Something everyone is victim of"
"Looks like..."
"Early for everything."
"Prank war"
"This happened in the Netherlands"
"What was Hitler's first name?"
"How I feel when I look at the clock while browsing Reddit."
"Etho's Rection to an Efficiency X pick"
"so... this bear  I'll just leave it alone."
"Just bear"
"How I feel when watching Jersey Shore..."
"So my girlfriend and I just watched &quot;The Human Centipede&quot;"
"The people who sit behind me in class while I surf reddit..."
"Shitty Advice"
"&quot;Just a quick stroll through the park Regenold.&quot;"
"Pug on a horse"
"Fire in the hole."
"I don't wanna disturb..."
"Google's first image result for &quot;fucking pixie&quot;"
"So close..."
"Baseball Level: Japan"
"I thought this might be appreciated here."
"Decisions decisions.."
"Crouching Soldier  Hidden Sniper"
"Its Kiss Cam  Bro"
"Why did I unfriend you on Facebook?"
"Liking your own status on Facebook"
"I should give that a try (xpost from r/standupshots)"
"After having sex for the first time in two years."
"When I woke up this morning and checked Reddit"
"&quot;Ghetto just got taken to a whole new level.&quot;"
"What?"
"The fuck  Walmart??"
"Happy Birthday to a man who can turn any sad day in to AWESOME."
"Solar System Hard Candy Lollipops"
"Really? I say let them burn."
"I thought the Walking Dead was going to be safe for my children to watch...now this."
"Me too  Snoopy. Me too..."
"[X-Post from /r/ Funny] Went to a wedding yesterday  the officiator held up this sign at the first kiss."
"Yes."
"How I feel being the only white kid in a group of hispanics when Spanish music plays.."
"Words cannot explain how much I despise this town at times."
"This is not what I ordered"
"One-hander cheerleader commander"
"Union Station Flood Toronto (June 1) - RBC Building has bigger problems than we originally thought"
"BREAKING NEWS - Sharks spoted circling at Union Station Toronto"
"Shark's spotted at Toronto's Union Station after flood"
"Sharks attack Union Station"
"Shop at your own risk!"
"I want a sequel to this right now!!"
"A cat beard that pleases all"
"How it felt to break 100 karma in a month."
"I still enjoy these awesome creatures  even if they don't really exist..."
"Came across this gem on Google"
"Crazy Elephants"
"Every time I get into the shower with my wife[Fixed]"
"&quot;One of the most beautiful snakes I have found and shot so far  which is a photographer's delight because of its vibrant colors and its posture  which is actually a self-defense posture. It's a mildly venomous snake found throughout the subcontinent of India and its neighboring countries.&quot;"
"A Very Portal Christmas"
"Brilliant Christmas tree."
"Found this on Tumblr"
"My precious!"
"How it feels running a business with family (sometimes)..."
"My reaction to the origin of the tablet  and how you feel walking through the airport with a guitar case..."
"Saw this Derpina today. Nice meme dress!"
"unknown"
"To Rule The Skies"
"I need you to think outside the box..."
"The Meeting"
"The Upward Thrust."
"I don't mean to get your goat  but I love ewe Reddit!"
"Woh  dude  hold on a sec!"
"Matthew Perry &amp; Jennifer Aniston Doing Promo For... Windows 95?!"
"Reversable dog/cat."
"Catholics and Presbyterians really have different views about heaven"
"Bieber  delicious Bieber"
"She has a good point."
"On my facebook feed..."
"ITS ATHEISM BECAUSE HE CANT CLAP"
"Only them can do it!"
"Birthday Gusta"
"This made my day... x3"
"Stray Cat Slut"
"Cats these days"
"Oh god skyrim - we can't keep going like this!"
"Vango knows how to tug my heart strings"
"I was high on acid and..."
"Belfast's anti-drugs campaign"
"Really?"
"What crazy nonsense are the kids doing these days??"
"Om Nom Nom Breakfast..."
"How I feel when I find an onion ring in my fries"
"My AT&amp;T contract ended today!"
"When I noticed the reddit sticker on my new neighbor's car (x-post)"
"Japanese Bagelheads. What. The. Actual. Fuck."
"I know everyone's seen all the pictures of the Eyjafjallajökull Volcano  but this one still blows my mind"
"How I feel after a year of Reddit."
"I don't even..."
"Easter Bunny - Jesus - Facehugger Special (xpost from wtf)"
"going to a party  then realizing there's no alcohol  and my ex is there (Fixed)"
"Hey Reddit  I bought you guys something. I hope you like it."
"Oh yeah  that's the spot."
"The suck is strong with this one! Sorta NSFW"
"Teddy Roosevelt riding a Moose"
"here's some chill niggas sitting in some big ass cylinder"
"Stahp it Romney"
"Welcome to America"
"he's not the only one"
"That's a lotta birds (Tsavo National Park  Kenya)"
"What I Feel Like When I Listen To Metal"
"The son I should've had"
"Area Codes in Which Ludacris Claims to Have Hoes"
"Elephant is the best around"
"Who else would use one of these?"
"Me trying to get to the front page  so close.."
"missed it by that much"
"I was browsing okcupid today when I came across this."
"The Guide to Questioning Christianity"
"white people are crazy!"
"Whack a kitten"
"Can't stop the cute."
"Tube cat"
"Always relevant"
"Choose wisely."
"Too early"
"What The Fuck."
"..But where's Russell?"
"One of the cutest pictures I have ever seen."
"Hero"
"Rap rap rap rap rap"
"The Milky Way  shot from the North Sea coast"
"I hate to do this  man  but I can't take it anymore... (GIF)"
"I haven't been able to find my glasses all day. This is how I feel."
"Suddenly  this guy (xpost from r/funny)"
"Look of Approval"
"What the fuck?"
"What You See Vs What Animals See"
"On Buddhism  samsara  and science [more original content]"
"whip my hair!"
"The Scream"
"While all the other kids played MarioKart  I played this. No complains here."
"Not sure if this would fit AWW or WTF. The wolf spider is the only species of spider that carries its offspring this way. Thanks to &quot;I fucking love science&quot; on FB"
"Yea.. basically that"
"VICTORY!"
"idiot"
"Spread that shit"
"always upvote"
"this level still haunts my dream..."
"I still have nightmares 20 years later."
"As a man  this is what its like to lose an argument with a woman."
"When I found out there was a latinas subreddit"
"Couldn't Resist"
"Lots of WTF in this picture."
"This could not have been taken at a better time"
"This makes me want to start building models again..."
"To all redditors:"
"Just for perspective"
"How I feel about a 3-day weekend"
"Unimpressed Slave on college"
"best animal ever"
"My brother just literally just said this. Note: My mom left me and my brother for 2 weeks and we had a discussion about the missing food in the fridge"
"Neverending Nightmare"
"Peekaboo"
"No littering  please!"
"Anytime you need to pull a MacGyver"
"This needs to be hanging on my wall."
"This could have come in handy several times...it's called a Sheewee"
"SheWee...?"
"When I see a funny post with only a few upvotes"
"Jasper discovers reddit"
"What immediately popped into my head when I heard all that methanol caught fire"
"This pretty much sums up Woody Harrelson's AMA today."
"What i think people do when they accidentally repost."
"Whenever I upvote something and realize I need to login."
"Ouch  my childhood!"
"Scumbag redditor"
"Honestly you guys never learn."
"Currently Happening."
"Sums up Back to the Future"
"My conscience talking to me as a bachelor."
"So I'm reading 50 shades of gray"
"First time playing Counter Strike when I realised..."
"Romney Gangnam Style!"
"Oh Facebook  you never disappoint me..."
"Disturbing realization dawning on cat."
"I leave to go to the bathroom for a single minute  and I get this as my Facebook profile picture."
"Draw me like one of your French girls [FIXED]"
"Google image search for &quot;sleeping kittens&quot;"
"Gave me an intense case of frisson (x-post from /r/QuotesPorn)"
"What its like watching Lesbian Squirting porn...(SFW)"
"What the US uniforms should have been. [FIXED] [FIXED]"
"So the President of the United States did and AMA today..."
"I dont know... What to say (NSFW)"
"This is how to truly fuck the police"
"It's all about point of view..."
"That don't look safe!"
"Stop my baby!"
"How i feel when someone posts the same .gif as me with a different caption and reels in the upvotes"
"American History X - the game"
"Your mom got a lot of positive reviews ;)"
"The Internet doesn't like retarded people."
"Must... kill... 43.6% of the internet."
"Had to check  I was right"
"Yay for Reddit."
"The Internet has spoken"
"What the internet thinks of 'YOLO'... Hm..."
"My Faith in Humanity is Restored."
"If life was an M.M.O"
"My fur's a mess  don't let him see me like this!"
"Is she freaking serious!!"
"When I found out all of my roommates are fervent Nickelback fans."
"How I feel whenever I'm the first to comment on a facebook photo that's destined for dozens of comments."
"Saturday morning."
"Correct."
"YOU WHAT ?!"
"Wooohooo"
"Motosadness"
"I'm late! I'm la- OH SHIT OH SHIT OH SHIT!"
"see ya later"
"Don't let the cat near the Kinect"
"NOT TODAY!!!"
"My friend met the President. Apparently  Obama referred to him as his &quot;homie.&quot;"
"Just gonna leave this here"
"I guess that's one way to advertise."
"Dogs vs. Cats [FIXED]"
"Happy 10th Birthday to one of my favorite gaming franchises"
"Weiners and Butts"
"Using the mens room"
"How the hell did this camel get stuck on a balcony?"
"Innovative treadmill exercise--discovered by a pigeon"
"How I feel about reposts"
"My favorite book as an adult."
"my first gifsound.. howd i do ?"
"When swag goes wrong"
"When Swag goes wrong (x-post from r/gifs)"
"I'm on a boat"
"One thing Christians and Atheists agree upon"
"So true"
"Reason Rally - Brace Yourselves"
"How I Feel Posting Something On Reddit"
"It will begin any minute now....."
"Apologies for all non Americans"
"Any time I ever update anything on Facebook."
"And they're off!"
"Hi I'm a Mac! and I'm a Pc..."
"Oldest (potentially creepiest) gif on the internet. (of course it's a fucking repost)"
"so my brother came home with a yolo shirt today...."
"Shark Rider."
"Boy Hitching a Ride on his Pet Shark"
"&quot;Move along....nothing to see here...&quot;"
"So  I saw this shirt the other day..."
"Technology is astonishing (x-post from /r/Apple)"
"Lets Taco Bout it!"
"So my cat likes to look out the window."
"I hate myself."
"Family guy: Then and now"
"Pictures of things that are cuter than cats"
"Pictures of things cuter than cats"
"My friend and I are working on a game  does /gaming approve?"
"Bothered me as a child."
"Welp  missed my cakeday. gotta be tough.."
"50 Shades Of"
"FUCK YOU"
"That face"
"Pop-Up Fireworks"
"How I feel when I see a TIL submission on the frontpage which I already knew."
"Believe"
"Troll Elevator"
"Carnivore? Chances are..."
"Inexpensive cat treadmill."
"Kitty treadmill"
"Spark Night"
"A funky little gifsound to keep your day going"
"Religious Bale (x-post from r/batman)"
"Which one's named Dougie?"
"the most complete fighter in the world"
"statuses today"
"statuses today"
"It's gonna be a hell of a 4 years for President Obama"
"Safety Dancing?"
"56 years of tornado tracks. Width corresponds to 'F' scale strength."
"Now  after 30 years  you can carry all of this in your pocket..."
"Karma Whoring Circa 1988"
"From where you'd rather be... North Shore  Oahu"
"Must've been a pretty good joke..."
"The most charisma I've ever seen in one place"
"Da fuck"
"What is this I don't even"
"No possible explanation."
"I want this... I want this in my house..."
"Skull Spew."
"Architectural Phallacy."
"probably the best self-pic i have seen (SFW)"
"Bathroom mirror pics are waaayyy too mainstream"
"Know the difference."
"Super Hero woes"
"The power of fire."
"&quot;This was found beside a river in China &quot; says photographer Yu Wu. &quot;The small ant is biting the branch and holding the 'big' rock up in the air.&quot;"
"Remy Lacroix"
"Funky boris."
"Wow."
"KFC Date Night"
"lemonade"
"I don't even know.."
"This was one of the best shows ever"
"No words"
"Awesome gymnastic skills"
"GIANT pic (5006 x 3150) shows paths of all global hurricanes since 1851."
"Map of all hurricanes since 1851"
"How Twilight was written [FIXED]"
"Magikarp BITCH!"
"The moment every trainer lives for [FIXED]"
"Simple yet incredible picture of a NASA Shuttle"
"Why Luke  why?"
"He wasn't handed the deathstar"
"The epitome of cuteness."
"Devastation from the earthquake today in Delaware. Thankfully  no legs were broken."
"I Can Kill You With Cuteness or Lead..."
"Someone Asked me to Describe what Reddit was like  while high... I showed them this"
"Personal Swimming devices"
"Au Pair"
"How can I get a job like this?"
"Hot potato  chinese style."
"It's the scarf that scares me."
"Powerful Sperm"
"It takes a few seconds to get it..."
"The new apple"
"Walter's Lab"
"Any insect enthusiasts?"
"My favourite fancy dress picture ever."
"unfortunately what my brain does at the end of a semester"
"Beauty cat"
"Brilliant table design allows it to move like a spider."
"What a dickhead"
"I want this on me."
"Get your mind out of the gutter  internet  it's just a puppy."
"That's an...interesting looking dog."
"North Korean missile program EXPOSED"
"So you're a fan of Just... WTF? NSFW"
"Biebermania! (NSFW)"
"World's biggest Bieber fan [NSFW]"
"Trick Question"
"This belongs here"
"Reddit should like this"
"Why didn't I think of this as a kid..."
"Let's go for a swim"
"After his show ended  Barney hit some tough times."
"Well that got a reaction!"
"I was watching Teen Titans when i saw..."
"No trespassing..."
"Here is an album of things with faces. For no reason at all."
"If Jimmy ever needed a day job"
"Everyone I know is getting married or pregnant."
"Car stereo I wanted 10 years ago v.s. the one I want today[FIXED]"
"Two Cute dogs"
"5 Simple Steps"
"Oh Japan  I don't even."
"Whenever I enter my house..."
"Trying to post in a major subreddit"
"Working your paws to the bone."
"Jamaican celebrating Usain Bolt's three gold medals."
"Wut...."
"Don't stop..."
"NEXT!"
"Whenever I see an atheist and theist argue"
"Inside-out Pool"
"Late to Class"
"Haven't posted in awhile and found this funny"
"It scares me how often this happens"
"My karma just doubled...to 2"
"what I do when Tom Jones comes on at work..."
"Work that body"
"When class was cancelled today."
"Sorry guys  I did not mean to."
"I So Sorry Guys...:("
"Never gonna run around and dessert you."
"Multiple Rick Rolls"
"This hurts my brain."
"I have not."
"How do you feel now jerk!"
"Man  that's gonna be worth a shitload of points"
"White Weasel"
"Baby Ferret."
"I don't even.. it just keeps going..."
"Creepiest Shit Ever [NSFW]"
"Because fuck swimming."
"The humans from Wall-E go diving..."
"Atheist humor"
"The only version of the Last Supper I would like to believe in..."
"Now I get it..."
"Was going to face swap  but couldn't decide..."
"The Dolomites in Italy"
"When my SO tries to cut me off at the bar..."
"All day today."
"Am I doing it right?"
"mmm... delicious?"
"Forever alone level: pillow"
"How did the hipster burn his tongue?"
"Jeremey Clarkson driving an 18-wheeler."
"So happy  Oh so happy"
"Looking up Fallout pictures out of boredom when I stumbled on this"
"calvin gets it right"
"Why I don't ski"
"How I feel every time I drive past the police."
"Carl Winslow is amazed"
"Riding"
"Riding"
"for the love of God..."
"UFO kitteh"
"Gotta...[xpost for r/funny]"
"My reaction to stubbing my toe."
"I raise you the most Australian picture ever."
"So i Googled &quot;the most Australian picture ever&quot;"
"When my american friends told me that all british shows are boring."
"San Francisco in ruins  1906."
"This is how I do"
"boba fett with a message for you"
"Bacon and Skyrim?"
"This freaks me out everytime - Cellphone in Microwave"
"The real reason why Nokia phones are so strong."
"Demons live inside your cell phone."
"My masterpiece"
"The best in the series in my opinion."
"When r/aww and r/ladyboners get together..."
"This shit sucks. I fought with my ex wife about this shit. She didn't get it. (keywords: Ex.)"
"What song should they fight to?"
"I am the league of shadows !"
"The 2012 Olympic Mascots [Fixed]"
"Getting laid for the first time (sfw)"
"Imagine a world..."
"Probably..."
"His diaper is full."
"How I feel after upvoting a new post"
"Karma Chameleon"
"OMG This is so gooOOOAAAH! [Gif]"
"Almost there....FUCK"
"You know you're unemployed when this looks attractive"
"You know you're broke when this gives you a boner"
"Googled &quot;Dafuq did I just see&quot;  was not disappointed."
"licenseplate created this image."
"Cool stump bro"
"Drugs Are Bad"
"Too lazy to check if this is a re-post  sorry if it is. HEADSHOT"
"possible re-post? too lazy to check. QualityEnforcer link HD... HEADSHOT"
"DAE miss this guy?"
"Bill Nye knows what's up"
"My science teacher every time he tries to make something interesting."
"Nightmarish Version of Shy Guy"
"This guy is enjoying his day off from the Hurricane."
"How I feel about those &quot;Cake Day&quot; posts"
"Cake days summarized"
"What you deserve if you ever use the phrase &quot;IRL Cake Day&quot;"
"How I feel after all my unsuccessful cake day posts"
"(╯°□°）╯︵ ┻━┻"
"Nap time"
"I just about died when I saw this critter. The Golden Snub-nosed Monkey!"
"Any one know where this comes from  or what is going on here?"
"Clearly"
"LIKE A BOSS. FUCK YOUR MOUSE TRAP"
"The ultimate example of &quot;what the hell did you expect to happen?!&quot;"
"Oh yes  these are the droids you were looking for."
"Evil or not evil?"
"Heston Blumenthal's head does not stack well. (xpost from r/unitedkingdom)"
"Stand clear  this one doesn't look like a normal delivery..."
"Best pumpkin carving ever! (Not sure if repost)"
"Not your everyday NYC sight"
"I have a lot of friends in Europe and Australia who come visit me in Vegas. After last night this is how we reacted when seeing each other..."
"Take me there.."
"Who would live in a house like this?"
"Hunter S. Thompson  John Cusack and Johnny Depp riding around with a blow-up doll"
"Hey there little guy!"
"Cow on steroids."
"Anytime someone comments on a post of mine"
"Whenever I'm browsing r/trees  high or not"
"The bible says..."
"Because of its large size  the C-5 Galaxy must eat twice its bodyweight in smaller aircraft per week to maintain its active lifestyle."
"CD Mosaic"
"Just a random imgur shart [NSFW]"
"Expectations v. Reality of posting of reddit"
"I did this so much in San Andreas (X-post /r/Pics)"
"During the elections  this is all I can think about."
"I live in Australia. This has confirmed my feelings that I live in the wrong country - these photos were taken over 5 hours."
"Daylight Savings Time -&gt; One extra hour of guilt-free browsing on reddit!"
"Iridescence"
"wtf"
"Too much sour candy."
"Oh my god. It’s the quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. Now that I have seen this  I can die happy."
"A virus maybe?"
"Ummm... who the fuck took this picture?"
"Imagine trying to explain this without the evidence"
"Zeus: the tallest dog in the world."
"Get a few on... Then try to get more in and noooo... I blew the others off!!! Oh memories!!"
"Decided to google 'apple'  Was not disappointed"
"Found out i missed my cake day  but i am now part of the one year club!"
"This is a deaf boy hearing for the first time with the help of an earpiece."
"They're screwed"
"The most unpleasant image you will see all day."
"The one quote I use to explain my agnostic / atheist beliefs..."
"My response to what if I'm wrong."
"Aiiiiieeeee"
"Oh no!"
"It sold for HOW MUCH?"
"What is this I don't even"
"Meanwhile  in Saudi Arabia..."
"Last Minute Halloween Costume: Scantily Clad Ghosts"
"At least she doesn't have Alzheimer's"
"Batman dancing skillz."
"Got all your girlfriends thinking that I'm The Batman"
"My mom sent me a picture of my brother's adorable kids. But this was all I could see..."
"Does your cat make too much noise?"
"Scenic destruction"
"Must be Asian"
"Maybe the best tattoo I've ever seen..."
"Everytime I get my moustache done."
"Me at the end of Movember"
"Every time I bring up politics/religion when drinking with friends."
"going to your ex girlfriends facebook"
"Me right after I ate a whole large pizza for dinner last night."
"I haven't had McDonalds in a while and I decided to give it another try"
"I deleted my Reddit account with over 5 000 karma as my New Years Resolution..."
"Rosie Fucking Jones"
"Smiley seal!"
"So my friend's dog had some fun in the water sprinklers today"
"These two didn't know any better"
"ready  annnnnnnd go!"
"WAKE UP!"
"hug?"
"Every &quot;When You See It&quot; Post"
"Quite."
"MFW I'm trying to convince a girl to come home with me"
"OURS IS FURY!"
"The shield that guards the relm of men"
"How I feel as a conservative after the health care ruling today."
"We run this s**t"
"Oh i love this scene"
"My wife's reaction when we are about to get intimate and my 10 month old son wakes up (SFW)"
"Photoshop it makes a difference"
"y u do this thing"
"And Shepherds We Shall Be..."
"After submitting a post on reddit"
"Gangster Giraffe"
"My response when my mom asked if I was going to church tomorrow"
"Tunnel of pug"
"This guy is cooler than I thought!"
"Once you go black..."
"Whenever I get an upvote."
"Cool outdoor gym"
"Something about Paul Ryan seems...familiar...[x-post from /r/scifi]"
"This moose scares me"
"The only reason I turn off AdBlock"
"Upskirt pussy."
"So that's where their feet go"
"Ever wondered what they looked like from underneath? [pic] [sfw]"
"the frogman challenge gif"
"Because it's America  that's why!"
"Three. Fucks. Given."
"Milky Way Over Quiver Tree Forest"
"Alabama is now Iran"
"The US economy is massive. So massive that the GDP of each of its 50 states compares is the same size of an entire other nation. California equals France. Indiana is Australia. Check out Russia!"
"I was going through all my pictures and I have no idea why I have this."
"Ever wonder what a popcorn kernel looks like when it pops?"
"whaa?"
"Couldn't really think of a title"
"Meanwhile in the IT department"
"Lana Del Gay.."
"I know what's on my cars mind ;)"
"What I'll do when the zombie apocalypse begins"
"Some heroes have four paws."
"Captian Kirk and Spock on Life in the universe"
"Gift from nature"
"Only in Japan..."
"My birthday was yesterday. Woke up to find out my reddit birthday is today. I love birthdays"
"Thanks for not aborting me"
"Mr. President! Kiss my baby!"
"Searching for images of Adalia Rose and found this"
"The hills are alive with the sound of music."
"Fred Rogers?"
"How I feel about &quot;As an American&quot; and &quot;As an Englishmen&quot; posts"
"When my friends tell me how they made the front page... again."
"How I feel after planning my class schedule around a class whose Professor is 'TBA'"
"President Obama after submitting his AMA"
"Whenever these little kids complain about how hard life is..."
"Strong Wifi in Boston"
"Was at the dark knight movie marathon last night  all i had was an ipod so in between movies I decided to see if anyone had any hotspots on their phone  this is what I found"
"I made a connection today!"
"So my dad got a label maker for Christmas..."
"My response to the boss asking me to work late"
"Simple Texas Rules"
"Assassin's Creed cosplay"
"No more kittys? Well heres a baby owl that stares into your soul."
"When I get home from work and browse Gone Wild."
"It's my b-day  not my reddit one  my real one. 31"
"Probably xpost  but come on. Think of all the people who haven't seen it. I can't get enough of it."
"The Art of Seduction"
"When I found out my girlfriend is a Redditor..."
"So... Just take on every day then?"
"Fierce eyes"
"The only message I get from the idea of grown men watching 'My Little Pony'."
"just slow life down [gif]"
"What my facebook looks like regarding the election."
"Here are some gems from from the worst tattoo artist ever. Synyster Ink"
"Repost  but an old favorite."
"Dude? DUDE!!"
"Soccer is gay"
"How to deal with awkward situations"
"Which way did they go?"
"Totally True: EA and IGN"
"Found this at Blockbuster (FIXED AGAIN)"
"How Reddit has been lately due to Finals"
"Before I discovered the Internet. (Fixed)"
"Trolled by Ben Franklin"
"The Difference Between /r/Gaming and the Other Gaming Subreddits."
"haw streakingsquirrel got karma"
"Hungry puppy forgets how to gravity."
"Anti-gravity dog (x-post from /r/aww)"
"A Big Boner"
"How I feel any time a friend makes a World of Warcraft reference"
"Good thing I go to Supercuts."
"How I feel whenever I post on Reddit"
"WTF"
"Siri showing me the locals escort services in Little Italy  Chicago"
"Exam Time"
"Why wont it close?!"
"Downvote Cat"
"death by snu-snu"
"Euclid on the block."
"My name is Billy Evans. I am a very sick little boy."
"Well  shit."
"Why yes  actually"
"...and then Custer said  they are only Indians."
"Possibly a repost. Still funny as hell."
"Just when I think one of my posts is headed to the front page..."
"I can't flirt... Seriously  I'm not a observant man..."
"If you remember this as shareware. You are old."
"I've got two of reddit's favorite things"
"Which way to the front page? All of my submissions...."
"I'm a bit of an artist  would you like me to sketch you?"
"According to the ultrasound..."
"No Big Deal  Just Star Wars Unicorns"
"You know you're a badass if you do this"
"Nature  you cray"
"I must go..."
"disturbing catman"
"Waking up to a post I made last night now on the front page"
"Hello from the pale blue dot."
"Reddit  for the first time in two years I am caught up on my bills and don't have to continue borrowing money from my parents."
"Easter Island just became 1 million percent more impressive."
"TIL that the famous Easter Island heads aren't just heads after all."
"So my friend is at a wedding  and sent me the seating chart..."
"Meet Steve Huffman and Alexis Ohanian. The creators of Reddit! Most of you owe these men your life."
"Now I'm pissed !"
"Not really sure where to put this"
"Darth Vader condoms"
"Saw this on Facebook... wut"
"Judas stop"
"Hipsters."
"Just got back from a mining haul. I love silk-touch"
"They're doing it right."
"Fireworks and Thunderstorms"
"The Bathroom Terminator"
"FIFA vs PES"
"My friends dog asleep on the couch."
"Baby Stingray"
"Hardcore Gamer"
"(F)ound what Reddit likes SFW"
"Ehh  glory hole..?"
"So...A Friend Of Mine Showed Me This....."
"well  thats enough internet for the day"
"i... i dont even...what ???"
"Ohaahhhhh"
"WTF  as in WHO THE FUCK would pay her to act...."
"The hardest concept known to man."
"Our sky"
"I sense fakey shenanigans  but it still made me laugh"
"Shooting Leo the Lion for the MGM Logo"
"Hairless Animals (NSFW for monkey junk)"
"Taco emergency"
"dis is how i luk lyke its not edited i swear"
"Olympic weightlifting injury"
"Ach  mein arsch"
"Dark Knight Rises 3D art"
"3d street art"
"Welcome to the Internet"
"Tax Dollars Hard at Work- Have a Look"
"Whenever I see we're out of beer and all the stores are closed"
"Challenge Accepted."
"Whenever I log into online banking..."
"Some kids are just awesome without trying"
"Swansoble"
"100% people exposed to water die  some day ! funny water facts"
"water  the next marijuanna"
"Woah my bad bro...wrong knee!"
"Japanese fashion."
"Oh  Japan..."
"Excuse me... (x-post from r/aww)"
"Excuse me... Can you pet me  please?"
"Cat wants to be petted"
"Just chillin'"
"Touchdown?"
"Bears in Flin Flon  Manitoba take their R&amp;R time very seriously!"
"weddings"
"What my Feb 14th will look like...[FIXED]"
"After coming home from a long Vacation"
"How I picture the admins when it says &quot;reddit is under heavy load right now  sorry.&quot;"
"I had an intestinal flu last week. Now my friends won't stop sending me things like this..."
"Old beetle car sink into the floor"
"My next what?"
"StarTrek Proposal [Update]  Patrick Stewart very happy for couple"
"Someone gets excited on car rides..."
"After watching &quot;Food  Inc &quot; this is how I feel about fast food...and most of what's in my fridge."
"Giving candy to kids"
"Instant karma"
"Shithead! gif"
"What it feels like when Reddit downvotes my post into oblivion"
"It looks like this lady had a crappy day."
"a sneak peak of the new MySpace layout"
"Hah  this guy."
"Introducing Lonely Pikachu Guy"
"How to keep an idiot busy........"
"The amazing Neil Peart!"
"Krsh. Housten we have a problem. Breaker breaker."
"2 hours from Whitehorse  Yukon  Canada [1459x1094]"
"FPS Logic"
"Behind the scenes of CS"
"Suddenly  supah ref!"
"USA team getting beat by France [Fixed]"
"After reading the Victoria Rae Black AMA..."
"the Hindenburg in flames"
"Two lesbians by a door"
"I don't think he understands how trampolines work."
"When a freshman turns in his first paper and thinks it's awesome....then gets a C"
"It's Always the Fat One..."
"It's Always the Fat One"
"Ugly girl asked ME out  and I think this gif perfectly depicts her attempts"
"Every time I think one of my posts will make it to the front page."
"Photo taken by photographer  Jessica Trinh. I think it belongs here though."
"If I wrote a book..."
"Me  trying to get to the front page."
"Got a message from someone bitching about one of my comments..."
"seems legit..."
"slowed him down hahaha"
"It's a known fact!"
"Tell me a limerick  Siri."
"Best answer Siri has given to me!"
"Finally  Siri delivers!"
"Siri knows whats up..."
"Donut+Nutella"
"Can someone tell me where this is from?"
"Oh children...."
"It's Dinner Time!"
"Oh children..."
"What time is it?"
"it's.....DINNNNNNNERTIME"
"WTF"
"How I feel when.........damn it  I cant think of any way this can be relatable."
"Dinner bell"
"'Portrait of the Prophet Mohammed'  by Cecilia Gimenez  2012"
"Just a cup le kittens."
"When I remember to check-in exactly 24 hours before my flight"
"fits for 9 hours"
"Robotic mosquito with camera  microphone and probe able to gather your DNA (or inject poison). A photoshop  I hope."
"/r/AWW  condensed version. (x/post from /r/aww)"
"So gay it gave me aids"
"Trying so hard..."
"Screw this  I'm outa here..."
"TIMBER"
"Cuddle Buddies"
"Though you guys would like this"
"i feel like i can smell it through the screen"
"Keepin' Clean [gif]"
"Wu Tang Flan"
"This is how I imagine most helpdesks"
"how I imagine dubstep is &quot;created&quot;"
"Turning off your cellphone when it goes off in class"
"What I did to my gameboy after I threw the pokeball. (xpost-gifs)"
"What I do every time I go browsing the mane sub [gif]"
"Upvote Everything: How I feel reading the Terry Crews AMA"
"Dreaming Big"
"If you can dream it...you can do it"
"Wish my girlfriend would do this to me"
"Halloween costume"
"(X-Post from /r/wtf.) This is Germany's view of America prior to WW2. It's always neat to see the propaganda used by states."
"This is just terrible [FIXED]"
"oh god...i'm alice"
"Tracy Caldwell Dyson in the ISS Cupola"
"when a family member calls minutes after starting to watch a porno"
"Mitt Romney with baboon ass on face."
"Creep-a-chu"
"Creep-a-chu [X-post from /r/funny]"
"Another reason I hate clowns!"
"meanwhile in romania..."
"Norfolk Rave"
"As I Near the End of Finals Week..."
"What's that? Snookie's having a baby?"
"I never leave my house without it."
"Yea I can see the resemblance .."
"My all time favorite gif."
"My favorite gif of all time"
"So my friend rode a roller coaster for the first time when I asked them how it felt they sent me a link to this"
"Sundays  with not having to work Mondays."
"Here comes SANTA!"
"Objective: Beastmode. Status: Accomplished."
"Adorable babby husky is adorable"
"The Portobello Estate - Corona del Mar  California [1650x1100]"
"Told my grandma reddit loves cat pictures  I have created a monster"
"Cricket player Andrew Strauss accidentally destroys his own sunglasses."
"I took this picture last night using my telescope and cellphone."
"My reaction to 90% of rage comics"
"Irish Isolation"
"Protester in Ireland shooting milk from a cows utter at the police. [x-post from r/photoshopbattles]"
"Serious Relationship"
"Probably my new favorite gif."
"Viva La Resolution"
"Starry Night"
"Oh  you think that was bad?"
"13-year-old and the internet.... awww yeahhh!"
"Fire in the ho-oooly shit!"
"Getting a text that fucks up your plans for the night"
"Lets see how easy it is to get to the front page of reddit"
"Im sad now"
"Worst feeling in the world"
"How Gizmo was formed"
"best elephant gif EVER."
"Fuck gravity"
"I don't even know wether funny or wtf"
"This guy likes to fill up old granny's."
"Huh... I would have chosen a different uniform for class picture day  but I think they are pulling these off."
"My local hardware store knows what's up"
"My favorite pic on the Internet"
"In case you were wondering"
"23 is pretty old. [x-post from /r/StandUpShots]"
"When I couldn't comment on the Obama AMA because the page was read only"
"my girlfriend's reaction when I suggested anal."
"How I react when someone asks if I fap..."
"A friend asked me to try Slender..."
"This horse looks too perfect to be real. Does anyone know what kind it is? Googling &quot;perfect horse&quot; didn't help..."
"4... I count 4 boobs [NSFW]"
"Fifa 13 is so realistic!"
"My favorite stereogram"
"- Carl Sagan"
"It's impossible to not love this man."
"Headshot your majesty"
"Reddit to SupermanV2 right now"
"How i feel upvoting a bad cakeday post"
"How I imagine you guys when you upvote my shitty cakeday post"
"Repost because WTF moment and relevant username. Look at risk."
"Walked into my mom's room and noticed this as her desktop background. Respect gained: ∞"
"How I feel as someone named Allan today on r/gaming."
"What have you done  Batman?"
"Scumbag Christian"
"Why youmad bro?"
"This guy has some sort of Matrix shit going on right here"
"God help us if he ordered number 3."
"Click here"
"pizza pizza pie"
"This is what happens when you let Jesus take the wheel."
"GIF of a car that skids on an icy road  takes out one van  then gets smashed to pieces by a big truck"
"They said I can be anything. So I became my own best friend"
"Dog-Man"
"Narcolepsy [gif]"
"Fake Plastic Rangers Fan"
"I still laugh myself to sleep whenever I read this"
"Who knew Downey was THAT fresh"
"Basically how the conversations are going on the field."
"Not giving a fuck level 1000"
"I'm a snake!"
"How I reacted when I found out my little cousin has better items than me on Team Fortress 2"
"This is how I fix my things"
"CapitalOne rejected my card design. Any suggestions on a company that plays more fast &amp; loose with card designs?"
"XPost from r/gifs"
"I am allowed to be afraid of this  right?"
"Hey guys! I'm making dessert!"
"I am.....the Batman!"
"Skeletor!"
"Went on R/spacedicks for the first time..."
"My reaction when I found a mouse in my sink at work."
"NOPE"
"Owls are beautiful and majestic creatures...OH GOD!"
"Oh mighty sky! Grant me the power to eliminate those who oppose me"
"Cookie"
"It's the truth no matter what you say"
"That's how it happened"
"o_o [NSFW]"
"The Gotham Kiwi"
"A cat is stiff when a lobster clip is involved"
"Beautiful multiple exposure shot of a Lighthouse."
"How their battles actually took place."
"Couldn't help myself."
"seal photo bomb"
"In celebration of 1 000 comment Karma  I give you an oil painting of Jeff Goldblum in a field."
"after having lost 100+ karma in one go..."
"This gif always makes me smile"
"Me after I watch the Olympic Divers and go to swim"
"The first was a hoot  the second a little frightening  third ain't no thing and the fourth  I had gum on my shoe- could you believe it?"
"Hitler- a proud woman of color"
"The beginning of something wonderful..."
"Reddit Chimney"
"Minecraft cat fountain"
"Today i passed a place called Snape Hill  saw a sign for a bongo show that had lost it's second 'O' and a tantruming child hit in the head with someones shoe thrown from a nearby ride  i was too busy enjoying them to take pictures  here is a photo of Gary Coleman and The Hoff instead."
"Chinese Currency"
"My sexface (SFW)"
"Don't we all.."
"Synchronized backflip"
"Pillow Fight. [FB]"
"I think my friends list needs some work done..."
"Squirtle on blast! Hater's Gonna Hate!"
"Its a MIRACLE! Take that.... Jesus toast."
"Bert"
"A party of astronomical proportions"
"We're gunna have the best party in the universe!"
"Scarlett Johansson's new tattoo"
"Bird trying its best to have arms. (xpost R/pics)"
"How to piss off reddit [fixed] [fixed]"
"Oh my glass!"
"Bad days... everyone has them."
"how retirement works...."
"Well said Spongebob"
"Just Terry Crews..."
"Terry Crews"
"just Terry Crews"
"someone is obviously on steroids"
"Meanwhile  in Malaysia. . ."
"Spiderman saved the day"
"So I pulled up behind this guy today..."
"Just a little perspective"
"Go for it  I dare you."
"Popeye"
"Amazing eyes."
"My favorite Snooki moment"
"TIL...the reason why Jersey Shore got popular in the first place...its Snooki's face. Seriously...I had no idea! (re-post)"
"Jersey Shore at its Finest"
"This will always be my favorite Jersey Shore gif [fixed]"
"This will always be my favorite Jersey Shore gif [fixed]"
"Strobe Cat [gif]"
"Going on reddit and noticing my karma doubled over night"
"Lolcats circa 1905"
"The face says it all."
"Meet &quot;Why don't we have both?&quot;-girl's brother"
"Poor kitty."
"Just let it soak in..."
"DIY"
"It's been 17 years today  R.I.P you magnificent painter."
"Children are our future  it is our job to help mold them into outstanding citizens."
"Found this and thought i would share..."
"The evolution of video game controllers."
"Thug life."
"America now that Santorum dropped out."
"Finally Phelps earned his first gold medal for 2012"
"Cover of the new 'Entertainment Weekly'. Awesome."
"How I felt after the election..."
"Bear face in wood"
"Photographer cat is suddenly hungry."
"Don't even try and tell me this isn't awesome"
"I'm pretty sure English isn't this comic artists first language  but the message is universal."
"Thou shalt not smile"
"Dumbledore doesn't give a fuck"
"Me and my friend  seven years ago..."
"Well  this is thoroughly horrifying. Mercury (II) thiocyanate."
"How it feels being the designated driver"
"A pair of great tits"
"Harry Potter vs Lord of the Rings"
"Notorious B.I.G. likes stringed instruments."
"I was paranoid about this for a brief couple of days"
"Keanu on religion"
"How would I know?"
"That's why the mascot is an alien  man"
"Conspiracy Keanu on child birth"
"God particle conspiracy..."
"You're doing it wrong."
"Keanu read the Miami Herald this morning"
"...Bitches!"
"Best comic."
"Do you really think he's high?"
"Can not stop laughing at this"
"Boxman"
"Being more than halfway to the weekend"
"One of my favourites"
"The Trustworthiness of Bears"
"he's back and forth from the Burt Reynolds and the Landing Strip"
"Trustworthiness of beards"
"Looking at yourself in the mirror at a [5] or higher"
"Now that's a problem.."
"Dude from Twilight"
"Dance like no one is watching"
"God dammit  WHAT?"
"How I look when I'm on Reddit until the boss comes by for a look."
"NFL Week One GIFs Album [rehost]"
"Reddit Lately"
"Korl  Lori Is Die. No."
"Screw you guys with your Half-Life 3  THIS is the game I'm really looking forward to"
"Soul sucking gif."
"Who needs a utility knife when you have these!"
"I learn so much from Reddit..."
"comments on YouTube"
"I think we can all relate"
"When a morbidly obese person gets out of car in handicap spot"
"When one of my classmates claimed Internet Explorer 9 is better than Google Chrome."
"Thug beet."
"The dangers of break dancing with cats."
"I made an Obama poster and wanted to share it with you reddit"
"Fixed for 2012"
"Carl Sagan trolls people who claim to have been abducted by aliens"
"Lion bro"
"Possibly the greatest gif of all time"
"blah"
"Sometimes I Just Feel Ugly..."
"A man and his lion"
"You're flawless and i love you."
"high goat"
"4000 years of medicine."
"Dinner time during Ramadan."
"The genius of reddit"
"He had this coming."
"Rule 34... we meet again [NSFW]"
"A man with his dog after the tornado in Alabama"
"Found his dog in the rubble after a tornado destroyed their home"
"A man with his dog after the tornado in Alabama"
"WEE LIL WINKY"
"Hillary bumpin' and grindin'"
"ONE CAT. ONE DREAM. ONE DESTINY."
"terrorist prank"
"Ummmm...."
"THE BEST RAGE COMIC EVER"
"God Does The Washing"
"Another case of bad parenting"
"Performing for the family at Christmas (NSFW)"
"A Tip From The Mayor of London"
"good guy London underground jibes Apple ios6"
"Transport for London giving out helpful information to Apple users."
"On the London underground..."
"For the benefit of passengers using Apple iOS 6..."
"You know it's serious when London Underground staff write it on the information boards!"
"how to stop a thief"
"Fuck you  man  fuck you."
"I'm actually jealous of you [x post from /r/30rock]"
"Dachshund owners will know"
"Going away to college soon? Don't forget a package of these."
"How I feel about Sandy living in the midwest."
"Socially Awkward Penguin"
"the politics of an IM chat...who isn't guilty of this?"
"What it's like browsing /r/new"
"Whenever I'm talking to my mom on the phone."
"Not much to see here  just a baby sloth hugging his favorite stuffed animal"
"daylight savings and shit..."
"When I accidentally leave my dog and my steak burrito alone in the same room"
"Hi  I'm Jesus Christ"
"x-post"
"Shit just got real"
"Do not interrupt while I'm eating."
"The Perfect Family"
"Why wait? Have a fag!"
"So your logic is I could get hit by a bus tomorrow so I should smoke today? Hmm seems legit."
"Seems legit.."
"Friends"
"When I told him he was an inbred..."
"cats dont like toast"
"Cat toast anyone?"
"Bread head"
"Fuckin' Canada..."
"Whenever I see negative numbers beside a redditors name because I've down-voted them in the past."
"Olympic Derp Faces"
"Olympic Divers in Mid Form"
"Athletes from the Diving"
"Athletes from Diving"
"Athletes from Diving"
"Reflection Is Everything"
"When my roommate told me he didn't like The Dark Knight Rises because it was too violent"
"I've never lawl'd more in my life."
"I wish I had these in my Star Wars collection"
"Still can't believe they made these.."
"Notices single girls at the bar"
"Every fucking time"
"White people."
"This has happened at least once in your life (.gif)"
"I hate when this happens..."
"While other are going out tonight  I will be spending my Halloween at home playing this for the very first time"
"How I feel after a long day of work."
"When you thought it's safe to go back in the air..."
"When you thought it's safe to go back in the air..."
"He I just met you  and this is crazy. But when you see it  shit brix maybe?"
"Unicorn  Obama  and a pancake."
"Laser + Cat ="
"Breaking Bad"
"Squirrels got nothing on this lobster  1 in 50 million."
"Hi there!"
"How I feel about the younger redditor's posts recently."
"A man  stuck on a plane and forced to see his future. In a place called... the Twilight Zone."
"Anytime the teacher calls on you in college and you get the answer right"
"I'ma boop your head!"
"Sean Connery in Zardoz"
"Sean Connery Gives Zero Fucks"
"Makes sense"
"Umm......holy shit. [Possibly NSFW]"
"Umm... what's this? It haunts my dreams"
"How I feel about non-imgur picture links"
"Every weekends plans"
"Clever advertisement for Belgium's Organ Donor Foundation"
"yawn."
"Snakes will chase you."
"I don't wan it"
"Guy Love"
"This is TOO good. Oh  Peter."
"Congratulations! It's a girl!"
"How I feel realizing my cakeday is on 9/11."
"My cakeday in one GIF"
"crazy shaolin monk says HIT ME"
"then explain reddit?"
"Breakdown of Social Media"
"Hulk"
"Slow and steady wins the fight. [ex-post from r/funny]"
"This is why you don't feed your dog bubble gum."
"No idea what you're talking about"
"I sure hope she works here."
"the things you see nowadays..."
"The &quot;I FAIL&quot; tower."
"Hungry Hungry...."
"Reddit  for my cakeday  this is what I got for you"
"Oh yeah? This is what MY town is famous for!"
"When you sell your PS2"
"What I look like when I've seen everyone post their arbitrary day gifts and I won't be getting re-matched."
"It's blue. No pink. No blue. No pink. No blue. No..."
"This party sucks  I'm out of here."
"Every night for the past 6 years Capitan has slept over his owner's grave. Miguel Guzman died in 2006."
"A dog sleeps on his owners gravestone  this is true love."
"Damn"
"Kitten Kisses"
"QWOP"
"Just a dog and a bubble..."
"The Glory Portal"
"now that's using your head"
"Tape"
"On second thought  i think I'll have pizza tonite"
"How many of you recognize this game?"
"Did anyone else love the heck out of this game?"
"There is something missing here"
"After seeing all these passive/aggressive parking job cards..."
"Whenever i can't sleep"
"$5 Bill Murray"
"If its healthy......."
"Don Vito."
"Coke is one hell of a drug [FIXED]"
"Because he's the hero Mexico deserves  but not the one it needs right now. So we'll hunt him  because he can take it. Because he's not the hero. He's a silent guardian  watchful protector. A luchador"
"Meanwhile in Mexico City..."
"For a better start in life..."
"Up  up and away!"
"How I feel when my crush gchats: “BRB”"
"Every time I see a bee..."
"Remember these guys"
"When you gotta go  you gotta go."
"Past &amp; Present"
"New Words"
"god fucking dammit"
"In case you happened to want a Christopher Walken cut out mask..!"
"Just hanging out."
"Monster truck."
"Tron Vader"
"Darth User [x-post from r/popcult]"
"Seems legit."
"This is why I don't go outside."
"5 pm Friday.."
"Penderecki + OAG"
"Evil atheist they disgust me."
"The Sun laughed when scientists said the world wide web would change billions of lives in 1991"
"A bit old  but this still my favorite gif of all time."
"What..."
"Looks like a good read!"
"When I see that a girl I hated in high school put on the freshman 15."
"HIFW the handicapped stall at work is available."
"My boyfriend when the period comes"
"One GIANT upvote for the beauty of Crater Lake"
"Upvote Island"
"This guy is the man"
"The gif sound version of &quot;Syntax Error&quot;...Does not compute."
"Wow  you slut"
"Just filed my taxes. This is how my wife and I looked when we found out how much our Federal return was going to be."
"The world is an amazing place."
"How do you breathe through that little thing?"
"Oh  Tumblr..."
"I have no idea what I'm doing"
"So I just finished my first day interning as an Architect..."
"Ninjas  they start at an early age."
"Scumbag kid"
"Space shark"
"And the award for boner-killer tattoo goes to..."
"Because physics."
"Pedifiles day out"
"For my cakeday here's my favorite gif"
"My favourite face swap"
"America - We'll kill you in your sleep on Christmas"
"How I react when I see a single HOT girl in a bar."
"Girl Running Through Flowers"
"Mama Mia! My local Publix is doin' it right"
"A Squirrel with it's head stuck inside a Halloween mask."
"Meanwhile in Japan"
"Cat Wayne"
"Hamoat... Boammock... I don't know  but this thing is a boat and a hammock."
"I'm crying  this little guy is so cute."
"9-11: Seldom seen shot taken just before the South Tower impact."
"How r/Trees feels about reposts"
"Ronald McDonald baby"
"Man has a terrible but beautiful power"
"thats a lot of brains"
"Fuck yeah!"
"Name them in order"
"FIGHT!"
"At least he's not pretending to hold it up."
"Stay classy  tourists."
"Useful for driving at night  even for non-ent's."
"Monkey faced pig"
"The blobfish and seaping are WTF for sure. How about a monkey-faced pig..."
"Generic names for soft drinks in the U.S."
"What people call (soda/pop/coke) by U.S. county. Simultaneously the most useless and most interesting graph EVER."
"Soda  Pop  or Coke Map: What the hell is going on in Alaska?"
"Names for soft drinks in the U.S."
"Naptime"
"Now  that's not very nice."
"How it feels when someone you know makes it to the front page of Reddit"
"Christianity in a nutshell."
"We need more of this"
"This kid was the fucking bomb when you were younger!"
"My face when I turn on a soccer game and Ray Hudson is the commentator"
"Don't crash your hard drive..!!!"
"Not sure if repost  but made me chuckle."
"Spiderman  I am"
"Denied!"
"forever alone bike girlfriend"
"And boom goes the dynamite!"
"The INcredible hulk"
"It is still Caturday right?"
"Get the London look [FIXED]"
"Strange cat getaway"
"I knew today was going to be special. Just discovered r/Gonewild"
"I knew today was going to be special. Just discovered r/Gonewild"
"A frog ate mah kitteh"
"Typed &quot;cute&quot; into Google images. Was not disappointed."
"I think this wins reddit"
"Kermit the kitten"
"Easter cockatoo getting ready."
"Come at me bro!"
"Kitty high five"
"Too soon?"
"yep  it's hedgehog"
"How I feel talking to fundies"
"3 tiny hedgehog"
"Please Let This Be A King Kong Reboot"
"baby elephant having the time of his life under a waterfall (sorry if this breaks the internet)"
"Baby elephant living it up under a waterfall"
"*SPOILER* All I could think of during TDKR"
"Best Breaking Bad Transition"
"Enough of this peasantry."
"Whenever I try finding the seal on the processed cheese wrapper."
"Winception."
"How I feel working in IT when someone tells me something isn't working"
"Fuck the world  I am a panda."
"Abstinence  not 100% effective"
"My first cat (circa 1993)"
"White people"
"How I feel after my link gets 5 up votes and then 10 down votes..."
"I need to try this."
"Sexy kitteh"
"Oh  hi."
"That is one ripped pussy."
"Go on..."
"Oh karma... I'm waiting..."
"Happy thing is happy"
"Duuuuude"
"Snow Tunnel in Russia"
"David blane uses the force"
"Just a puppy riding a car... as usual."
"My GF owns a cat and a dog. How I feel after she tells me she has more Karma than me after her first day on Reddit..."
"When my teacher lectures too fast."
"Unclear on the concept..."
"Everyone deserves to be treated equally!"
"Being racist while promoting anti-racism"
"First argumentation on a CS private-server..."
"Watermelon Lion"
"The tiniest kitty with the biggest eyes"
"American Chopper (x-post r/vertical)"
"Beach after closing time"
"Reposts: why you shouldn't hate them."
"Hostess brands is shutting down as of today..."
"Was browsing the internet when suddenly..."
"Wait for it..."
"When I go to a swimming pool after watching pro swimmers"
"Soon..."
"Progress."
"The reason I stopped playing D3 - [Spoiler] You never catch the dragon"
"It taste like chicken"
"Haters gonna hate  hamsters gonna potate"
"Season's Greetings"
"Christmas morning as a kid."
"HEADSHOT...DOUBLE KILL"
"He'll figure it out eventually"
"Light from within"
"Excellent advice"
"Some sizzle for your young Derp!"
"Not for everyone..."
"A tank of milk being dipped by cute Nazi girl's feet."
"Nazi and milk"
"Here  have some milk."
"Best picture on the internet!"
"Surfin' dog"
"My favorite picture. Not OP"
"Polka?"
"Not sure how to properly execute a sucker punch? Presenting Tips-N-Tricks!"
"Oh YouTube"
"Lag"
"My free time in elementary school (Fixed)"
"My response to the direction that r/WTF is going in."
"You are being monitored"
"Will Smith shows you how it's done"
"&quot;best. Gif. Ever.&quot;"
"Mom  please!"
"DAWWW Nightmare"
"The best (and probably the most literal) example of wing-man"
"Please don't bathe me..."
"I almost dropped my weight in the gym when these two came in this afternoon..."
"Proof that cats use tools."
"Animal cascade"
"It never ends..."
"A Grandmother and her Cat"
"Alien &amp; Predator living together"
"How I feel playing in my new softball league..."
"When I come across some cake when on a diet"
"How I picture people who forget to submit things for their cakeday until late at night"
"Russians"
"The A and B squares are the same color"
"250 million youtube views each  brings you this."
"At an [8]  something as simple as this can really put things in perspective"
"Still my favourite fail gif."
"When I get my first upvote on a post"
"My reaction to Jerry Sandusky verdict"
"Really Bill? I'm pretty much a scientist on that shit myself"
"KKK toddler and a black state trooper"
"I dont even... wtf?"
"I gagged.. [NSFW]"
"This is how I feel now that I have joined the 1 yr club! Thank you Reddit for always being there!"
"Puppy trap works perfectly."
"It's adventure time  I tell you hwhat."
"Starting a 4Gb torrent with 2 seeders..."
"After Scrolling Through 2 Pages Of The &quot;New&quot; Section"
"Galaxy F***ing Note"
"So this kitty likes to pretend he is a pokemon"
"Teenage Mutant Ninja Squirtles"
"The most North Korean pic ever."
"rollin' they see me"
"Cool!"
"This has got to be SOMEBODY'S Chinchilla. Somebody come get this Chinchilla."
"I stole this and putting it on r/funny"
"Oldie but goodie"
"An atheists perfect picnic"
"Now..."
"Bought a new laptop  I know what the first thing I'm uninstalling is..."
"This came across my Facebook feed today and really ticked me off."
"Hey there  little buddy..."
"Cannonbal- oof!"
"Vote!"
"Practice makes perfect!"
"Someone please make/edit this to say 'Haters..Gonna..Potatoes'' [PostedYday] dont want karma just want this gif so bad"
"I kissed an Australian girl on NYE last night..."
"None of that will bring daddy back."
"ZING!"
"So I was in guynamedjuly's shower looked up and said FUCK. THAT."
"The mariachi version"
"this is why you are fat"
"Just leave me be."
"What Are you kidding me!"
"This is how dumb and generic you look."
"All Ready for Autumn"
"What do you guys think?"
"Baby Red Panda"
"Someone mentioned &quot;Spider Porn&quot; in the &quot;Fly Fucker&quot; thread  so I took the liberty of googling it to see for myself. [NSFW]"
"Nightmare fuel spider porn"
"Forest moon of end-pur"
"4Chan  you've done it again (Long but worth it)"
"what it feels like posting on my cakeday."
"How I feel when I see a post tagged &quot;NSFW&quot; that links to YouTube"
"Noah's Ark."
"Two trips"
"Debate faceswap  infinite potential fulfilled (Thanks to u/yarrpiracy for the swap)"
"What a cute couple"
"I finally became docta today. My fatha approves."
"For my cakeday I've decided to give you my list of GIF conversation enhancers  enjoy!"
"Cat and Dog"
"Hey. My eyes are up here."
"Traffic  Traffic  Lookin for my chapstick..."
"Hentai is getting weird"
"Sometimes You Just Have To Pay A Guy For The Right Job"
"Haters gonna..."
"Spotting unhealthy snacks in my normally healthy household..."
"Searched darth vader with hair on google. Was not disappointed"
"Well  Samsung Canada has won me over."
"didnt know there was a difference. [6]"
"Why does Snoop Dogg need an umbrella?"
"This is why Buddhism will avoid the wrath of r/atheism."
"Would you guys stop doing that!? How do you expect me to score?"
"I've never got the idea of religion anyway"
"All By Myself"
"Meteor streaking across Canadian sky"
"How i feel about hats..."
"Edible embryonic fluid?"
"Unbelievable dodgeball move"
"Fall is fucking awesome!"
"so.. this is how Karma works?"
"Louis Armstrong plays for his wife in front of the Sphinx by the pyramids in Giza  1961"
"Infinite Tom Sellecks"
"Eyebrows"
"Is there something in my eyes?"
"My favorite quote. I use it all the time."
"Misogyny"
"strongest pimp hand of all time"
"Here. The pinnacle of Misty cosplay. Now we can stop."
"Surprise toilet paper"
"Oscar's Origin"
"Officially the coolest pic I've seen all week"
"Omegle"
"Gravity is on our side"
"I searched 'haters gonna hate' in Google Images and this was the first result"
"Lahey on drinking ..."
"Does it look like i care?"
"Friday..."
"Pastor buddy of mine put this in my newsfeed. Thought you guys might totally hate it."
"Best. Job. Ever."
"Excuse me! what time is it?..... It's 4 O'clock"
"This is why I'm afraid of getting a new tattoo"
"I'll give you 2 guesses as to which candidate makes manufactures his campaign hats in China...."
"I'll give you 2 guesses as to which candidate makes manufactures his campaign hats in China...."
"It's all in the details."
"So that's what he was thinking about."
"Cat slap!"
"Medusa meets her match"
"Reminds me of Black Dynamite..."
"So I can just say how a repost makes me laugh every time and get karma? Here."
"I would play this game so hard."
"How Papa gets his pizza delivered"
"Everytime I try to exercise ..."
"I'll give him this  he put up one hell of a fight."
"Every time I dry my hands"
"Right in the childhood"
"it's friday  i have less than an hour left at work and a big ass bag of candy; this is that feel."
"I call big spoon!"
"Finn and Jake  in the beginning... [X-Post from /r/adventuretime ]"
"Whatever you had for lunch...I want some."
"Jehova's Witness Level: Final"
"The general response to foreign Redditors hating on Americans."
"Me to my father  who's been hounding me about getting a job for the past month  after finally being hired"
"Me  when I see all the sarcastic &quot;Happy 4th of July&quot; posts."
"AMERICA!"
"Been waiting for a suitable new gif  think i've found one"
"...and all you are is a thought."
"Kitty and huskey!"
"How i feel about dubstep."
"To everyone who comments on my posts."
"Some remixes on the American Psycho upvote gif"
"Made this the other day to describe my feelings towards reddit's front page."
"Cute but funny"
"Here's a gif of a tesseract  a 4 dimensional cube"
"Wake Bane up before you go-go."
"This combination accidentally happened  but all I could think of was what a sweet love story this was."
"It's not unusual"
"Never gonna give the batman up"
"Pixels IRL"
"Penguin Sledding (x-post from r/pics)"
"..no  it's cool. I keep the shit in condoms."
"What did he think would happen?"
"THOMP. THOMP. THOMP."
"Jumprope"
"This is easily the loudest gif I've ever seen."
"watching spongebob after failing a driving test"
"You merely adopted the cuteness!"
"The true hero of our time."
"...umm...Spongebob???"
"My friend tried a Bud Light Mojito last night...."
"This is all i could think of when I saw this GIF"
"Fundies just don't understand"
"The sarcastic fringehead fish."
"I don't even..."
"The key to an instant 6-pack"
"Whatcha doin?"
"My brother did what?!?!"
"Jerry must really like his job"
"Hanging out in the waiting room."
"Tell me what you see.. fooled me..."
"Trust me  it's SFW"
"This is not a difficult concept"
"This is not a difficult concept"
"Lady Gaga... Looks like she ate most of her MEAT dress..."
"This is how I always sing it"
"hump assassin"
"WTF factor in this one is high (Somewhat NSFW)"
"gif i saw on 4chan"
"How Steam treats your bandwidth."
"MILFs brace for FAP offensive..."
"I'd rather be lonely than do that to a sheep...."
"When I've had a week of nothing but take-out food"
"Ignorance is a choice."
"NYC over the years."
"I'll never look at Mickey and/or Minnie the same  ever again ..."
"7 8 9"
"In 1997-98  This is how you measured the true value of a kid in my middle school yard."
"It makes you what?"
"Congratulations Peter Jackson on finishing &quot;The Hobbit&quot;  Its a Wrap!"
"fuck!!"
"Did we choose the wrong cut of meat? When was the vote?"
"Arnie Loves Guitar"
"My favorite gameboy ad"
"Welcome to the jungle......"
"Me during a long week of nothing but tests."
"Too adorable"
"Hello there"
"When I see a spider (repost)"
"Magic. That is the only explanation Dog"
"This was on the wall of a Mc Donalds"
"Yo dawg...."
"little hands Mitt"
"ABS braking Explained."
"Just what I need!"
"Back to school essentials"
"BACK TO SCHOOL KNIFE SALE!"
"Back to school..."
"I don't remember this being on my back to school list"
"Soulja Boy's next hit: Do the octopus!"
"Perfect troll"
"We all know this feeling {saddest gif in existence}"
"it will be like this forever"
"Can't wait for this to come out!"
"Oh yeah?"
"Reality (pic)"
"Reddit told me this sword would protect my virginity. LIES! [NSFW]"
"Well  That's good i guess"
"Officer rescues kitty"
"I do want him as my new BF !! ;)"
"Murder you say?"
"MFW I'm too slow to ALT+TAB out of a porn page"
"This poster for this year's Holocaust observance blows my mind grapes."
"Growing old"
"I'm in your zoo  messing with your otters!"
"Surf the rainbow  man."
"Sunset seen through a wave"
"White People"
"I dare you to try and take the round one."
"Nipples...WTF!!!"
"Every time I try to cook something"
"Well  I'm convinced."
"View from Jet"
"You Know It's Hot Out When..."
"Cooling down from that last heat wave"
"Just trying to beat this heat..."
"Fuck you."
"Reddit Today"
"Did you hear about Colorado?"
"I find this gif semi erotic"
"Too true"
"How can I test if my son is gay?"
"How can I tell if my son is gay?"
"I know this is a re-post  but I can't stop laughing whenever I see this"
"The reason that spider-man is always masterbating"
"Before Christian Bale made Batman movies awesome again"
"Tainted Cat"
"hey what are you.. OH LAWD"
"wut."
"This is how I browse r/funny"
"What I imagine when I see people liking their own Facebook status."
"Umm...opps..."
"1/2 mile above Central Park"
"What I think whenever someone does (: instead of"
"I hear reddit likes cats"
"For many of us this is the best Father's day gift"
"Anybody else played this as a child?"
"MFW I went to sleep with little karma  and woke up with over 1500."
"Sunday school would've been a whole lot cooler if..."
"Spanking combo"
"Not so gentle Ben"
"Moth Eye [x-post from r/WTF]"
"It's staring at your sould"
"/r/gaming in a nutshell"
"Andre's Fatal Downvotes (X-post from r/funny)"
"This is fucking incredible."
"I added all of these to my to do list. All of them."
"Sunrise at the North Pole with the moon at its closest point."
"NYC Taxi Driver  Ram"
"Well  your honor  its like this (mild NSFW)"
"Unusual overpass for crabs."
"I'm glad you came?(FB)"
"Oh grandpa!"
"Me until I see The Dark Knight Rises.."
"Time for bed kitty. (x-post from r/funny)"
"Things you stop wishing for after you grow up"
"As I get older  this seems to happen more and more often..."
"I probably played this more than Blue  Gold  and Sapphire combined."
"Ready for My Close Up"
"What is love?"
"Simply the best thumbs up in existence...[Fixed]"
"When I'm getting downvoted into oblivion due to an unpopular opinion and one person agrees with me and tries to defend"
"Upvoting someone who reposts your ignored OC."
"Can't think of a title."
"Caught in the act"
"Hey /u/thatcoolguyben - you dodged a bullet with that one-night stand mate!"
"Whenever someone makes a good suggestion..."
"hipster ghost haunts and empty room  because haunting people is too mainstream"
"Everytime someone plays a creed song"
"The noises! I'm not used to them yet!"
"Anti-Bloomberg &amp; Surveillance Culture Satire"
"I'm serious"
"I'm doing it!"
"Soon."
"Remeber to vote for..."
"Damnit  he's so interesting"
"No  sir  I do in fact proclaim that I myself am you father."
"Huge SVBIED explosion in Syria"
"Penguins &amp; Sweaters."
"Let me play you the song of my people."
"Had to share  even though this could break reddit harder than Obama."
"Fuck it  I'm Harry Potter"
"How I imagine my 6'7'' friend at parties"
"Why I go to clubs"
"Stop hitting yourself - stop hitting yourself - stop hitting yourself"
"When people tell me Romney or Obama have the presidency locked up....."
"Where can I find more of this?"
"I think this fits for Batman and his friends."
"How i value my few upvotes."
"number 2 cause of teen deaths"
"God...? yes  I would like to report a glitch."
"preposterous erections"
"My  what a ridiculous erection. [X-post r/funny]"
"Perfect Timing"
"I Googled mortified look. This is what I got."
"Recent studies have linked diabetes to using the wrong bath water"
"When your hands are wet after going to the bathroom."
"not bad"
"I will never understand fashion."
"Y U NO LIKE ME!"
"dang that must have been some party!"
"pew pew laser"
"Oh  Buttermilk!"
"Mom I am waiting (x-post from /pics)"
"holy shit  fuck these guys"
"Lovely soup"
"Male unicorn"
"oh god why..."
"The Ghost Rider"
"Not a good start..."
"Cinnamon makes you too sexy for your shirt?"
"Atheism Motivational Poster"
"There are 3 children in this photo (NSFW)"
"Coworker shared this gem first thing today."
"What I always want to do before i go to work"
"How I feel when I tell a joke and no one laughs"
"Does anyone else love this guy on parks and recreation"
"Evolution of Nintendo's Game Controllers!"
"We did the chess on Splash Mountain pic on Saturday"
"Thank you."
"Karma IRL on my final exam"
"How I high five someone when I'm drunk"
"How I feel after Winning an argument on Reddit (fixed)"
"Captioning a Cat"
"Dat ass"
"A guy I was working with likes to argue with me about religion. Today I sent him this."
"I wonder what's for dinner?"
"NOPE."
"I know most redditors will appreciate this"
"I mustache you a question."
"Meanwhile.."
"Ghetto Cat [fixed]"
"'It is easier to fool people...' (unsourced) [s-post from /r/ QuitesPorn]"
"it's time you know the truth:you've been adopted..."
"Astronauts and Ohio (x-post from r/funny)"
"Three little birds"
"Just another summer sunset photo."
"Eating Stormtroopers for breakfast"
"When I want the joint back from the other side of the circle"
"This happens to me every day after work..."
"I can't even pleasure myself adequately."
"Silly poor people"
"I live in a low speed internet cottage for the summer. First World Problem"
"I didn't have any idea it was this complex!"
"A whole new meaning to Woody and Buzz..."
"I don't remember reading this one..."
"Hypnotic break dancing"
"Like a plastic bag in the wind ..."
"You asked for this..."
"forehead ping pong"
"Everyone knows the head tilt."
"Hardy and Gordon-Levitt being boss"
"Every time I stumble into r/spacedicks."
"the bargain hunter"
"Will make your day even better!"
"Panda Doing the Twist"
"How to catch a Norwegian"
"To everyone taking finals."
"Each time I have a successful post on Reddit."
"I poop excited and happy kids"
"Firefox + Windows. - Imgur"
"What now  bitches?"
"Get your own!"
"Vegan Money Shot"
"I heard carrots are good for the complexion."
"You asked for it: &quot;Fear Not Hell 3.0: Community Edition&quot; 30% moar Atheists  400% moar females  and more."
"Yes  I'm your slut!"
"SLUT"
"I think it knows what those gloves mean"
"StarWars. [No need to Fix any more]"
"Obi-Wan doesn't give a fuck."
"How I feel on Friday"
"How to remove a wedgie in public"
"Costume or doll?"
"Christopher Walken at age 22."
"Burdon of proof"
"Yo Spoonie! SPOON-AY!"
"can't  stop  laughing"
"Amazing picture of the Grand Canyon"
"Whenever my girlfriend puts on a headband"
"Redditor manages to create a live volcano near his hometown; hundreds die in the name of karma."
"Fucking Scorpions."
"If you're visiting Saskatchewan you might want to avoid this place..."
"Every time I'm asked for a BJ"
"There there..."
"Take that r/Atheism!"
"Louie C.K. is the master....bator"
"who wants to go for a swim in the Niger River?"
"The good old days"
"Meet EmmyLou  on her first river adventure."
"AISE KROM"
"My fellow ladies out there should know this feel."
"Now that's a helmet worthy of Thor!"
"I've seen some epic rat tails in my day  but you sir  you win."
"Toward the end of every week"
"Thursdays"
"A handful of bunny"
"Iamadoctor has inspired me to be truly original and share my work on reddit. Here's a painting my dad and I made when we were bored."
"Give this man his taco!"
"Found out today was my cake day  thought it was tomorrow.."
"How i play basketball..."
"I know  Jesus. I know."
"I know  Jesus. I know."
"Squeez"
"JUSTICE"
"Iron Mike nearly takes a head off with uppercut"
"The Man Baby"
"No really. I don't mind if you sit here."
"Chicago Grid at Night"
"Chicago Grid at Night"
"ENGAGE!"
"He's been overlooked for the last time..."
"Someone explain this bullshit to me."
"Angry Birds"
"That would be the only type of baseball game I would ever go to"
"I've been watching Breaking Bad on Netflix. I decided to google &quot;crystal meth.&quot; I guess I'm not the only one with a sense of humor."
"Two Disney classics  ruined forever."
"How I feel when I meet the new bf of a crazy girl who's great in bed that I used to date"
"Some men just want to watch the world burn."
"foxes can be cute"
"Come back here so we can play!"
"Nunchaku table tennis"
"Tallahassee finds out Hostess is going out of business."
"Hostess going out of business?"
"Proof you cant leave the friendzone"
"little red corvette"
"So I was browsing imgur....parental fail"
"Since we seem to be on an adorable turtle streak..."
"Perfect timing"
"Party Hard"
"Parenting will be easy they said."
"Stoner Toy!"
"Spidercan"
"When It's cold outside."
"I always imagine this while driving in a snow storm"
"how i want to upvote an original post..."
"Passing notes in class... with style."
"Dance Floor Collapse"
"Mount Roraima  Venezuela"
"Apparently Obama's not impressed  either."
"Beautiful picture of the Seychelle Islands [1800 x 1096]"
"Welcome to the real world"
"Bush Viper Snake"
"The licking-badass strikes again!"
"Meat America everyone"
"It never ends..."
"word."
"Come on every body!"
"So close!"
"The thing about smart people"
"How to confuse the hell out of a black guy"
"The bad part of picking any name"
"Humanity has lost an amazing person today. He will always be one of mankind's greatest heroes"
"Courtesy of Facebook"
"How to please a woman [X-Post from r/funny]"
"MFW a comment highlighting the amount of reposts gets downvoted"
"An interesting perspective on death."
"BEST. FRIEND. EVER."
"Animal Channel: Boat Edition"
"I was just wondering what it looked like"
"When I see a puppy..."
"Grumpy Xmas"
"PED"
"I looked"
"Quite"
"If cotton balls were alive"
"How I feel every time I get an upvote."
"I just realized tomorrow is my cakeday..."
"My best friends and I face when the hottest girl I know asked me if I want to hang out when I told her my ex left me"
"Lenin squares up  shoots... SCORRRREEESSSS"
"WTF just happened???"
"The first time I fired up a 3 speed mower."
"Youtube on the Olympics."
"I'll quote whoever I want"
"He looks waaay too happy..."
"Feels So Good"
"Shhhhh..."
"Shhhh..."
"On my Reddit birthday I submit to you  the cutest fucking thing I have ever seen!"
"little bunny hides his face"
"how attractive..."
"Strike a pose"
"It's a shame"
"Nope"
"hice yo kids"
"Baby grizzly bear"
"Door latch pirate design win"
"Amazing beer pong shot"
"This just makes me smile"
"Big brother is watching you"
"The Bus Knight"
"This is how the danish police keep themselves busy"
"Just a picture of World's smallest man dancing with his cat..."
"Henry Behrens  the smallest man in the world dances with his pet cat  1956"
"He can have any woman he wants."
"Just a hedgehog with a raspberry"
"I made a small .gif collection of high fives. Enjoy!"
"Everyone likes a good comic"
"Canadian Car Chase"
"Facebook Gold Nugget."
"how I felt when I found out today was the first day of Shark Week..."
"LOL has anyone else seen this bullshit on Facebook ?"
"Luger pistol (Parabellum) slow motion"
"Cuban tree frog  eating a lightbulb."
"Leader of the Knotsies..."
"my bunny had babies this is the one we kept:)"
"How to decode texting!"
"Are you kidding me?"
"Bear  come closer..."
"Pouring salt in the wound"
"It's my Reddit cakeday. Here's a fat penguin."
"Drowning in a river of shit"
"Out of Town"
"I painted Walt today"
"Walking into the bathroom after someone forgets to flush"
"Gary Busey Creepin"
"When your troubled and you need to stop for groceries"
"Zach Braff on sports."
"Please don't set me on fire."
"A challenge that might require the collective will of the entire internet. Who can identify all the models in the famous Pink Floyd back catalogue photo?"
"Now that's advertising."
"i'm high on chromosomes"
"Bitch  dont tell me what to do"
"OWNED LOL"
"This Level Ruined Gaming for Me for Years"
"I guess that's that."
"Only a little racist..."
"xoxo Gale (Spoiler alert!)"
"Makes sense to me"
"Wait for it..."
"The Rabbit or the Duck?"
"Woody is horny"
"The Greatest Extra Credit Question Ever"
"Does this annoy you as much as it does me?"
"i'm a little disturbed"
"You know what looks weird? A lynx."
"When your post gets 4 downvotes immediately"
"Pro parenting"
"Father of the year II?"
"Yet another person making us Tennesseans look bad."
"This game consumed my soul back in 2005."
"Bodies hitting the floor!"
"HardCore Christian"
"Don't bread your stupidity."
"Run bro"
"Not sure if stupid or just trolling. (sorry for screen shot)"
"She does her country proud"
"Kostar pengar  cast many"
"&quot;Mothers who breastfeed their boy babies need to stop&quot;"
"Yep  this pretty much sums it up"
"I guess being a Super Hero gets old too"
"This is me whenever a circle breaks out at a dance club/party"
"White People"
"I thought this was a good match."
"The toilet thinker."
"That's a very nice desktop you have there... ssssss"
"On the way to Woodstock  1969 (Xpost from r/OldSchoolCool)"
"Happens all the time."
"3D porno &quot;makes&quot; woman pregnant...."
"This is how babies are born from technology"
"*Boop*"
"Oh."
"When you're reading a person's graphic tee and they walk away before you finish reading"
"This makes me wololo every time..."
"TIL..."
"Young Joseph Stalin."
"Having a nice ass won't stop me from squishing you."
"Shit like this reddit"
"Spooning Squirrels"
"MODERN WARFARE"
"Piglet is napping on his strawberry"
"How I felt when I realized it was my cakeday"
"When all /r/funny posts have over 1000 upvotes"
"Let's just hope it sticks to carrots..."
"in elementary school THIS is what going to the computer lab REALLY meant"
"MOVE child"
"Now that's a hardcore breakfast"
"when I think my post will make it to the front page"
"missed my cakeday.."
"Today I learned the feeling of making a grammatical error on reddit NEVER AGAIN!!!!"
"What Lucy saw when she looked down.."
"Evolution"
"Like a boss.."
"Darren."
"Militant Atheist"
"Fuck no."
"OP will surely deliver."
"Sympathy for Manti Te'o"
"Dad at Justin Beiber concert"
"Mulan"
"Turtle Burgers"
"Meat turtle"
"Turtle burger"
"Turtle burger"
"meanwhile in canada..."
"I so love dashboard cams !"
"I'm outta here"
"11 Years"
"Do you ever wonder?......."
"The mind does wander..."
"I'm interested to see the menu."
"Stephen Hawking in 1963 - looking dapper"
"Finding out that my awesome T.A. is a 9gagfag"
"&quot;The classic look all the time&quot;"
"Haters gonna hate"
"Charlie Chilling With Chester"
"In all fairness he would be pretty lonely on FB"
"Want some jello shots but are sick of tiny cups?"
"Unicorn cat is not amused"
"&quot;Cats love it&quot;."
"No Kitty!"
"Scary witch"
"Meet Puppy"
"The official gif of r/Aww"
"They be stealin' me bucket!"
"Old  but still one of the few pics that actually makes me laugh out loud"
"Come on  get in my belly!"
"How I feel browsing /r/wtf some days..."
"A friend of mine is running for vice president of our class. This is one of his campaign posters."
"Hhhnnnnpphhhh"
"was looking for &quot;watch out&quot; pics when this came up"
"What to look for when trying to find a shawty"
"For those who do not know how to decide if they have found a &quot;shawty&quot;"
"Say goodbye to your sex life!"
"Showed up in my (FB)"
"And then it hit me"
"I want one!"
"Having an awful day  then realizing it's your cakeday."
"The first thing I thought when I saw this picture"
"apply cool water to burned area (big girl version)"
"Poor cat"
"Why I always buy at least three boxes of Thin Mints [Pic]"
"Girl scouts motto....Be Prepared"
"Boop"
"Good luck with jump  Frog. You can do it! Show us cunt proud!"
"Overanalyzing: The Shame &amp; Guilt Issue"
"What studying for finals feels like"
"Cat on slide"
"Journey to the frontpage"
"How I feel everytime I post something on Reddit"
"Some men just want to watch The Office burn [FIXED]"
"It got angry after I bit it"
"Your mindset and elephants"
"Hi."
"The reality of Lion King vs the cartoon"
"Left Brain vs Right Brain"
"One of the most challenging things I've ever experienced in a video game."
"Traffic stop"
"How I feel when my post gets downvoted on my birthday"
"But...why?"
"Redneck limousine"
"Oh  that's why."
"Instant Karmic Retribution [gif]"
"I think I just became a Christina Applegate fan"
"My favorite picture"
"Yo dawg"
"Overheard a super angry lady at cosco say this. Haha"
"Smack"
"How Tony Stark spends his free time"
"Improvised hair tie"
"True....."
"Just a viking holding an AK-47 while riding a unicorn in space. No biggie"
"Tech Support"
"I have no idea what to make of this..."
"But it's totally true guize"
"Squirrel"
"On the bright side he always has a place to sit! [NSFW]"
"Testicular Elephantitis"
"What I imagine the Swedish president saying..."
"This is what I think every time I see this pic"
"Possibly one of the greatest mousepads ever created"
"Jenga - like a boss"
"Jenga - like a boss"
"How I pictured the night going when my girlfriend suggested we have a &quot;game night&quot;"
"C-Rex"
"Evolution of Batman"
"Bonk"
"How I have to be as a Wildlife Biologist when uneducated creationists try and debate with me"
"Not a single fuck given."
"the original title"
"Toadstool"
"Shit shit shit"
"Saw this on my newsfeed... Too many people got this wrong."
"Saw this on my news feed... Too many people got this wrong.."
"Toddlers &amp; Tiaras"
"Express yourself."
"Bunnies make the best strippers."
"How I feel upvoting a post at -1"
"I got the need for speed!"
"&quot;I don't care if they have never committed a crime  atheists are the reason crime is rampant.&quot; What??"
"Found this while going through that rajskins guy's history and it's killing me (shamelessly reposting)"
"Tan Lines"
"Thanks Obama."
"This kid gives me nightmares"
"You found me"
"Mystery fruit"
"Haters Gunna Hate."
"It works"
"My buddy snapped this picture whilst working at Brisbane airport this evening."
"Directed by Michael Bay"
"Oppa Warcraft Style (xpost /r/wow)"
"Perfect"
"As true then as it is now."
"Everyone on Reddit right now"
"Can't get any more bad ass than this"
"So I typed WTF unicorn on google..."
"My Favorite and most heavily edited Game of Thrones gif on the interwebs. Yes  it contains bacon."
"I don't even know how this happens."
"Doin' nothin' at all [xpost]"
"Just finished paying off a bullshit 550 dollar ticket  this is how I pooped."
"How I poop when on a public toilet"
"I can't believe I never saw this before now."
"Magical"
"I bring you love!"
"When a reposted reactiongif makes it to the front page of r/gifs"
"Jerry dropped a little too much Lysergic Acid Diethylamide."
"This was just on my Facebook"
"Ninja Bear is The One."
"So tiny yet so cute."
"My friends awsome bunny"
"When I see a friend browsing 9GAG"
"I didnt save him from anything  but here is my cute puppy anyway!"
"somebody stole my phone"
"Inception style Neil deGrasse Tyson  found on twitter. &quot;Neil deGrasse Tyson and me with a picture of Neil deGrasse Tyson and me with a picture of Neil deGrasse Tyson and me.&quot; See comments for twitter link."
"grandma knows how to party!"
"My dream car..."
"Why hello there..."
"Nixon's Back!!!!!"
"Notice a difference?"
"Puppy husky"
"Thats quite a collection you have there sir"
"Gotta love my nerd school"
"Gotta love my nerd school [x-post from r/gaming]"
"Wtf is this [nsfl]"
"Nicholas Cage the Elephant"
"Found this on Facebook - Nicolas Cage the Elephant"
"Still my favorite gif"
"How I feel seeing posts with a title &quot;I see your dildo up the anus and raise you X&quot;"
"The Icelandic Police force has finally captured Iceland's Most Wanted"
"Calm down guys"
"Valve likes to fuck with me every so often"
"I'm afraid to download anything from 1969"
"Favorite collection of facepalms."
"How I feel arguing with Christians sometimes"
"Who remembers this stuff? Gawd it was awesome."
"virginity king"
"How I imagine Apple's legal team"
"The Moon and Venus."
"What's the difference...?"
"Epic ass  identify por favor [NSFW]"
"How to escape the police"
"Giants of the Arctic"
"My 11 year old son is bad at the internet..."
"Yo Mama Jokes  indexed by professional employment"
"damn you dihydrogen monoxide  damn you"
"Stumbling upon r/boners for the first time"
"Wtf is wrong with my legs"
"No matter how tough they may seem  every living creature has a heart"
"This is how I imagine guys feel when they agree to get back with an ex-girlfriend who may or may not have a touch of the crazy."
"How I feel when trying to empty out my email inbox."
"possibly violent but surely effective (xpost from r/funny)"
"A quick reminder."
"When I make a grammatical error on here"
"So I went to see what the buzz is about at /r/spacedicks"
"I... I just don't know..."
"79% of people don't know opposite words for the following..."
"When I learned how to collapse threads using the [-] button."
"2 Fabulous 2 Furious"
"Yes  there is an app for that! How much money do you make while using the toilet at work?"
"This pretty much sums up my Redditing for today..."
"You're doing it wrong"
"We're not in Kansas anymore  Toto."
"Double wammy"
"Totally Scare when you watch 1st time!!"
"I can't for the life of me find the website. Help?"
"unconventional  but still made me &quot;awww&quot; x-post gifs /u/hasdifficultyposting"
"what....i'm a whale bitch!!"
"Why hello there  nice to meet you"
"[W]hat a tease"
"Nope. Nope nope nope."
"Japan has creepy styles"
"Meanwhile in China..."
"The Whole Steam Sale Background story in one .gif!"
"fuck."
"sexy Churchill"
"Realistic Potter"
"Super Romantic"
"How Reddit feels about Paul Ryan."
"Juipiter and its moon Io. The red dot is a volcano on the surface and the blue is its emission. [x-post from r/pics]"
"Pakistan airlines ad from 1979"
"My favorite Beer."
"And Lift-Off! [Semi-NSFW]"
"Man asks do I know you. Says No I dont. Walks away. Police report filed"
"I'll just leave this here.... found in my facebook news feed"
"Seems legit"
"And people ask me why I don't like dolls."
"'MERICA"
"whatcha thinking about?"
"Nobody dare to mess with the mighty shark:&gt;"
"Only in chicago"
"Nice Neck"
"my DOMAIN is the dance floor."
"Day Diver"
"Stahp"
"I would buy these."
"Signature move of Reddit on the road."
"I just realized a large amount of Reddit should be banned from Imgur according to their rules."
"A music school in China"
"If Reddit was a record studio"
"My favorite gif."
"You're dough fucking special  I wish I was special."
"Creep: Pastry Edition"
"'Cause I'm a crepe"
"Skills."
"Friend and I just watched 'The Prestige.' This is us for pretty much the entire second half of the movie.."
"When I watched an old episode of Ren &amp; Stimpy and I heard the phrase &quot;Peruvian Butt Plug.&quot;"
"This is the cutest puppy on the planet."
"this probably isnt the best way to advertise a barbie doll"
"This new super carrier will allow the US complete supremacy in the Middle East"
"Someone played a joke on Parents magazine...."
"That gray motherfucker is such a douche bag"
"Only the lord Jesus can judge us."
"Deer and fox kiss"
"Hipster level: 99"
"Toaster USB hub with toast flash drives"
"Put your finger"
"So I was looking at one of the games my 11 year old sister plays on our iPad. WTF has our world come to."
"When i leave on a Jetblue flight in 5 days  and i hear jetblue planes have been having mechanical problems"
"When you see it.."
"The difference between Olympic gymnasts and swimmers."
"I walked in on this this morning  cutest thing I've ever seen them do."
"As an Atheist  this is how I felt when my mom forced me to go to church...."
"Red fox at Squaw creek"
"Swagger"
"As seen on Reddit. Haters gon hate."
"Amazing picture of Norway ocean road"
"When I saw the trailers for the new Fall sitcoms"
"I see your &quot;ladies love it&quot; mustache tattoo and raise you this mans mustache tattoo."
"It has been 14 days and I feel like this would be a better alternative (Movember)"
"Nice one  grandma"
"The Later Years."
"Bang bang  my baby shot me down..."
"Total WTF pic"
"Barney"
"A Normal day on the NYC subway..."
"Baby Panda"
"I have this conversation with my cat once a week"
"My mom got an iPhone yesterday. She sent me this  I expect I'll get much more."
"SPRINKLES !! I love sprinkles"
"Welcome to Reddit [fixed]"
"A couple dudes at the fair? Here are just a couple people hanging out..."
"A room full of heroes."
"something to remember this tuesday..."
"Cheater!"
"tha fuck?"
"Finally my Facebook feed came up with some good old fashioned WTF?!"
"More jam mom"
"Underwater Hotel  Turkey"
"Butterfingers"
"please remake this Capcom"
"One of My Favorite Games from when I was younger."
"Can't defeat Goku? Why not join the Navy?"
"I love this picture so much."
"Derp"
"SS soldiers playing with kitten (exact date &amp; location unknown) [700x505]"
"The award for most stressful level in a game goes too..(fixed)"
"And not a single fuck was given."
"Old School Booty."
"Cash or I'll vote for him (from facebook timeline)"
"Geography teacher talking about the core of the earth says &quot;think back to how the world was created.&quot; Half the class said &quot;God&quot;. This was the teachers face in reaction."
"she wants the ph(d)"
"Pint sized terror"
"Staring Contest"
"Got this look the other day when I mentioned I was an atheist at a party."
"Sorry this may creep you out a bit"
"How I feel when this song comes on the radio..."
"Bring on the PAIN!"
"Who I imagine reposters are (fixed)"
"Who I Imagine Reposters Are [FIXED]"
"I made a downvote gif from Jmc1077's post"
"Internship explained"
"Gangsta as Fuck"
"Bane Reddit"
"Meanwhile in Japan..."
"Indecisive Indy."
"So a dog walks into a bar..."
"Searched &quot;weird&quot; on Google. This is what popped up."
"The execution of German General Anton Dostler by firing squad  1945"
"Give me some privacy."
"My Cake Day is almost over."
"No please  you go ahead."
"nobody will mess with the kreb cycle"
"The most bad ass man ever."
"When someone changes the song"
"Nailed It!"
"seems legit..."
"Zorita and her pet snake."
"If only the Green Goblin knew..."
"I want this guy for my party"
"Bowling: You couldn't be doing it more wrong"
"She'll be bleeding twice this month."
"People who complain about reposts."
"Honestly can not think of a title"
"I'll get down on this one."
"Damn you sun."
"The Other Hole"
"College memes - You're doing it pretty right."
"Dat Ass."
"Hold Me Back"
"My reaction to nearly all of the comments from yesterday's &quot;things that all guys do&quot; thread."
"Ain't no one."
"Cannot be unseen"
"This just... fits."
"My hand after breaking up with my girlfriend of 2 years. [fixed]"
"the butt of many jokes.."
"Happens at least once every damn day... SAP"
"The Perfect Woman (according to the internet)"
"His only weakness!"
"Shower Effort"
"My favourite headline ever!"
"One hell of a party"
"I expect this when my friend finds out i made the front page"
"Who knew Thor had a sister?"
"What I thought when my boyfriend told me that until recently  he thought the expression was &quot;fun intended&quot;"
"MFW I think of a decent comeback when I need it."
"My first attempt at one of these"
"Unce Unce Unce Unce"
"Reddit in 3012 (X-post form r/funny)"
"The Origin of Pocket Whales. (I want one  damn it!)"
"A second before a geyser erupts."
"kick....kick....kick"
"Tomb of The Unknown Soldier during Hurricane Sandy. Respect."
"In the shower this morning when I realized I don't have to realize it's friday because exams were done on Tuesday."
"r/funny the last 3 days"
"when a non-redditor shows you a meme."
"When my roommate shows me post on Facebook that I saw on Reddit a week ago"
"FREEDOM!!! [FIXED]"
"Saw this picture in /r/firstworldanarchist and this is all I could think of the sunflower saying."
"So that's how that hole got there!"
"Welcome to the Internet here's your gif basket"
"sporting the umbreon hat swag."
"Party on"
"Cracked me up"
"My reaction to all these nasty fish poping up"
"Imgur staff group photo"
"Did she really think that was going to work?"
"Best friend I ever had."
"Domino of shame."
"Spongebob?!"
"A Christian friend posted this to Facebook. I laughed."
"My buddy in the Marines wrote me to make this.."
"Jesus Loves Bad Luck Brian"
"Bad Luck Brian sees a movie"
"When Teemo's blindness wears off"
"Never drinking again after I woke up next to this..."
"When I read a mean comment aimed towards me..."
"How I feel with no cat to post pictures of on my cakeday"
"As a european who never even got the chance of tasting a twinkie."
"Can I get a source for this gif please?"
"At first I was like  NSFW  but then.."
"U/G Dual Land....or at least  it looks like it should be."
"Pug Factory"
"Today  we shall feast upon his resurrected flesh..."
"AMA with Scientists of Mars' Curiosity landing...11am EST"
"Trippy Gif"
"Any love for sacred geometry?"
"If I get the youth  I'll be strong enough to go back for bacon!"
"Nom. Nom. Nom. Nom. Nom. Nom. Nom. Nom"
"This is why I don't go in the Ocean"
"Pacman's relationship problems."
"How ice cream sandwiches are made [gif]"
"Now I want an ice-cream sandwich..."
"An elephant and a seal seem like unlikely friends."
"No  no  no... Do THIS  with this. [FTFY]"
"When someone tells me I've had too much to drink....."
"How I feel when a family member says &quot;I pray for you.&quot;"
"How I feel about the hundreds of &quot;This is [random country]"
"When a friend brags he has more karma"
"The ever-offensive minding our own business."
"If I fits I sits"
"I figured out the mystery."
"double high five"
"No matter how many times I hear it  it's still just as true"
"speaks for itself..."
"What do you think of me and my girlfriend's gaming rigs? [Fixed]"
"Swanson's new line of frozen dinners"
"My wife wants to get this for our baby. I think I married the right woman. (x-post from r/funny)"
"Meanwhile  in Brazil..."
"Sucks to suck  Jim."
"I am the 1%"
"How I feel as an American with all these gold medals"
"This is why I shop online..."
"Horrifyingly Real: Beavis &amp; Butthead"
"A boy and a baby elephant."
"Amazing under/over shot of a Whale Shark"
"How I think my grandma acts when we talk about religion."
"Surprise Attack!"
"( O__o)"
"Barack Obama is doing a AMA  I wonder how reddits servers are holding up?"
"Just two people rolling down a hill"
"This is the world we are leaving to the future generations."
"My body is ready."
"Silly T-Rex"
"T-Rex hates push ups"
"Good morning."
"&quot;So I hear you're fond of literature&quot;"
"When my friend leaves to help out his lady friend with &quot;homework&quot;"
"The new MacBook from Africa"
"My girlfriend and I were driving in the mountains when suddenly..."
"I've got nothing for this.."
"Bar owner defending protestors against the police [FIXED]"
"I took this pic of my frozen windshield  and I think it kind of looks like a mountain range."
"Oh shit! Are you okay Mr. Truck?"
"The song goes so well with the GIF"
"possibly the saddest moment of my childhood"
"One with the fishes"
"Ok  human. You may stop now."
"So  my boyfriend went down on me and found..."
"Nearly Perfect Gif"
"POOH SMASH!!"
"Doesn't matter what I'm holdin'"
"The 1% Problem"
"The Blood of the Lamb shall cleanse us....right?"
"My nigga       let me call you back!!!!!"
"How to take the last doughnut."
"OMG!!"
"Could be a celebration gif. But I love imagining the Snuggle bear saying  &quot;FUCK IT'"
"I'm sure this guy wont regret this in a few years..."
"Can we say.... AWKWARRRRD!"
"handshake fail"
"White Folk"
"Hell Yeah."
"When I found out there's a movie theater for couples."
"i really couldn't think of a title for this .."
"'Real Women...'"
"Cannot Unsee..."
"Bro  back up"
"We're having an auction."
"Play with the moon..."
"Fun with the moon"
"The guy who comes up with the headlines must have been off today..."
"Magic beard!"
"YAY  SCIENCE"
"Poor Ralph."
"No matter how many times I see this  it makes me giggle every time."
"well  she is pretty scary"
"Just a Bird Feeding its Baby"
"And Then There's Mark..."
"# 1 Mexican Restaurant !"
"Being atheist in America summed up in one beautiful sentence."
"Hipster Hitler"
"Zion National Park  Utah"
"Every monday."
"Oh Asia  not again."
"Nice try  Batman."
"To the thousands of you who spend more nights in hotels than your home due to work. I feel your pain. Here's my 1 pro-tip. Do you have any?"
"Not even close"
"God made himself useful for once"
"Everytime I see a crappy novelty account post an irrelevant comment..."
"Doll Centipede"
"Child Arthropod"
"Beans Motherfucker."
"Beans....."
"My first thought to seeing all the &quot;Cats Shot with Arrows&quot; posts [FIXED]"
"Fuck everything about this"
"Welcome to the English language  asshole."
"And they say French is a complicated language..."
"Notorious B.I.G. after graduating kindergarten  before his teachers told him he'd never amount to nothin'."
"&quot;I'm saving this ketchup for later!&quot;"
"As a student  this is my reaction when my debit card works."
"R-Money: Binders Fulla Women"
"'Merica"
"A block of Cheddar a day  keeps the doctor at bay"
"An American Snack."
"This was broadcasted on CNBC. Look at the ticker at the bottom (xpost /r/pokemon)"
"This was broadcasted on CNBC. Look at the ticker at the bottom (xpost /r/pokemon)"
"I said I wanted kitties!!"
"The T-Rex Theory"
"Fuck you  printer"
"Ever wonder how deep the ocean is?"
"Friends"
"Meanwhile in Poland"
"Woman gets covered in Pooh  while the Police and a dog are watching."
"How it feels to be a Brian on reddit today."
"when I walk in on my room mate"
"His name is Dick. No joke."
"Any guess as to this little guys name?"
"His name is Dick"
"I miss this show.."
"I wonder if they were able to save this Klan man's life."
"It is not ironic?"
"Black physicians working on a KKK member."
"Sick catch bro!"
"Sick Catch... (X-Post)"
"What am I seeing?"
"Pretty Much [FIXED]"
"Fire In Zero Gravity"
"Alright Texas summer  this shit is getting a little out of hand."
"Today  it's so hot that...notruf"
"When I try to make it to the front page"
"Dude! Take it easy!"
"Natures Coolest Chillest Motherfucker"
"Nature's Chillest Motherfuckers (x-post from funny)"
"Smiling Suzuki Airi reminds me of my favorite sloth"
"MFW My brother found out I was wearing his underwear"
"Another successful Tyrone"
"Everyday I'm..."
"I present to you  Nicki Minaj young and without botox!"
"How I felt when I got banned from r/gonewild for causing too much &quot;drama&quot;"
"How I feel when I'm surrounded by assholes at school."
"How I feel when I get downvoted within a minute of posting."
"A bobcat kitten and a fawn cuddling together after being rescued from a wildfire"
"Most likely a repost  but this comic always makes me laugh"
"A trees root system merges with a brick walkway"
"Little Wolf"
"By far  the best thing I've ever found at Goodwill."
"I imagine that everyone in r/aww has this chair."
"How I feel as a Religous  Republican cop on Reddit"
"Cute husky needs no clever title."
"WWII on Facebook"
"Hits me in the feels every time."
"This man needs to be locked up"
"First time visiting 4chan (or /b/  not sure). This is what I found.."
"Without a question  the least-relatable gif ever created (looking at you  Unrelated_Gif)."
"Banana Man..?"
"Japanese Dole."
"WTF Bananas."
"Why Japan why?"
"It's apparently my cake day! Having never noticed before  lets see what this is all about."
"...i dont know how to title this"
"This shit is bananas."
"Banana Power."
"japanese banana boy"
"wut"
"Many  many hours were spent here. [FIXED]"
"The Snake Bus Advertisement"
"Heath Ledger skateboarding over Christian Bale while taking a break on set."
"One of the coolest picture's I have ever seen."
"What is the best way to stop your child from becoming an atheist?"
"Sun  Earth  ISS  and one amazing picture."
"When people tell me who they voted for expecting that I change my vote..."
"How I feel when I get down voted..."
"How I feel when my posts get downvoted to oblivion."
"Oh YEAH!"
"The Product"
"Interesting Origin Story (X-Post from /r/FanTheories)"
"Sleeping Train"
"One drop"
"x-post from /r/vegan"
"Manly man"
"Over manly man on Sandy"
"Bitch mittens"
"Excuse me sir  do your boots meet regulations?"
"How it feels being pregnant."
"My Grandfather laid this one on me the other day."
"So THAT'S where they come from [.gif]"
"So...Close..."
"So Obama's doing an AMA..."
"Screenshot of reddit from the year 3012 [fixed]"
"Great answer to an interesting question [PIC]"
"Thought I could use these"
"Reading is for..."
"I lost my fuck."
"Send this to your haters"
"The most reddit worthy image I've seen in a while."
"So my cakeday post just got killed..."
"This is enough to put one's teeth on edge."
"Dog walking rule #124"
"This came up on my newsfeed"
"Get Well"
"Parks and Rec..... the fuck?"
"This image of Ron Swanson has crashed Sam Spratts (Artist) store. Good on you Reddit."
"SWANSON"
"Didn't remember this happened on Teletubbies..."
"ok  childhood ruined.. possibly to be nsfw (not porn tho)"
"I think this belongs here. r/pics  I give you the first permanent photograph ever taken: Joseph Nicéphore Niépce's &quot;View from the Window at Le Gras&quot; (1826)."
"The Harry Ransom Center at UT has the first picture ever taken. I give you &quot;View from the Window at Le Gras&quot; by Nicéphore Niépce"
"You know that photo of the first camera ever made? Well this is the first photo it ever took"
"If this was me  the water would be just a little warmer in my area."
"yeahh you can read it in his voice..that would be greatt"
"My thoughts after realizing it's my cakeday at 9:46pm and having nothing of worth to post"
"I searched &quot;I HAVE NO CAKEDAY POST&quot;  this is what I got  I'm so pathetic."
"FUCK YOU REDDIT I'M FUCKING FUNNY"
"When I see you try to be clever with the  &quot;I see your x  and raise you y&quot;..."
"How did you do that? Magic motherf***er..."
"If you can read this.."
"Picture of my friend's baby. I thought Reddit might like it."
"I don't know how I should feel about this"
"A raccoon holding a kitten"
"Anyone lose a cat?"
"Rock-a-bye Baby"
"They are evolving!!"
"Did you lose a cat? [X-post from r/funny]"
"...I don't even."
"Not sure what the fuck this is... possibly NSFW [ALBUM]"
"This defines the meaning of What The Fuck"
"Probably why there isn't many comments on GW posts"
"Oh  baby. [NSFW?]"
"MIND BLOWN. LITERALLY."
"&quot;Some people don't want WAR to end.&quot;"
"The moment I encounter something/someone beautiful..."
"Where did this mindblown.gif originate from?"
"If Emotional_Teenager and POSTS_BABY_TALK both comment on a single post or thread..."
"How I feel when I watch &quot;Through the Wormhole with Morgan Freeman&quot;"
"Mind = BLOWN"
"Gangnam style."
"The creation of Gangnam style"
"The shit we come across on the internet..."
"SURPRISE STEVE!"
"“Shut up and take my money!”"
"Waterfall swing set"
"Waterfall swing set"
"Public graffiti and destructive doodling is one of the most costly art forms. Some people apparently think it is creative  and I can agree with that."
"Photobomb in today's newspaper"
"Solid Photobombing"
"Cow photo bomb!"
"Whenever I'm at a club..."
"After working almost 60 hours this week  this is me all weekend...."
"But it's true!"
"to do list"
"O.O"
"Hard core Kelvins!"
"So......This exists....."
"Baby Octopus"
"Best dog costume ever."
"One of the strangest (and most awesome) dog costumes made"
"This picture always makes me laugh"
"I know it's been reposted countless times  but for those that might have missed it  the one image that makes me laugh everytime I see it - &quot;Faggot dog&quot;"
"Who's awesome? This guy."
"It's a good day"
"Otter  dancing."
"NOPE NOPE NOPE"
"A master of photoshop"
"It was photoshoped."
"Innocent comic that I can't help smiling at."
"Lil' bunny doing some much-need shopping. (x-post from r/aww)"
"o_O ... O_o"
"How I Feel Whenever I Go To The Club With My White Friends"
"My friend convinced me to be the designated driver at a rave"
"When I'm not high and my friends are."
"Me at 11 AM when I try to fix my sleep schedule"
"I'm having browser trouble."
"I get this error all the time !"
"Thoon..."
"Found out it was my Reddit Birthday &amp; did this."
"Two baby ducks. No  wait  not ducks!"
"Eye drops"
"How I feel when I get up from sitting and hit my head..."
"When I see this same .gif on three consecutive pages."
"How I feel when someone at my work quits and I have to work overtime."
"When you realize you used the wrong formula to do all the work..."
"3 days into no fap September: &quot;I would..."
"My attitude anywhere after the first five weeks of school"
"President Obama meets with Clint Eastwood on the patio outside the Oval Office"
"#TheJuanPercent"
"How to properly hold a chicken [FIXED]"
"For my cake day  I present you with my favourite gif"
"I heard you're into haunted houses now?"
"This guy was told by his Homeowners Association that he couldn't fly the American flag in his yard...."
"Stood here for a good while on the way to work this morning.. Nothing happened.."
"The Most Obvious Zombie Fortress"
"The most beautiful castle in Europe Mont-St-Michel"
"That kind of British."
"How I feel as a British guy watching the Olympic Opening Ceremony"
"When people comment on why they downvoted my post"
"beautiful ....."
"Stop accusing me..."
"Everything means something somewhere"
"Im hearing a lot about Mc Chris today.."
"My theory on why no one is talking about no-fap September anymore."
"That awkward moment when a family gets naked in your studio."
"18th Birthday"
"My new Will Ferrell downvote gif."
"Sure showed him a lesson"
"Massive pyramid of slain German soldier's helmets in New York's Grand Central station  1918. Surreal."
"I didn't know Jesus wanted THAT kind of relationship"
"Don't like politics... But I find this funny"
"Chewbacca riding a squirrel  holding a crossbow fighting Nazi's. Your argument is invalid (sorry if repost)"
"Whenever someone uses The Bible as a reliable source..."
"I love good synchronization"
"Fifty Shades of..."
"I want to play the slender man game but i can't find a site that will let me download it. I have Diablo 3 guest passes for whoever links me to a site that lets me play it."
"Whenever I see this...."
"Flirting With Death"
"So long gay boys"
"I once visited r/spacedicks"
"Everybody who's visiting a grocery store right now"
"When I realize someone accidentally didn't log off Facebook..."
"How I felt giving my first downvote."
"Muscle Cat"
"Friends brother broke his arm but we figured this guy deserved it more"
"Ohh Virginia..."
"Hang in there little buddy."
"Poor Little Feller"
"Giada misses the point"
"When I'm in the car and I see someone I know"
"When I see my parents while I'm with friends"
"A man in Jersey came oustide after the storm and seen this swimming in the front yard."
"Crackalackin'"
"I Feel Cooler Already"
"When a girl asks me to go down on her.."
"Stupid fox"
"Bad time to stop a Nikki Minaj video."
"The Sadness of Pain au Chocolat"
"Get your own teddy bear!"
"Try and watch this without saying &quot;awww...&quot;"
"I wuv my teddy bear"
"Oh hell  yeah."
"FALCON PUNCH!"
"Scumbag Bison"
"Damn  nature..."
"Salvador Dali walking an Anteater. As you do..."
"I wish I were this smooth..."
"I didnt even have to swap there faces..."
"Hipster-Vaudeville cat played piano before it was cool."
"When an argument starts on the internet  somewhere he is making music"
"This cat is playing a piano."
"I have no idea what im doing"
"The NEW keyboard cat!"
"Finally... a way to carry my iPad around while drinking a coffee and not look like a douche [pic]"
"A Different way of talking a self pic."
"Ain't no thang"
"when I see a new thread pop up"
"I don't know karate  But I do know crazy!"
"Get the London look."
"it just fits."
"Watcha doin'...?"
"When I create a thread asking for help and people respond."
"Dog runs into kid."
"DOUBLE KILL!"
"Dog owns kid twice"
"Party time  excellent"
"Dumb babies"
"How I feel about today's job market."
"My Grandparents offered to match $1 000 if I worked this summer  this was how I feel as a teenager with no job experience."
"The only reason I ever had to replace my n64 controllers[FIXED]"
"Destroying N64 Joysticks since 1996 (Fixed)"
"Not your average meteor shower."
"I dont like to gamble... when.."
"Whatever Floats Your..."
"when my frient asks if i want to smoke another bowl [8]"
"Still my favorite gif on the internet..."
"How i feel when my friends Jimmies have been rustled."
"Guess what Louisiana!"
"When you get stuck with someone you just met"
"When I make eye contact with the only other sober person at the party."
"This turned out exactly as I expected."
"I'm pretty sure this is going to be true for most of us"
"How I feel when I see a repost was more successful than my handmade original content"
"How I know she ain't a gold digger"
"The realization I am short on cash for paying this months bills."
"NOPE NOPE! I'm outta here!"
"This Is Why I Love Japan."
"Spot the difference ..."
"I can't tell the difference"
"Atheist ideology  beliefs and ideas are disgusting!!! Is THIS what you call civilized rationality?"
"This guy"
"Are you a beer?"
"Amazing pixel art"
"Just got back from France"
"I think I see the problem..."
"No matter how bad a day you're having at work work it could always be worse. You could have this guys job..."
"Karma points please!"
"So it's my first cakeday... Am I doing it right?"
"Just feeding a lion"
"Whenever I look into a new hobby."
"How I feel as a Christian right before I post in r/atheism"
"How I felt right before I had sex for the first time"
"My Favorite Picture...EVER."
"What The Fuck"
"Guys  I think I reached the end of the internet..."
"Where can I find more of these?"
"Children getting hurt is not funny...well  maybe sometimes..."
"Seems like it..."
"Rape subject recently"
"Britains new military force"
"RickRossception... Looks like we got a badass over here (x-post form r/HipHopHeads)"
"When I diet and bust my ass at the gym for months and my fat coworker asks me how I lost all the weight."
"Happy Reddit family."
"The shortest distance between two points"
"GIB MONI PLOS"
"Said no one  ever."
"The Nitronic Four"
"Baby Polar Bear"
"Too Much Want"
"Accidentally clicking a starcraft link"
"This guy had the most offensive costume to reddit"
"Driving Like A Boss!!"
"How I feel discovering A &amp; J"
"For my cakeday! This is what I'll do for everyone in new!"
"Browsing Reddit on Adderall"
"The end of the Dinosaurs"
"Me looking at gonewild"
"Yellow Hurts"
"My first time playing Slender"
"Aogashima  Japan."
"When taking group pictures in school"
"The next Grand Theft Auto"
"SOON..."
"When I saw r/Gonewild for the first time"
"When people try to talk to me while I'm playing a video game"
"When people try to talk to me in the middle of a game"
"Forever alone"
"How being single for a long time feels"
"Attorneys on Reddit. When I think of an attorney on reddit this is what I think of. Anybody else with me."
"Any argument you had is pretty much invalid now."
"You know you're embarrassed that you get this joke"
"laughing at this more than I should"
"Of course..."
"So the AP Calc exam is tomorrow and this is all I have learned..."
"Happy German Beer Day Everybody!"
"What do you think of my gf"
"Ron Swanson"
"Crazy dog [gif]"
"Full Metal Brushie"
"One day  Simba  all of this will be yours!"
"The real Simba and Mufasa."
"My thought when my posts immediately get downvoted."
"I could use some of these  I've got a toothache in my nose."
"Good. For. You"
"That's enough internet for today. (Kinda NSWF? Possible re-post)"
"Whenever my comment starts to get a lot of upvotes and then Imgur moves it to /r/funny"
"Welcome to Reddit..."
"The importance of focal length. [xpost from /r/photography]"
"Some parts of the song work really well. While others no so much."
"Laugh Suppression: A daily struggle for working Redditors"
"Just Steve Carell"
"TIL Ke$ha looks EXACTLY like John Travolta"
"Dammit."
"This would be enough to scare the shit out of me."
"Most awesome toilet!"
"The moon is angry ...."
"My worst nightmare.."
"Looks like I am staying inside for rest of my life."
"That's it. I'm moving to mars."
"Can't.. describe.. in.. words... [x-post from gifs]"
"Cobert needed more energy!"
"Sloths"
"Just want to make sure you know this exists [FIXED]"
"Lets not."
"It's my cake day."
"You know it's true."
"Chewbacca fighting Nazis!"
"How the war was really won"
"Hipster Cat"
"I think I'll just snuggle right here"
"Nike's new NFL pants don't leave enough to the imagination"
"So many cute cats:D"
"How I feel after eating at the cafeteria again for the first time in two month.."
"The Old Lifting the New"
"is a MacBook an instrument?"
"It makes more sense now"
"I present #2Termz"
"I Still Laugh at This Picture Everytime I See It."
"Too soon  even ten years later."
"How I feel waking up thinking I'm going to have a productive Monday."
"Best face...uh body swap? I know"
"Simple Perspective"
"My &quot;little&quot; pony"
"Some brony carting around a woman."
"atom (&lt;-- name of song)"
"after discovering /r/gonewild"
"How I imagine what most of you look like comming out of the house"
"x"
"Mike  you fucking piece of shit!"
"PLEASED TO MEET  I AM RUSSIA"
"Danish sausage."
"Strafing in Black Mesa"
"Rob wants to give you a high five..."
"Mom helping her daughter with a dance routine."
"Harbinger"
"Isn't she a bit young?"
"What goes though my head when AM POSTING ON BRAVERYJERK"
"turbulance!"
"A proud American tradition."
"Nemo 33: The world's deepest swimming pool"
"I Hate this Time of Year. They're Everywhere!"
"After playing Mortal Kombat 9 on Expert"
"How it really is"
"The truth behind saying grace.."
"Cat Ops"
"Cakeday Hypnocat wants upvotes"
"Just another Dawkins quote; they never disappoint"
"Come on  guys!"
"This is how you know the sex was amazing. (SFW)"
"Like a glove"
"Epic parking job"
"The Mayan's got something right."
"The Mayans got something right. (X-post r/funny)"
"Proof the Mayans can predict the future"
"Li'l Wayne/ Mayan Art"
"I present.... The poodle moth"
"Gargoyle + Furby = Poodle Moth"
"Parenting Level: Non-Existent"
"Parenting Level: Non-Existent [gif]"
"My reaction when factions are complaining about being raided and griefed."
"Ghost Rider"
"I'll just leave this here..."
"They see me rollin.."
"Seeing The Person Who Knifed You In Battlefield 3."
"How I feel once my boss leaves the room"
"Saw that little cake symbol by my name for the first time.. Made an album of my favorite things on the internet in the past couple of months. Enjoy  and thanks for a great year!"
":)"
"The real reason why Nokias are indestructible"
"After a two week long family vacation."
"Reddit after no fap September."
"How I'm going to feel like after No-Fap September"
"Always the superior choice."
"A nice refreshing cup of..."
"Yes  this is real"
"Oh man  it's true..."
"Recursive apple drop"
"When I go to through a grenade in CoD"
"All two and a half hours of The Dark Knight Rises...put into one gif"
"The Dark Knight Rises alternate ending"
"How most of my time writing essays is spent."
"How I feel trying to write my three term papers."
"Penny Pyramid using over 289 000 pennies"
"Nic Cage Unleashed"
"Too much cute. I died."
"When you see it."
"It's ok they're harmless  right?"
"Baby Lion Proud Walk (fixed) ...get it?"
"Life lessons from The Legend of Zelda"
"What it feels like getting your first few downvotes as a user"
"Best gif ever."
"Must fight back against hot air..."
"How I look air drumming to &quot;In the Air Tonight&quot; (reposted gif from http://bit.ly/RxqiG3)"
"Does r/wtf like cows?"
"Were gonna need a montage"
"We're gonna need a montage"
"Do you like me? Do you like the way I play?"
"Focus Cat"
"I Don't Even.....NSFW"
"OP tries LSD"
"Apple Pro Mouse"
"Even the Cop would say NOT BAD on the safety of your Volkswagen Beetle"
"For those of us without talent  a camera  or cute animals."
"Ladies and Gentlemen  today I conquered the friendzone"
"trying to stop an argument on youtube"
"I Got This!!"
"So yeah… Just get a good picture of me standing in front of this building…"
"To all the &quot;Animal Armor&quot; posting guys and girls:"
"When I see redditors eagerly pointing out a repost."
"For my cake day  I present this gif..."
"My reaction to this debacle between karmanaut and SW."
"How I feel as a straight person who supports gays on gay pride posts..."
"What I think when I see an annoying status on Facebook [Also First post"
"Every time I see Charlie Sheen in the news"
"You mad  ball?"
"Chewbacca Dog: A/C Blown Dry Hair and a little Gel  Wah Lah"
"GTFO of my house  bitch."
"When your post gets a lot of upvotes  but everyone in the comments hates it"
"Looking for a new computer  this is how I feel seeing the specifications and not being very techy."
"I tried watching V for Vendetta..."
"Looking at my Steam library after the sale"
"As somebody who is in a basic Japanese class while playing through a Japanese copy of Pokemon Black 2  I feel like this."
"A real transformer."
"Various types of monsters"
"Well shit..."
"This is how genetics work"
"Every dog in existence"
"Every dog  everywhere"
"The grass is always greener."
"My uptoking scheme at a [5] (X-post form gifs)"
"This just... Works"
"Exclusive footage of Congress Republicans trying to repeal Obamacare"
"Nothing like beating a dead meme"
"It's cool dad  I got this"
"Don't touch the lava!"
"How I felt walking into the library this morning at the start of finals week"
"My Reaction to the Quote Bandwagon"
"My reaction to this shitty_watercolour + karmanaut debacle"
"Something's wrong with this picture."
"Current pic of &quot;Beans&quot; from Even Stevens. I was hoping he would only be weird as a small child."
"Darth Vader secretly listens to ABBA"
"Playing Solo Que over the weekend"
"No..no..slenderman is no here..[X-post from r/slender_man]"
"That bathroom could use some Lemon Pledge [x-post from r/slenderman]"
"No no. You come back later."
"There ya go."
"Eight-year old Make-A-Wish child Janiya Penny reacts after meeting President Barack Obama as he welcomes her family to the Oval Office."
"I think I'm mentally scarred for life after seeing this."
"If I see one more post about Rhodes in /r/funny."
"Look who I ran into today!"
"The best sounding trucks on the road"
"British humor at its best"
"Fancy Dress Ball  1894: Bacon"
"How I feel after browsing r/atheism for a while."
"reddit lately..."
"How I feel about Reddit as of late."
"Probably so..."
"How I feel as a cat trying to have a good time."
"Whenever I hear someone complain about hearing another language at my University."
"Irony"
"Cute ass duck."
"just a tap"
"Double Face."
"He's real!"
"Call of Duty in a Nutshell"
"Call Of Duty in one gif.."
"Call Of Duty In A Nutshell"
"Where is your god now?"
"Fuck your rules society. This is how I roll."
"Okcupid has some classy fellas."
"Discovering the world"
"Wait... what?! Mind blown."
"Quite a neckbeard"
"blast into shop (check) punch and intimidate partons (check) ostrich accomplices (check) – what is this?"
"How I feel getting closer to 10 000 karma."
"The first time I saw boobs in real life"
"no time for explanation. get on the horse!"
"So I Googled Cats Riding Horse..."
"When an Ex tells me they want me back."
"When an ex want's to &quot;patch things up&quot;"
"Every time I see &quot;Need Humanity&quot; in Dark Souls..."
"General Catton reads up on strategy."
"But then again  we knew they've been plotting something"
"Almost making it to the front page."
"This guy should have died"
"boink boink boink boink"
"haters gonna hate"
"How I feel never getting upvotes"
"True gangsta. [FIXED]"
"The Myth of Sisyphus' Cat"
"Tebow wins: tebow posts.everywhere /Tebow loses: Tebow posts.everywhere"
"Douchbags  meet your god."
"Just The Tip"
"Woody Harrelson AMA"
"To sell propane  you must become propane"
"Propane."
"To sell propane  you must become propane."
"'Oppa Gotham Style'"
"Feeling skeptical?"
"how fat cats must exercise"
"Posting 6 days late for my cakeday."
"Walking into Mcdicks at a [6] with more than $5"
"When you walk into McDonald’s with more than five dollars:"
"How I felt when an all-out classroom war between atheists and christians started"
"When my girlfriend tells me her period is over"
"When I'm gaming online and someone is AFK"
"Kids asleep  wife has a glass of wine"
"How I picture people that &quot;like&quot; newly single relationship statuses on Facebook."
"when it's my boyfriend's turn to be the small spoon"
"MINE"
"Dogs are assholes"
"Life's a bitch"
"Today's my birthday and this is how I feel having two tests."
"This has been my Cake Day so far..."
"'Merica"
"Finally a store getting it right!"
"Eruption and Lightning"
"Operation Bukakke is a go."
"Seal"
"Seal"
"I heard you liked Seal..."
"Whaa?"
"So I googled &quot;seal&quot;..."
"Bear go home you are drunk"
"Drunk bear"
"Yo  Kanye!"
"Never have I wanted to hug a fish so much."
"Just a picture of a baby puffer fish..."
"The all new  ipad NANO!"
"This was sent to me on my phone by a random number..."
"A new kind of face-swap"
"My friend found this turtle while on her internship. Please start cutting these."
"On Lord Howe Island black rats made tree lobsters extinct  now 2001 scientists discovered 24 still living ones under a bush on a small&amp;rocky island &quot;Ball's Pyramid&quot; and resurrected the former population in Melbourne Zoo [624x833]"
"Star Wars Crayons"
"He didn't choose the taco life  the taco life chose him"
"Googled Crazy Nicolas Cage"
"Bubble: Mid-Burst"
"Lightning rod in action"
"Lightning rod"
"Comedy much?"
"Orphaned kitten pushing his stepbrother"
"So  this one time  Wilt Chamberlain  Arnold Schwarzenegger  and Andre the Giant..."
"Come on doctor help me quick"
"Just One More Theory..."
"maybe it wasn't a meteor that killed the dinosaurs..."
"Will Arnett's feelings about his marriage"
"What..."
"Instant aww"
"All of my aww."
"How to milk a sheep"
"forreal doe."
"HIFW my friends try to make meme jokes to impress girls we're with"
"How I feel moving from my twin sized bed to my boyfriend's queen size bed"
"I just wanted to eat some chips."
"Showing up to a party being the only girl..."
"Life is like a box of chocolates"
"As if we needed more reasons to love Sir Ian McKellen"
"Never say no to Panda! (a repost of course  but cleaned up)"
"A couple of dudes playing with computers"
"What goes on in my head when someone intimidating walks my way."
"There's just something about cats and boxes"
"Liberty!"
"Televangelists through the Danger Zone - [3:31]"
"Every damn night."
"Changes everything"
"The lost sport of freestyle dirigibles."
"What goes through my head moments before giving an upvote"
"Wait for me guys!"
"All of my attempts at the front page"
"Well shit."
"POW! Right In The Kisser"
"You WILL upvote."
"Corgi food"
"How I felt when the UPS guy finally walked up to my door with the package I've been waiting all week for."
"No plans for Spring Break? Time to play this little gem again......"
"How I picture people when they fight on reddit."
"As an employee at a restaurant  this is how I feel when eating for half price at my home branch."
"What is this New York Times you speak of?"
"After a long day on Reddit."
"This is me trying to work this morning."
"What I do when I'm alone"
"How it felt hitting the FRONT page"
"How a key works gif [xpost from mildlyinteresting]"
"Come at me bro ..... I said  come at wait  no  smshsjjfjslk."
"You're telling me I'm not front page material? Well then.."
"He's the hero this city needs..."
"Remembered the gif while listening to the song."
"when someone tells me I can't do something  then I do it."
"Some things can't be explained"
"I fear for humanity."
"Guy get 137$ speeding ticket and brings them 137 dollar bills folded into pigs in dunkin donut boxes"
"Be nice to the kitty or else...."
"Little boy slaps cat. Cat KO's HIM."
"Is that treat for me!?"
"When I'm drunk and want to get my girlfriend in the mood..."
"Walking into the living room after a house party"
"Scientists"
"Atheist Last Supper"
"The Last Supper [Fixed]"
"Cute Little Animal"
"Did anyone else see this on Channel 4's Paralympic coverage?"
"I think channel four may need to start double checking which txts they show during the olympics."
"So this popped up during the Paralympics"
"Saw this while watching the paralympics last night!"
"Channel 4: Leaders in thought provoking debate."
"I would like to share with you all the most reposted image I have seen in my time at reddit. It's been reposted for good reason."
"COD in real life."
"When my friend posts things he sees on reddit to facebook and acts all cool and stuff i'm all like"
"This is how I feel when I'm told I'm going to &quot;Hell&quot;. [Fixed]"
"When they told me God exists.... (x-post from /r/funny)"
"Whenever someone who doesn't believe LGBT people should have equal rights tells me they have gay friends..."
"&quot;NBC's coverage is appalling. I'm boycotting the rest of the Olympics!!&quot;"
"When dumb bitches give me a sarcastic thumbs up."
"My reaction when people who post on Reddit claim they also post on 9gag"
"Beeye"
"I agree Anteater  screw Denny's and there shitty grand slam breakfast"
"Punchline in the title  tiny gangsters"
"When They Were Young..."
"Not funny"
"Oh Suh'nap"
"A+"
"Pre-test at ASU  from FB"
"A+ for creativity (xpost from fb)"
"SOON..."
"...what are you up to in there? Actually  never mind me..."
"The giant poster of insults"
"A weird creation of mine called &quot;Are you feeling the LSD now  Mr. Krabs?&quot;"
"Lil' Wayne"
"That´s not how you should eat it"
"Morgan Freeman as Count Dracula"
"Chocolate? CHOCOLATE?! CHOOOOOCOLATE!!!!!!"
"mmmmm... Chocolate death"
"How I feel when adding my comment to a post from the front page."
"Spinning  spinning  spinning..."
"Let me join you"
"FALCON PUNCH!!!"
"Winter is coming..."
"Gets me every single time"
"When I fart in a car full of other people."
"Putting my headphones on when a cashier gets overly chatty."
"Maybe the Devil does it!"
"the advantages of being colorblind."
"Strolling through the interwebs when suddenly"
"I think we know who is in charge here"
"Waking up to realize that after one long year of waiting  my cake day has finally arrived."
"Little Honey Braaaaaiiiiiins"
"o.O"
"The faces of Jim Carrey"
"WE must fight!"
"My reaction to my alarm going off at 6am"
"Those damn penguins..."
"WHAT DID I MISS?!"
"Fuck 5pm"
"The 5 symptoms of laziness"
"I think im lazy"
"I find this gif of the Beatles is kinda creepy."
"Whenever I Accidentally Open an Adobe Program"
"Me after getting on r/gifs and there is nothing but overused re-posts"
"A view of space shuttle Endeavor's flight deck"
"Don Diego de la Vega"
"As someone with a fear of sharks  this makes me feel better."
"I'M A THARK!!"
"After browsing r/aww  it's usually kittens and puppies. I decided to findsomething 'different'. I searched 'cute sharks' on google images. It seems Sharks with big teeth are adorable."
"We're gonna need a bigger dentist"
"Shark with human teeth... Don't know any better way to explain it really.."
"shit just got real"
"cobra cat !!!!!!!!!!!!"
"Dude!"
"I was under the impression this was worth karma?"
"There are no words to describe this..."
"How I feel when I catch flies in my flypaper"
"Shame on you McDonald's!"
"You'll be forever in our hearts &lt;3"
"Every Skiers worst fear"
"Slut"
"This showed up on my news feed. Good point  Christians."
"Checkmate atheists."
"reposted but funny (yeah I don't care it's the internet and I missed it)"
"Christians 1 Atheists 0"
"Short week and already Friday?"
"Every time I get an upvote"
"A week later  what I remember from New Years Eve."
"Whenever a rather up-beat song comes on"
"Me after I saw my random comment got over 1400 upvotes."
"Happy Birthday Mr. Swanson!"
"Just hit 300 karma. Celebration!"
"Me after I hit 1000 karma points"
"My feelings about finding out that my new roommate I was paired with is also a redditor"
"/r/gonewild in a nutshell"
"Politics Made Easy."
"This man must be elected."
"She Comes First"
"Waiting for gif of reddit alien beating up Woody Harrelson"
"I can watch this for hours"
"Imp hand strong"
"White people..."
"Our Savior has come"
"The baddest parrot of them all!"
"She is pregnant."
"I've had this gif for over a year. Never been able to find an appropriate title."
"Real Life Buzz Lightyear (amazing CG art)"
"This is genius. (x-post r/foodporn)"
"The day that lambs become lions"
"Go home flamingo"
"She's a real....dick"
"WTF on so many levels... I couldn't stop laughing at #7."
"Thirsty?"
"We are all born with a hole in our chest..."
"Check all your dollars!"
"Stitches to repair a corneal tear"
"Saw this in my news feed"
"And if you'll look out the left window you'll see..."
"Bad idea."
"Would you like to piss to this"
"All over the place (slightly NSFW)"
"This cracks me up whenever I watch it."
"Meanwhile  In Ireland."
"Take this Twilight lovers!"
"Upgrading from a 16&quot; 1280x800 laptop to my new 21&quot; 1920x1080 desktop"
"I just reformatted my computer for the first time in like 6 months... This is what it feels like"
"ERMAHGERD  PERMPKERN SPERCE!!!"
"Me next  me next!"
"Koi-magnet"
"He's about to take off!!"
"Hello nightmares!"
"The best homer quote."
"Did you know? (x-post from 4chan)"
"No. Stop. You're done. Your time on the internet is over. [GIF]"
"No  human. That's enough computer for now. It's time to play with me"
"Baby Porcupine or Hedgehog?"
"Hi  I'm Grandma and Welcome to Jackass."
"Just a gif of Mitt Romney with a small face..."
"Doom"
"Proper English"
"Mitt Romney bending over in front of an elementary student."
"No fap September???"
"When people start talking about applying for colleges around me"
"Happy cross section tissue of a marram grass leaf"
"Every time I say something negative about WoW"
"Me and my girlfriend when my two friends (who just broke up and hate each other) unknowingly made plans to hang out with us on the same day"
"Photo of researchers as they try to approach giant panda Taotao and its mother Caocao in Wolong National Nature Reserve"
"Oh  Windows - The irony hurts."
"Whenever I find an onion ring in my order of fries"
"How I feel after finally finding my favorite guitar pick."
"Man getting hit by train."
"Dude... What..."
"Funniest part of GOP convention"
"The placement tells the story"
"Well  I know where I'll be doing my back to school shopping.."
"Say CHEESE!"
"Say Cheese"
"This Is How Sponge-Bob Really Looks Like"
"What girl fights mostly consist of"
"After the controversy on Monday night  the NFL has announced some rules changes!"
"The Current NFL Rulebook"
"I hate it when this happens to me [Comic]"
"Oh yeah"
"How I felt the first time i sat on a squishy toilet seat"
"Miracle at local ABC liquor."
"Just stare at the black dot..."
"I don´t remember the last time I laughed this hard at a Simpsons gif"
"The secret to hapiness"
"how i feel after submitting a link with a spelling error"
"Best Complaint Jar Ever!"
"Complaint jar"
"'merica [fixed]"
"My first cake day has arrived and this is how I celebrate..."
"For my cakeday here is my favorite gif!"
"I'm not a fan of bangs either  crazy Asian lobster lady"
"arcs of plasma forming during discharge of the Z machine in Albuquerque"
"Horrific Phallic Wormhole (remember dem roots?) [NSFL]"
"explanation of black holes"
"Can't stop watching this"
"Your reaction when your post is getting upvotes"
"How I feel after getting 10 upvotes on a post."
"When something I upvoted in r/new makes it to the front page"
"Last saw my SO in June  thought I would next be seeing him in April. Just found out he will be able to visit in January! Just had to share my happy"
"9 More Until 100 Link Karma  For That  My Favorite gif"
"Kind-of Makes Sense"
"Reminded me of when the Great Fairies pop out of the water. (x-post from r/gifs)"
"For Spartaaaah!"
"Not even sure what I'm looking at"
"Please...For God Sake!"
"As an American  these are my thoughts on every single candidate running for President."
"When I see someone watching Twilight:The Movie"
"Mission Accomplished."
"Hilarious clip from I Don't Know How She Does It starring Sarah Jessica Parker"
"Horse Fail"
"HOERSES"
"How my first kiss went"
"George Lucas face says it all....Like the R2D2 touch though."
"This is the coolest night-lamp I've ever seen."
"Accidentally stumbled onto r/spacedicks"
"That awkward moment when u went in the wrong door......."
"Jesus annoys"
"I don't want to live on this planet anymore"
"Trying to get to the front page"
"cat jumping fail"
"In honor of David Hasselhoff's birthday  I present to you... my favorite gif"
"Dogs carrying a box - just brilliant!"
"Costume award goes tooooooo"
"So true."
"Dancing Queen"
"when i don't delete a comment downvoted below threshold"
"Over the last year I have grown lazy  anti-social  unproductive  desensitized  and developed a very crude/unusual sense of humor all because of this website."
"As of today  I have spent 3 years slacking on reddit. Here is how I feel"
"After spending a year on reddit  I have learned many things as well as nearly losing a social life but in the end..."
"Cakeday on NYE"
"Whenever I am sitting on public transit"
"MFW I walk past a mirror and see that my facial hair has passed the &quot;lazy&quot; and into &quot;grizzled&quot; territory"
"My friends reaction when I told him it was my cake day."
"My face after shortly watching Olympic Women's Volleyball."
"Giving someone I just met approval after hearing them talk about something they saw on reddit."
"Slave Leia and her stunt double sunbathing. If this re-post doesn't get me birthday karma  nothing will."
"&quot;Hey Boys&quot;"
"This single wordless illustration caused me to question my religion years ago  and birthed the proud atheist I am today. Wanted to share it"
"A simpler time"
"Remember  remember  the 5th of November."
"What a nice statue... WAIT A MINUTE!"
"Have We Learned Nothing?"
"He was just trying to help out."
"No more yolo for me."
"Dat Girl"
"We all know that feel (x-post from facepalm)"
"87 people died...(fb)"
"Saw this on Facebook. You're doing it wrong"
"Baby sloths at breakfast"
"Nintendo: please make this game happen on the Wii U!"
"Thief!"
"Sounds about right"
"Night of the walking Gameboy!"
"Cmom"
"After days of searching and not being able to find any Generator  UPS or power inverter this is how i am going to face Hurricane Sandy"
"The agony of defeat"
"My post stalled at 5 up votes again..."
"Meanwhile on Tumblr..."
"Those darn birds"
"That awkward moment..."
"Awkward..."
"How I feel when I see my friend's posts on reddit"
"I turned 18 today. This is pretty much the only thing on my mind."
"What's the score?"
"ping  pong  ping  pong"
"Infinite Ping-Pong Cats"
"Cookies!!!!"
"How I feel when opening the Steam Store lately"
"I laughed way too hard at this."
"When I came home to over 2000 karma."
"haha"
"C&amp;H knows how we work"
"I feel like every redditor has had this conversation before"
"I'm pretty sure he's on Reddit"
"My face when I realized how much I owe in student loans."
"The Hot Tub Tug Boat"
"The origin of Seems Legit"
"This pretty much sums up my feelings for my cakeday"
"My friend said  &quot;You've wasted a year on that Reddit site  how do you feel?&quot;...I showed him this."
"Am I doing it right?"
"Pizza for everyone!!!"
"My reaction after a week without seeing my boyfriend."
"It's.. It's terrifying."
"Guitar Lessons"
"One step  two step  three step.. Wait."
"My Precious"
"Everyone on r/IAmA right now..."
"This are Mcnuggets before getting fried."
"The Badass 1920's"
"never mess with his woman !"
"What happens when you take my seat."
"Today Voyager 1 turns 35."
"GREETINGS  HUMAN. TAKE ME TO YOUR LEADER  SO THAT I MAY PRESENT TO HIM THE HAIRBALL OF OUR PEOPLE."
"Breaking it to friends about my reddit karma..."
"You spin me right round...."
"Dachshund DJ [Crosspost from r/gifs]"
"It's shit like this  people on Facebook!"
"My god  these fb &quot;like or else&quot; pictures are getting kind of out of hand.."
"Sorry Granny  but I don't negotiate with terrorists."
"Its funny if you think of it as a threat"
"Is it just me  or is Facebook getting more aggressive?"
"This is the reason I'm leaving Facebook"
"I think these Facebook &quot;like&quot; photos are getting a little too extreme"
"So I don't like my grandma acording to my Facebook..."
"I logged into Facebook  and this was the first thing on my newsfeed ಠ_ಠ"
"What the fuck Facebook?!"
"Really fb? Really?"
"Everybody Dance the Ditto Conga!"
"When my wife is purposely trying to start an argument"
"Me after I realize I'm reading a post about religion or politics"
"When you see your ex at a party"
"When the doorbell rings and it's my in-laws..."
"My cat likes to play mind games"
"Come at me  Gaben!"
"Photoshop potential"
"Photoshop level: 4chan"
"Masters of photoshop"
"How I feel when someone's GIF doesn't match their post title."
"I must protect my people"
"I must protect my people"
"Surprise Smashing"
"My Girlfriend just informed me that she bought yoga shorts"
"Map:If a countries population was relative to it's size"
"Hitler self shot"
"CD mosaic of Freddie Mercury"
"Maybe one day this will be our view from the moon? [FIXED]"
"Seems legit..."
"Like A Boss"
"looks like... i have have made a bad post."
"Carlton's Bipolar Duality"
"I installed Reddit Enhancement Suite onto my computer at work today."
"iPod problems"
"Aberdeen coast gets a major foaming"
"Just a Jesus candle"
"Just a Jesus Candle"
"So these are being sold in LA right now..."
"Poor Snake."
"All ages event in Toronto..."
"What the hell is going on here?"
"Rednecks."
"Vancouver bus advertisement"
"This is a wasp."
"Nice Battlestation Dude"
"Challenge accepted"
"Not a kitten  but he's still pretty darn cute."
"My reaction to missing my Cake Day yesterday"
"Rejection."
"Ronald Raygun"
"I didnt ask for this!"
"The World's Narrowest House"
"A bumper sticker for the physics enthusiast..."
"That's what I call a weiner dog!"
"Soon"
"Roshambo Win"
"Optical Illusion [PIC]"
"I can't stop awwing"
"I can stare at this picture all day."
"Interesting fact..."
"sweetie eat your food before it gets cold."
"Jedi Olympics"
"Collapsed Shark Tank"
"The shark tank at The Scientific Center in Kuwait collapsed."
"I think I'll just use the elevator."
"To battle!!!"
"Are we there yet?"
"How i feel after reading to much comments."
"What I feel like when ever I start talking to girls..."
"My drive to work tripled this week because of school starting up. This is how I felt the entire time."
"After losing track of a girl I liked at party"
"The supreme leader"
"When I see a post on the front page thats not 2 hours old and doesn't have 70 comments yet"
"Muhammad Ali dodging 5 punches in a row - slow motion."
"Free blowjob anyone?"
"LOL. ZZZ."
"How I imagine my stoner friends are feeling right now"
"Free wifi yes please."
"Basically every conspiracy theorist I've ever spoken to"
"What's so strange about garlic?"
"I can never remember names. This is my new excuse."
"I found this gem in r/4chan."
"What the actual fuck?"
"Found This On an Animal Research Site"
"I see Samsung's done an ad to have a dig at the iPhone 5  but most people that want to buy it see it like this:"
"Be Like Han"
"Take chances  make mistakes...and get messy?"
"Seeing that I'm an avid fan of both cartoons.. I don't know how I missed this."
"When my girlfriend tells me about an argument she's having with her mom"
"Oh... today is your cake day? I didn't realize..."
"Me after finding the exit in IKEA yesterday"
"HIFW I woke up at 11 pm"
"Waking up this morning during a power outage and my phone dead"
"Had a fever yesterday where I spent most of the day *attempting* to sleep and vomiting. This is how I feel waking up starving as shit"
"Bird vengeance"
"at 20 i find this terrifying  I don't know how kids can do it"
"Thought you Ents would like this"
"What program does one use to create a gif like this one?"
"If Only Everything in Life was as Reliable as a Jordan"
"Phil Jackson said LeBron has the tools to be better than MJ. Here is Michael's reaction."
"Long Yellow Things"
"We are all atheists"
"One fewer god than you."
"I'm sure its a repost  but this is easily my favorite /r/atheism image"
"Assassin’s Creed Jacket!"
"The Best Engine in the World"
"World's smallest elephant he is fighting for his life because he is so small so give this lil dude some love"
"The Reddit Football Game"
"Halloween isn't fun for all"
"No laser pointers please."
"I cry everytime"
"lalwut"
"One of my good friends just told me she thought Justin Bieber was better than Queen and Led Zeppelin combined..."
"I missed my cake day.."
"Mike McCarthy's reaction after last night's game..."
"When I See An Original Post...."
"MERICA!"
"Damn  I was so hopeful."
"Science flies you to the moon  religion flies you into buildings."
"This might just be the saddest doodle I've ever seen"
"Perpetuum mobile"
"Parenting"
"Cat + Slide = cute"
"This picture never fails to make me laugh. Stumbled upon it again today."
"A classic that gets me every time"
"The first gay doll for everyone!"
"Well tuned glasses"
"Monday Mornings"
"This morning  after a night of whiskey"
"Being Bill Murray..."
"Yesterday was Bill Murray's birthday  and to celebrate here's him in the best role of his career"
"Animals' reactions to being placed inside a cardboard box"
"________ in a box!"
"How did i not know this..."
"Colin is sexy and he knows it."
"Collin knows how to walk."
"How I feel after my last class on Fridays"
"Perfect match IMO"
"My non-redditor friend  when I told him that it's my cakeday."
"~ The Lion King ~"
"Care Status: NULL"
"Chocolate From Every Orifice"
"The latest superhero on the block"
"When someone posts a pointless gif to facebook or twitter"
"I agree with this."
"Einstein and his therapist."
"A pilot at Fairlop airfield in Essex has a haircut during a break between sweeps  November 1942."
"No matter what  Morgan Freeman is in charge."
"Oh Zeus!"
"No no no  THIS is my favorite .gif of all time."
"This is still my favorite .gif of all time"
"This is still my favorite .gif of all time"
"WW2 abridged (oldie  but goodie!)"
"Possibly the 2 best things combined"
"How I reacted to seeing Shitty_Watercolour's amount of karma"
"Probably why Spiderman didn’t make it into The Avengers"
"What gif do you never get tired of watching? Here's my favorite."
"Found this gem in r/downvotegif.Hope you enjoy"
"Oh CSI.."
"Oh dear..."
"When posts on Reddit restate a joke on T.V. with multiple screenshots of the scene and captions."
"My reaction when I found the new submissions tab."
"Whenever I hear Dubstep at a bar..."
"When a smelly person sits next to me on the bus"
"Clint Eastwood Face"
"Scumbag Cosby"
"Internet poke (probably repost but I dont know how to imange search to check)"
"Oh Harry..."
"POW! Right in the vagina (SFW)"
"Let me show you the meaning of haste  with force."
"A baby sloth hugging his stuffed giraffe"
"Atheists got it right (x-post from /r/atheism)"
"I thought you guys would enjoy this..."
"Reddit today."
"Obviously my mom was not using one."
"When someone makes it to the front page with my post"
"My face whenever I am losing in an argument."
"Face wobble."
"Kids TV was a lot weirder the other side of the Atlantic"
"Blissful shoes."
"As someone who owns 2 pairs of shoes  what I imagine a girl does everytime she buys another pair."
"How to swivel in a chair"
"Highway to the DANGERZONE!"
"What is this?"
"Went to the sprint store and this was a contact on one of the demo phones"
"owls  you creepy"
"god help us all"
"Just moved into a new room  found this  I know what I'm doing for the rest of the day."
"No Gangnam Style?"
"Definitely worth the read."
"Fuck the Police..."
"Fuck the police"
"I laughed pretty hard at this..."
"The Amazing Metal Kramer"
"every time i see a person on the road driving the same car as me."
"Me when I found out the highschool teacher I'm aiding for is a redditor."
"When someone gives me a single upvote"
"Not once  but Twice"
"Not once  but twice (x-post from r/funny)"
"Summary of The Internet"
"When somebody has a good idea on reddit"
"Holy mother of god!"
"Batcatman"
"Fox-Sama  do a barrel roll!"
"In your face!"
"Timing is everything."
"My ball sense is tingling."
"RIP. what will Murca Do Now?"
"asked my dog if he wanted to go for a walk"
"It's my reddit birthday  so here's a dancing otter"
"How I feel when the Women's Gymnastics event comes on"
"Swag level Otter"
"Step  Step Side to Side Round n Round"
"If you find an Atheist in your neighborhood....."
"Who doesnt love hugs?"
"The original karma whore."
"Ermagherd!"
"Just out of reach... (x-post from r/funny)"
"Shit happens"
"Logic"
"14 Delicious Cats"
"Facebook rage"
"Sweet"
"Glitter"
"Quick  Grab Me a Beer"
"My best friend after a night of heavy drinking"
"What is this called?! I need to do this."
"I want one!"
"Whenever I try to set a friend up with a girl..."
"I was having a steamy hot shower when I had to fart..."
"Andy Murray lol"
"Keep your eye on the ball…"
"You don’t control me  I control you  human"
"Please bitch  I'm the boss"
"Not Sure How I Feel About That Last One..."
"This Christmas...."
"This Christmas...."
"Parenting level: Close enough."
"How I feel when a new razor cartridge cuts me when I shave..."
"Pizza Cat (in space)"
"An educational journey"
"Cause it's yummie!"
"I tried that random Imgur thing  this is what came up first..."
"It's finally my cakeday so I present to you my findings. Home surgery [NSFW: GORE]"
"When my ex calls me saying her new boyfriend doesn't treat her well like I did[x-post /r/reactiongifs]"
"When I'm trying to hold my urine in public"
"My Girlfriend Said She Wanted To Try Anal"
"What on gods earth is going on!?!?"
"Interesting tattoo choice"
"WTF  Japan? Seriously. [NSFW]"
"Worst. Tattoo. Ever."
"i guess she's into pedophiles? (NSFW)"
"Uhhh...cool tattoo"
"Always makes me laugh"
"This image simultaneously makes me hopeful and excited. 2 days 15 hours 37 minutes to go!"
"My new favorite Samuel L Jackson gif"
"Jules plays Guess Who"
"Yep  sounds about right."
"As more seniors graduate this seems relevant"
"Maybe the French aren't so bad after all (just stumbled across this)"
"It's a couple days late  but here's more on why Americans should not hate the French..."
"I got a buddy who knows about this kinda thing  let me give him a call and see if we can work out a deal..."
"Googled &quot;Nicolas Cage as a baby&quot; Give me Karma"
"Fuck this... I'm becoming a baby..... Fuck yeah...."
"So what do you do for a living?"
"This will always be my favorite meme"
"Basic day as a bear."
"The golden age of music [FIXED]"
"Rebellious Asian"
"Motherfucking Cthulhu"
"The dangers of online chat rooms."
"When someone makes you dance at a party infront of other people"
"Listening to Garbage when I opened this gif."
"Upboat if you hungry 4 waffles too!"
"Otter ball!"
"&gt;:("
"Hello Jerry.."
"This is how i feel after pay day"
"Just a hippopotamus pulled cart."
"Drink more water..."
"DJ's of reddit. I found something for your pets."
"11 days left"
"Instagram behind the scenes"
"Welcome to the internet  please follow me."
"This. Is. Reddit."
"This is the definition of Manliness"
"Reddit in one picture"
"Here comes the plane"
"BAM"
"What I do when I'm sitting in the hall between classes."
"One reason to vote Obama"
"Hoo boy  sports fans! You're in for an exciting matchup today!"
"I've never seen this on Reddit  but it seems too good to not-be a repost. Here's to the off chance."
"I guess it makes sense..."
"There can only be one M&amp;M..."
"Once I read all of /r/all..."
"Poor guy didn't know what hit him"
"Round 1: Fight!"
"FIGHT!"
"Test your might"
"Tiny Warriors"
"How I feel when someone at my work quits and I have to work overtime."
"When you realize you used the wrong formula to do all the work..."
"3 days into no fap September: &quot;I would..."
"My company will be shutting down at the end of Oct -- staring at definite unemployment  I turn to my favorite gif"
"When I have to work late on a Friday..."
"My attitude anywhere after the first five weeks of school"
"I just realized it's my cake day and I haven't got anything to post."
"I miss Michael Scott"
"When I downvote the post with 1 karma ruthlessly"
"just coasting along and posting one comment...."
"Mary-Kate Olsen with her 42 year old French boyfriend  Olivier Sarkozy..."
"It had dinosaurs with lasers  it was a pretty awesome show."
"My first time in a Walmart bathroom!"
"Sk8er 'Bama"
"me watching the opening scene of Savages"
"scumbag turtle"
"I've always been curious about how giraffes slept (Now I know) [PIC]"
"So I went to a random is.gd link  and this popped up"
"Glass shell crustacean"
"Hermit crab in a glass shell"
"Ghetto Mthafcka"
"69"
"A house in Ostend  Belgium"
"Obama's thoughts on Skyline Chili..."
"President Obama doing an AMA?"
"Oh shit!"
"Fuck"
"If i fits i...fuck"
"i can't stop laughing at this"
"How I Feel At The Gym"
"when you see it"
"OH GOD  CLUB ME NOW!"
"I want to meet his parents"
"How I feel trying to study for finals right now..."
"What posting a link late at night feels like..."
"How I feel when applying to jobs lately"
"New &quot;heavy load&quot; picture?"
"This is what i imagine the end of the world looks like"
"To the douche bag 35 year old bartenders more concerned with filling freshmen girls with Bud Lights than good service: Why I don't tip you."
"My girlfriend's reaction when I say something stupid in public."
"How I feel as a conservative Redditor  after several months on Reddit."
"My thoughts when reading Rage Comics"
"My thoughts when I first saw '2 Girls 1 Cup'."
"In my response to all these &quot;friend zones.&quot; I feel downvotes coming."
"Dad Rage comics"
"Every time I see &quot;WTF Brain?!?&quot; posts"
"The new r/atheism trend."
"Me today on f7u12"
"computer rage"
"My poor originality"
"Surprise!"
"This is confusing to me."
"I dont think im doing this right"
"Let's relive one of the highlights of the London 2012 Olympics"
"I love this man"
"Cheers"
"When I see a post on the front page that I saw in the new section"
"an easy way to watch Star Wars Episode IV"
"Suddenly  a Foot!"
"First time visiting /r/SpaceDicks (SFW)"
"Went to church with my mom this morning and this is how I felt during the service..."
"Wipeout"
"YOU WANT SOME OF THIS!?"
"Whenever I cross the street and someone honks their horn at me..."
"We're ready for your close up  Mr. Nope"
"Last night I had a dream that this guy was attacking the city"
"My ear broke"
"Hammertime"
"STOP....."
"Perfect Symmetry Kitties"
"Brotherly love!"
"A deformed white tiger"
"There are three kinds of people who watch movies..."
"There are three different kinds of people"
"How I feel after walking to work this morning..."
"Clearly legit  if you ask me."
"Just this hedgehog wearing a sombrero..."
"Found this picture of Emma Watson  and had to do a double take"
"Nailed it."
"Cat with existential crises."
"I don't even..."
"The Ol' Spicy Keychain"
"Dry Rot [gif]"
"When I'm camping and wake up in my sleeping bag."
"Just a squirrel I saw outside my house today."
"gotcha!"
"When I found out the president had the power to legalize weed by himself."
"A squirrel in a party hat."
"When my girlfriend talks about her period with her friends when I'm in the room."
"How to Avoid Jesus"
"Just a little Pug."
"Aurora Australis  seen from the International Space Station"
"Money is money"
"A picture's worth a thousand words."
"Toaster Grilled Cheese"
"Does this work?"
"Get Well Soon"
"Get well little guy."
"Maybe 9gag is better..."
"Wordless AND Pictureless Comic"
"imgur: the simple image sharer"
"Serenity 2 ( Perhaps more daunting )"
"I D G A F"
"I told my roommate I don't count the fourth Indiana Jones movie. She asked why and I said..."
"seeing someone do math without a calculator [FIXED]"
"Stepped outside for 5 minutes after washing my thick  wavy hair."
"After the GF stays the weekend  everywhere I look..."
"Didn't know how to tell my girlfriend so I just sent her this"
"When anything goes wrong in fleet..."
"Americans on today's shooting"
"This bear sure does love cocaine"
"How to conduct music."
"My first thought after seeing all these pictures from New York."
"Faith in Humanity: Shattered"
"That's it!"
"Before or after her untimely death?"
"I'm starting to question the fun in this game..."
"Everyone on Reddit."
"I plan on doing this next time I tip"
"OH! So we're posting fun ways to fold money now?"
"Mr. Rogers gets down"
"Not sure what to say about this..."
"Since a lot of people are posting the gifs from the /wsg/ thread over on 4chan  might as well post all of them"
"All of the gifs from the /wsg/ Infomercial thread over on 4chan  might as well post all of them"
"lightning reflected in water"
"Thumbs up from Jackie Chan."
"r/awww doesn't like my fish and I have no idear why."
"I know that feel..."
"We need more wet Koala Bears on /r/aww"
"WHAT puppy?"
"When my phone is ringing but I can't figure out where it is."
"Pulp who?"
"Marsellus Wallace?"
"The tech guys at work saved my docs after a hard drive crash. After I thought the 2 weeks of work since my last backup (I know  I know) was lost this is how I feel right now."
"I just got a job that is relevant to my major!!!!"
"Amateur Parkour"
"How I feel just getting home and my gf's friends are home."
"Emo Elephant"
"Sometimes when I post..."
"When you open a bunch of tabs and accidentally close Reddit..."
"How I felt when I realized I missed my cake day"
"My face when I missed my first Cake Day."
"How I feel when something I post gets down voted to oblivion on my cake day"
"Political discourse is important  but some comments just cross the line of basic human decency."
"2 girls  1 coffee maker"
"My 2year cake day celebration!"
"Skindred fans will know..."
"Dont Cha"
"Grff."
"How the USA feels when they don't medal in an event"
"A much needed sign"
"Caption this!"
"nowkiss.jpg"
"Team Work"
"After a few minutes on the bowl when nothings coming out."
"mommy and her spiderlets"
"Guess who's bad?"
"9th date"
"I made this. Dwight Schrute. The Office"
"I pity the fool who short changes the A-Team"
"Past the point of no return"
"How does this even move??"
"also popped up on newsfeed"
"Whenever a post is too long"
"Easily the coolest two frames in comic book history."
"So my GF painted this..."
"Sheldon Cooper in a reddit shirt( big bang theory)"
"The sink is clogged"
"Not enough rats on r/aww. Here's a hairless rat bathing himself."
"When I hear that a US senator wants to waste time investigating yet another sports scandal"
"we should be able to do this"
"He did it guys. It's possible."
"He did it!"
"Friendzone level: Broken"
"He did it!"
"HE DID IT!"
"Finally unfriendzoned!"
"Finally unfriendzoned!"
"HE DID IT!"
"Owl in Mid-Flight"
"petchuuuuu!!"
"Ninja Attack Squirrel"
"Just another night on the internet."
"Danny Trejo breaking his typecasting"
"Danny Trejo and a dove"
"It finally happened"
"EVERY Halloween."
"Googling &quot;got a light?&quot; yields very interesting result."
"I can't stop laughing at this..."
"Riding a horse ...like a baus."
"What just happened?"
"Why  because fuck physics."
"Sloth yawning"
"Googled amazing animal  wasn't disappointed..."
"Awwww??"
"FUCK TORNADOES"
"friend post this to facebook  I thought it deserved better"
"When fall comes to Oklahoma"
"hey goat  imma boop your head!"
"Forever alone level: asymmetrical breasts"
"Forever party hard"
"Exactly what it's like when my girlfriend is too tired to have sex...."
"When she just isn't really into it."
"How I feel after taking care of two hyperactive kids three days in a row"
"Not A Single Fuck Was Given"
"When people downvote one of my comments to oblivion  I don't delete it."
"How a girl must feel trying cowgirl for the first time. (Fixed.)"
"Korean comic about a prison break."
"When there's visitors round"
"soon"
"Me  every time a video stops to buffer..."
"Seeing an exam full of problems that weren't in the study guide"
"The first WTF in a long time to make me smile."
"I'd like to show this to some people."
"I just accidentally deleted a trending link"
"When I reply to a text message sent from my ex girlfriend"
"This is how I pitch new music to my friends..."
"Ridiculously Phonogenic Guy"
"Hanging out with my black friends."
"How I feel when introducing my friends to Dubstep"
"I discovered Reddit last year  and subsequently  Karma. For the past year I've been whoring karma left and right  I recently made it to 50k+  I took a moment to reflect on what it took to get there  and this is how I felt."
"When I visited 9gag and saw the memes from reddit yesterday."
"BOOM."
"Is that.....bad?"
"Train stations in Wales are A LOT friendlier!"
"For those who missed out before  this is a repost  but I love it so much."
"Brave Kitty"
"Steady..."
"I would love to read this book."
"Anti-Smoking Ad Fail"
"What if..."
"CHECKMATE"
"Intelligent design"
"Thought of this in holister today"
"DIII auction house"
"Me after hours of playing QWOP"
"getting up after sitting cross-legged and surfing for hours on reddit"
"So Sour-ful!"
"Aww shit....."
"Aww shit"
"Always practice safe fishing techniques"
"That stare"
"One hour left of work. Thinking about pulling one of these."
"How Tebow haters reacted to today's game"
"interesting James Bond statistic"
"can't be bothered to go and get tissues..."
"I'm married and I still do this."
"Fuck this guy &lt;---"
"Haha"
"Love It"
"Last night I farted in bed next to the guy I've been seeing(only the second time we slept together). This was my face."
"How I felt when I found out topless images of Kate Middleton were published today during no fap September"
"Nice try  but you can't mess with Chuck Norris."
"When I try to correct my teacher..."
"You all have to know"
"Beating Tetris"
"How to Beat Tetris"
"Beating tetris"
"4 in real life..."
"You will upvote this post."
"Ashley Ann Vickers"
"Well this is awkward..."
"What's Up  Doc?"
"First Post. I heard you like cats."
"The reddit coat. Just in time for winter"
"Not sure if awesome  or terrible..."
"Sarah Jessica Parker Photobomb"
"Just another photobomb."
"I just don't get tired of this gif"
"Did someone say cake?"
"This probably belongs here."
"Cyber Bullying"
"Catrate"
"How the dinosaurs died"
"How I feel when I hit my ingrown toenail"
"How I felt when my friend told me I could have Reeses for breakfast"
"How I feel in Europe watching hurricane Sandy unfold."
"My local boardwalk and amusement park after Sandy"
"Cat Mario 2.0 Gameplay - The troll of gaming (info in comments)"
"&quot;It's a good thing that emotional scars are invisible...&quot; - Doug Benson"
"PARTY ON ISLE 15!!!"
"After finding a post that brightens your day"
"Amazing picture from Libya."
"Mother Nature Smiles..."
"Happy bird..... Happy bird...."
"How to fail a perception check"
"Kill it with fire"
"The power of the Space Shuttle taking off captured in all its glory [1920x1277]"
"because olympics"
"Dem teeth (hyperdontia)"
"must take forever to floss"
"I am both entranced and repulsed."
"Batman."
"cool batman pic"
"This is my friend every time we say a curse word around him"
"Looking at all the comments in r/gonewild... even as an Atheist"
"Album of a dog being raped by a horse [NSFW]"
"Picture of an ex-drug cartel's dismembered body getting sexually assaulted by a dog wearing a horse mask while other cartel members stand around ejaculating. NSFW"
"A+ advertisement!"
"Well I guess I'm addicted to using my stopwatch."
"I see your stopwatches and raise you my lapcounter."
"I have you beat  sir."
"Paula Deen riding bacon-wrapped hot dogs."
"What the US uniforms should have been [FIXED]"
"Go home snail..."
"He had to catch em all"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder [1280×960]"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder [1280×960]"
"Jumbo sized swag."
"Found this gem"
"Everyday is a struggle"
"Whoopi Goldberg in a Bathtub filled with milk."
"Like I give a fuck"
"When I am told about celebrity news"
"My reaction to hate comments on a 100+ karma post"
"Live action QWOP"
"True"
"The Doctor Dances to Daft Punk"
"Let's get ready to rumble!"
"Making a real difference where it's needed"
"Go H.A.M. I must"
"Extreme landscape shot"
"When I feel like someone is following me"
"Sorry."
"Checkmate Atheists! (xpost 4chan)"
"How I propose America should deal with the Casey Anthony verdict..."
"Marlon Brando with his laptop and cat"
"ROFL"
"Oh yes  the attack of the giant clothespin."
"Just so that strong breeze doesn't take off land with it"
"I have the desire to do this all the time  just not the balls"
"Always be yourself"
"How i look when watching a horror movie with girls as something &quot;scary&quot; is shown"
"The average 4chan user"
"Anyone knows where this gif is coming from?"
"Two thirds of my department just got laid off..."
"Fly Butt"
"WAIT! It's dangerous out there  take one of these"
"You will never get this lucky"
"today is the greatest"
"WOMBO COMBO! (Idea from /r/funny)"
"Making art out of something you'll burn."
"Driving down the road when suddenly..."
"xpost from pics... but super epic... airforce graduation"
"When I noticed it's my very first cakeday"
"Goin through the Cow Wash"
"Jesus Dog"
"Jesus dog didn't died for your sins."
"Nice Catch"
"................ Yes"
"Best thing to do when being interviewed on Fox"
"When you are about to fall asleep and your calf muscles seize."
"A True Gentleman on a Segway"
"A True Gentleman rides a Segway"
"And.. This is why I never walked to school"
"And yes it comes in black."
"Obama should use this as a campaign ad"
"'Murica[fixed]"
"nomnomnom"
"Baby Turtle  eating a strawberry (So Cute)"
"He'll get it next time."
"&quot;da fuck is this?&quot;"
"They come in ones?!?"
"Charlie Sheen's Pet"
"....and we have a winner"
"Wow..."
"Which came first?"
"Don't act like you don't look forward to this every year."
"REPST: R/funny I SITS"
"Just some bath towels for a Forever Aloner"
"Breakfast in bed"
"Pretty useful device. Especially when you're reading a book. (x/post from /r/funny)"
"What I've learned about college."
"Just finished buying my textbooks and software.."
"The Mountain Lion"
"Cat on a tree."
"I see your Marilyn Monroe gif and raise you a Marlon Brando gif."
"MFW &quot;Are you big...everywhere?&quot;"
"What the-? I mean  how is this possible?"
"Fuck you gravity"
"The only way the religious should protest a blasphemous film."
"There it is: the &quot;i&quot; in team."
"All these years  I've been lied to!"
"So it is There!"
"I in team"
"Enjoy! This should get tons of photoshop attention!"
"Behind the scenes."
"Just something I came across on FB"
"How I imagine /r/Politics right now"
"Life used to be so much more dynamic in the womb"
"I am sorry  this gif has already been used. But this combination made me laugh..."
"Browsing /r/new and finding gold."
"DOWN BOY!!"
"How I feel after &quot;No fap February&quot; [SFW]"
"Fapping after a two week break (SFW)"
"After you realize you haven't fapped in two weeks."
"reddit is a place for intellect and this..."
"You want this to be you"
"Can't decide if this dog is being lazy or efficient."
"Facebook"
"Cat enjoying a slurpee"
"Your move  iron man"
"It's okay  she's with me."
"A simple  easy example that even kids can understand."
"West Germany? That hasn't been a country in 22 years! Seriously. The things that circulate on Facebook..."
"Gary Johnson crowd surfing"
"Gary Johnson crowd surfing"
"I didn't think /r/bowling would appreciate it"
"/r/funny told me to put this here."
"Panda Playslide"
"Panda Playside"
"Why yes  that IS a vagina riding a bicycle around Helsinki. Why do you ask?"
"When I see that I've reached my first 100 karma"
"*wink*"
"Baby  you be lookin' fine!"
"Remember the terror"
"This prank sucks  but it works..."
"Great! The USA is awake."
"Darn  now I have to be productive..."
"It's all I had to do... Why? Why would this happen?"
"I dont have a few minutes! ITS THE FUCKING PRESIDENT!"
"Wow  I have a great view of the President's AMA!"
"Barack Obama does AMA for 30mins  Reddit Crashes and no one can ask questions!"
"Go to ask the President a question ANNNDDD...damn Reddit"
"Good Going  Obama. You're AMA did this!"
"too many people on reddit.."
"I blame The President..."
"I uhh....I guess I'll uhh..just outside or something.."
"Obama broke the internet"
"best part of the Obama AMA"
"Obama Visits Reddit..."
"Reddit these hours."
"Way to go Obama  you broke Reddit!"
"The reason why Obama isn't getting my vote"
"I can't explain why this makes me laugh so hard"
"I don't know why this is so funny"
"Googled &quot;reddit gold&quot;"
"I fear that the murderer may be amongst us..."
"She should probably moooooove."
"Oh Hi!"
"Baby Squid  very small!"
"Anyone remember being bad ass at these???"
"I keep it real  muthafucka!"
"Dinosaur extinction explained (Jurassic Park completely recontextualized)"
"In other news..."
"Shaving her Hoohah - Followed by a smart ass journalist ."
"happens to me all the time"
"Dog trains himself"
"this dog....yes"
"Gets me every time."
"Just a cute little puppy playing with chick ... wait  wha-"
"Rock the Boat - You can watch this gif like 100 times."
"OMG story of my childhood."
"Just chillin' in class. Warning: Bacon included."
"Yeah...this definitely belongs here [NSFW]"
"Dance you sea creature  DANCE"
"Reverse tentacle rape"
"Dear God  why would you do this"
"Definitely Worth 35 cents"
"My friend's exorcist cat"
"YOLO"
"An average day on reddit"
"After one year on Reddit  this is how I see things now."
"How I feel browsing r/new"
"When you can't be fucked to wait for the noodles to cook"
"The sheer emptiness of oceans freaks me out... (x-post from pics)"
"This is my first post  but what the fuck am I looking at?"
"This gun needs a plane"
"Started riding the bus to work and this is how I feel every day through traffic."
"Just drove through traffic in New York... This can't explain it any better"
"I am a bus"
"When I'm Late to Something Important"
"This is the letter O oooOhhmyyyGod!!!"
"They're so cute when they're young."
"Woke up this morning to see my comment karma was higher than my link karma..."
"Friday"
"Fits perfectly"
"OMG  this is a huge ass  wait a sec..."
"F-Flareon?"
"Slendermans favorite Pokemon."
"Just found out someone took a pic from my fb and made my a meme"
"My face when I stick my head out the window of the car on the highway."
"2 newborn baby otters sleeping."
"I know some of these may be re posts  but nevertheless  they are great detention fails."
"How I Feel in Maths After Missing A Week's Work"
"Oh  the agony!"
"Jesus saves!"
"r/funny didn't enjoy this... (Jesus saves!)"
"You had one job!!!"
"Halloween Mario Cart in a College Town"
"Romney and Obama's Dark Secrets"
"Yo quiero salir de fiesta!"
"How I Dance in Reality"
"most attractive photo on the internet? I have one problem with that title."
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"Trouble falling asleep? Count sheep."
"Well  that's creepy..."
"Come to think of it..."
"calling bullshit"
"As an OCD person...this his how I make my bed every damn time"
"No matter how hard you try."
"I didn't know an environmental problem could be so beautiful"
"This is what I imagine it will be like if Santorum is elected President"
"perfect tribute."
"Ricky has a point"
"This made me laugh a little too much."
"Sometime today  it'll happen to you"
"Conan on Mitt Romney's perpetration for tonight's debate."
"Congrats  Miggy?"
"Mimes and shit."
"True"
"Twitter Hurricane Sandy never disappoints."
"Just found another poor soul who's life is being altered by Reddit.."
"Class' reaction when they find out someone has gum."
"Who Said It? Mitt Romney or Mr. Burns?"
"Men In The Baby Food Department"
"RIP Washy =("
"Oh crap a brick!"
"Photo bomber level: Supreme master!"
"So Gangsta"
"Just me browsing r/science."
"How i feel browsing r/Atheism everyday"
"There's no reason I can't stop watching this. But  here I am."
"Sunset on Mars (photobomb version)"
"Watch the ice!"
"Nokia 3310 now with camera"
"When you really go through it..."
"Chinese what now?"
"Chinese Brocori."
"That's how I say it"
"When I come across a penis when browsing /r/gonewild"
"How I feel when someone tells me about a horrible injury they've experienced."
"Boop"
"When people gang up on me in the comment thread."
"Earth's Location in the Universe. X-Post from r/wtf"
"You Can't Do That!"
"Boston Terrier meets a ball"
"FUCK YEAA"
"We have liftoff"
"How I feel leaving ebaumsworld to come to reddit"
"Jamie Hyneman from Mythbusters doesn't like Watermelon"
"Sad Otter is sad."
"cross post from /r/gifs &quot;Henry Sheen&quot;"
"Sure ill get a job!!"
"When people tell me I should get a 2nd job in this economy"
"When my dad tells me to get a job"
"The greatest ad ever"
"So true."
"The Internet."
"Roll Over"
"attack kitten"
"Well that escalated quickly"
"Awesome Evolution chart by Leonard Eisenberg"
"Teach me how to Duckie. Teach me  teach me how to Duckie."
"Bite your pillow..."
"This is the most disturbing thing I've seen all day"
"As a guy who's hair is getting longer than intended..."
"Can someone please explain this?"
"Right in the childhood"
"My local news station did a story on this daschund... 77 pounds may have exceeded his limit."
"We would ride till the heavens fell"
"Red Panda licking a Grape"
"All 14 people found this review helpful!!"
"As a person with a patchy beard during no shave November."
"My reaction when someone says they don't like hotdogs..."
"A gun being fired under water."
"and the winner is..."
"I will never spam refresh again!"
"I refreshed the page while I was playing Happy Wheels and this is what happened."
"Let us never forget the true heroes..."
"What rain looks like when you're in the sky"
"My reaction after looking at these next stall in the bathroom posts"
"My first Gif sound-Raccoon playing harp."
"I had to create this when I saw the original Gif"
"Why can't I?"
"I want to go higher!"
"Found this little guy in my newsfeed on facebook."
"Lvl. 100 Pikachu (x-post)"
"((X-Post from /r/pokemon)) Christian Pokemon Rules"
"All you Pokemon players out there would find this amusing..."
"DAFUQ"
"So I should send the Wife?"
"Quadruplets: can you tell them apart?"
"cuteness overload"
"Googled why people hate Nickelback  was not disappointed."
"GGG just sharing his power."
"How I feel after I make a comment and then everyone in reply gets downvoted."
"Emma seems to know her shit"
"Private Time"
"The best advice."
"Take me there. Right now."
"Nope. Just Nope."
"Wat."
"little girl moved by art"
"Handpainted Xbox 360 Controller Bra"
"5PM On a Friday"
"Forgetting your ipod was on blast..."
"I can still hear you with one ear  see you with one eye"
"Tibetan Mastiff doesn't give a fuck."
"How most Christians feel after visiting r/atheism"
"The Milky Way  from Mars surface."
"Well that esca- oh..."
"Wind owns Windsurfer"
"SPAAAACE!"
"I don't know what to look at"
"When people tell that what I'm eating is fattening[FIXED]"
"Alison Brie? Check. Kitten? Check. Front page? Oh yeah!"
"iOS 6 Apple Maps showing Toronto Pearson International Airport (x-post from r/Aviation)"
"iOS 6 Apple Maps view of an airport (x-post from r/Aviation)"
"How lovely the moon looks."
"The Grumpiest Moon"
"What I feel like doing when some know-it-all downvotes my advice"
"My first gif in honor of all the know-it-alls who downvote my amazing advice."
"How I feel downvoting a comment below threshold"
"So I'm moving out of Florida in three days."
"I guess it was windy today then."
"Resigning like a boss."
"Bison Skull Pile"
"The Reaction to My Last Post Made Me Feel This Way"
"Air hockey just became my favorite sport"
"I've lurked /b/ for 6+ years  this is how I feel about posts regarding r/spacedicks."
"One of my all-time favorites"
"A bag of these would be awesome right now"
"How MYCRYSIS checks your age"
"Wtf Japan?"
"Set oven to 325 F and bake for 45 min  periodically glazing"
"Oh she'll come back. They always come back."
"dafuq is this little creature?"
"Never knew a mollusk could look so cool"
"Now I feel safe"
"What I think after I post something and then realize its a re-post"
"I know this might be nothing compared to hurricane Sandy but the weather in Iceland is going mental"
"thsspthsppthsppthhsp"
"Never thought I would actually do this..."
"CAKEDAY!"
"Actors in one of their best-known roles"
"Shake it off  bro. Shake it off."
"How I imagine Hitch must feel about all the peaceful and loving theists condemning him to hell right now."
"As a new Redditor  this is my reaction to every upvote"
"What I imagine redditors with cat pictures look like when they make the front page."
"When my crush likes my comments on facebook. (X-post from /r/foreveralone)"
"Free Bread?? Give it to me!!"
"Duck on the rampage"
"Fapolean"
"What happens when you eat food you find under your couch"
"Mesmerizing ... O.O"
"Trippy Cat"
"What is he doing??"
"Swing to fence (pic)"
"Popsicle's"
"Stop tickling me"
"Trying to get a girl into bed"
"We should ban life jackets"
"I'm on board with this. (From FB)"
"abstinence logic is afloat"
"We should ban life jackets!"
"Bold Bear"
"I present to you  the hairless bear."
"Shaved Bears are cute  right?"
"Russia's got talent"
"Tomato Level: Greek God"
"Not exactly what I was looking for..."
"Bear Cub!"
"Fail."
"Reddit  I present to you the cross between an Ewok and a Wookie. I call it... EWOKIE."
"It fits in the palm of your hand!"
"Cuteness Overload."
"It's a repost"
"Superfriends"
"&quot;I am now an airplane.&quot;"
"The longer I look at it  the harder I laugh"
"My grandma in a nutshell... [Fixed]"
"reddit in a nutshell."
"For my cakeday...I present pretty much Reddit in a nutshell"
"it took me more times than i would like to admit  to try to stop reloading this picture."
"Something nedds to be done about this."
"Damn you Snoop Lion"
"This is the exact opposite of how I would feel if I had that many upvotes! I dont understand why they put him under karma distress!"
"NOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!!!!"
"The Dark Hedges in Antrim  Ireland."
"Explain this one  O'Reilly."
"Girlfriend just texted me that her period is over."
"How I feel when I slip and barely manage to catch myself"
"My reaction when they say the name of the movie in the movie."
"Perspective."
"Just taking it all in"
"The safe word is mango"
"Sweetie  your dinner is ready! Coming..."
"When no one texts me back"
"When no one responds"
"Christian Logic"
"How I felt when I picked up my last paycheck from an awful job."
"Perfect positioning."
"Aww what a nice family photo... Wait a minute!!"
"What it feels like sitting in A&amp;E"
"Works every time!"
"It's simple math really. [OC]"
"Magic Eye Image - Reddit Edition (yes  it really works)"
"Reading stories on r/Scary"
"Shark versus Narwhal (not a syfy movie)"
"Knuffeltje Knuffel"
"Do what mama says"
"Hit so hard he reached warp 2"
"Something isn't right here"
"Here comes the men in b--AW SHIT."
"Since MIB 3 is coming out  thought this would be appropriate"
"When someone comments but doesnt upvote"
"Nope!"
"You had ONE job  Michael!"
"Move over toads"
"The reddit addiction is fed"
"How I feel as Muslim when I hear about what is going on in the Middle East..."
"Just another day at the slumber party court..."
"Truth or Dare"
"Truth or Dare?"
"Happy couple"
"We kill the batman!"
"Yes  Quite."
"Significant Otters."
"Saw this on FB and knew it would definitely help improve your Monday. Enjoy."
"Free hugs anyone?"
"Thats two for flinching"
"Tag you're it!"
"&quot;Grrr!! Uh oh.. wait..&quot;"
"Tag  you're it!"
"One Sexy Dadd"
"Ha ha ha (pic)"
"Yay  flowers!!"
"just the happiest hamster ever"
"Lend me a hand"
"This is just crazy.."
"The Hulkster!"
"I laughed harder than I should've at this."
"When I finally drag my ass to the gym"
"What posts in WTF should make you do..."
"When I googled 'weird ass'  I sure wasn't expecting this"
"wtf"
"We can't stop here. This is bot country."
"Fear and Loathing in Tatooine"
"Just two dudes doing the dishes"
"Just a Picture of Paul McCartney and Michael Jackson doing Dishes Together"
"Just a couple of guys doing dishes"
"So that is what's at the end of a rainbow!"
"When I looked up what is Reddit"
"I think I may have found another one of us..."
"When I don't make the frontpage..."
"When I rock out around my room in the morning  getting hype for work."
"Monday off  wife still has work"
"we've all been there at some point..."
"Wait for it"
"Don't feed the birds..."
"Don't feed the birds..."
"Don t feed the pigeons."
"It's so simple!"
"living inside a stadium .. just something for japan"
"How I feel when discovering a fellow Redditor"
"Hy Oh Silveeer!"
"THIS."
"Nom nom nom nom nom nom nom."
"Man from the future!"
"so I tried soy milk for the first time today..."
"Stone bridge in fall"
"Horses prohibited on bridge"
"Magnetic Thinking Putty absorbs a metal cube [gif]"
"Soccer fatality..."
"Day 983 of My Captivity."
"Anyone with a cat and a dog will understand!"
"I'm Just Sayin..."
"Every time I get into the shower with my wife [Fixed]"
"How I image my fiance's adolescence."
"Words of wisdom from MLK Jr."
"Pew Pew Pew [Fixed]"
"MLK day"
"Where do I throw the money at?!?!"
"I need 10cc of butter over here stat!"
"Instructor at Scout Sniper School Sgt. Jason Pacheco  uses his prosthetic leg as an example to his student on how to properly set up a stable stand for the M40A3 sniper rifle."
"Meanwhile in Germany..."
"Best brush a cat can get - a hedgehog"
"Hedgehog's spikes aren't just intended for harm"
"My friend found this on Facebook..."
"Dining in high up in New York"
"When a guy tells you he doesn't watch porn."
"Tulip fields just outside Alkmaar  North-Holland  Netherlands"
"Wrestling gifs is it? I have just the thing."
"Midget wrestling for my cakeday"
"How my first cakeday post went yesterday"
"Can we get a name on all of them?"
"&quot;:P&quot;"
"Only 90s kids will remember this."
"These sunflower seeds are great!"
"Boo [Much Scarier]"
"r/gaming in one picture."
"The basic idea behind Reddit and its users."
"My favorite Ricky Gervais quote"
"Showing up to a job interview in jeans and a plain t-shirt  and getting the job over the guy who wore a suit."
"how i feel when i get an upvote"
"How I felt immediately after turning in my last final for the year"
"I was literally doing this leaving the office this Friday evening."
"Critical hit!"
"What a good critical hit feels like"
"Fed Master Yi"
"Anyone know the source of this training gone wrong?"
"I...uh...what?"
"Well  I guess now I'm scared of aliens..."
"Runin' down a Dream"
"As Your President  i will harness the power of the sun"
"We OWN Vault 101"
"Fallout anybody?"
"Where was Spider-Man during The Avengers?"
"The definition of &quot;not giving a fuck&quot;"
"Not even a single fuck"
"DAE Miss this or want them to bring it back?"
"The fleeting life of a fish"
"Seems legit to me."
"Real Lesbians"
"I'll have four pizza pies!!!"
"Pug Attack"
"Magical Abortion"
"Can I get a pregnant woman to step up to the stage for my next magic trick?"
"I'm trying to eat!"
"Work out those rave muscles!"
"Ooo sexy picture of girl on the bea.....OH WTF?!?"
"Didn't want to find him like this..."
"Not sure If I am doing this right.... But I wanted to share this Nic Cage meme shirt I made."
"I wonder what he hears all the time"
"/r/conservative right now"
"Typical Redditor on a walk..."
"A favorite of mine."
"how i think my cakeday will be"
"How I view an argument in the comments section"
"When I see a religious person's video on youtube and it has a lot of dislikes."
"When I hear that my crush is on the school basketball team"
"It's the freakin' weekend..."
"Welcome to Reddit"
"You guys let me in"
"Remember  when somebody annoys you.."
"Just remember this when someone pisses you off"
"To the rescue!"
"&quot;That's Religion&quot;"
"Creepy abandoned mansion"
"Like it's better to be forever alone..."
"WTF right now"
"After seeing my nephew's school  this has been on my mind 24/7..."
"Faster Than Light"
"airplane vortex"
"Whenever I post something that makes me happy and it gets downvoted..."
"Derp  Derp  Derp"
"Please insert Disc 2."
"My neighbors at 3 a.m."
"Milk Feeding"
"just feeding time.."
"A monkey feeding a baby tiger."
"Just found this on Facebook. D'aww"
"When someone yells &quot;BINGO!&quot; before you..."
"Brilliant"
"When relatives decide to talk about politics..."
"after clicking the comments link"
"Whenever I see this gif..."
"How I act when I go to comment having lost a lot of comment karma in the past"
"Been writing the theory section of my thesis  this has been my face for the past 10 hours..."
"Jim Lehrer Attempting to Moderate the Presidential Debate Last Night"
"Ethan Hunt: younger years"
"Cats might be cute  but their tongues are fucking creepy!"
"Condescending Amstell"
"I walked in on my sister in the shower this morning"
"Wild Kitten With A Bunny - Can I Have My Karma Now?"
"We were worried that our cat wouldn't like our new rabbit"
"Lazy Walt Disney cartoonists"
"Chernobyl..."
"A Cicada Molting"
"Nope. (Cicada metamorphosis)"
"Irish Girl Sunbathing"
"Party Hard"
"How to tell if it's HTML5"
"just WTF"
"what? I don't even..."
"You're a rapist  Harry."
"So  that's what the other side of Mount Rushmore looks like!"
"Oh Hey Mom!"
"I wonder how it must have tasted."
"He's been framed!"
"Putin  out and about"
"You deserve it!"
"Mission Control"
"I have nothing but the utmost fear and respect for Big Cola"
"You have to love Halloween."
"For my cakeday  I present to you the most WTF gif I've ever seen. NSFW"
"When My Professor Assigns &quot;Optional&quot; Reading."
"r/atheism right now"
"Which one seems unnatural now?"
"We need to make this happen!"
"F**k you Westboro Baptist Church"
"This is the most technologically ahead-of-its-time movie ever made."
"How Canadian [x-post from r/Canada]"
"Always happens in sporting events..."
"Owned."
"black people..."
"How I feel browsing the new tab of /r/funny"
"CPR Instructions"
"SOON"
"Meet Libby (gif)"
"nom nom no..."
"How I chew gum when a teacher is watching"
"Whenever I know somebody's watching me eat my own boogers in the car this is what I do..."
"Realizing its my Cakeday."
"Tell me more"
"Your argument is invalid."
"On October 3rd he asked me what day it was"
"Fantasy Football"
"I don't even..."
"A dog that has an idea what he's doing."
"&quot;Mommy  how do rainbows work?&quot;"
"Drive Safe."
"Has science gone too far?"
"whenever you lose an argument on reddit..."
"Give it to me! C'mon! Give!"
"sake cares"
"People in big cities: If you suspect you're eating pigeon  it most likely is."
"Wrong Number"
"Unfortunately  no one can be told what the Matrix is. You have to see it for yourself...[gif]"
"mouse"
"This is how to play Scout."
"how i imagine i'll feel getting drunk the night before my first final"
"poke her face"
"Just a baby hippo. That is all."
"&quot;iPhone 5: because you have more money than sense&quot;"
"Cat Swanson"
"Back to class after lunch."
"Make it rain  Saudi edition"
"How i upvote in /r/aww"
"Nathan Fillion's awesome Canada-based costume [xpost from r/Canada]"
"Nathan Fillion as Captain Canada"
"Oh No U didn't!"
"Made my day better..."
"Holding the power button down"
"How I feel about the upcoming election"
"What the two party political system feels like [fixed]"
"I wish this guy would follow me around to help me on my diet..."
"How pencils are sharpened in factory."
"10 guy and his koala return"
"Well  didn't think MythBusters would give me nightmares. [x-post from r/gifs]"
"This will always be my favorite gif on the internet"
"Woah  a bumpy road ahead!"
"._."
"All in the name of fashion"
"I saw this on yahoo."
"r/gonewild  who wants me to take these clothes off!? ; )"
"I'm 25 years old and starting college the end of August. I was told I have to take a freshmen seminar in order to graduate."
"How I feel going back to college after finishing a six year enlistment"
"smooth"
"The Official Reddit T-Shirt"
"Crumb"
"How they tested body armor in 1923"
"Downloaded Dragon Ball Online (Which is in Taiwanese) the other day."
"When you see someone you are trying to avoid in public  but they see you and start approaching."
"When food falls off my fork right before I take a mouthful."
"Karma-whoring elevator"
"Just 3 dudes having some coffee"
"I saw this hanging in my doctors office  as I went to get a flu shot."
"Cat Cantina"
"A Frightened Monkey (x-post from r/funny)"
"fuck you"
"Herro"
"Still the best gif ever made"
"SUPPLIES!"
"Still Tippin Presidential Style"
"Mah niggers."
"Nice Block Kid!"
"This space fact is irrelephant."
"Make do with what you have..."
"Dirty things"
"When people bitch about reposts"
"When I finally get to take my bra off after a long day."
"What I picture girls do when they take their bras off at home alone (fixed)"
"Want boobies? Why not Zoidberg?"
"Whenever someone makes a repost"
"Just popped up in my newsfeed...[X-post with r/pics]"
"Quality Japanese wrestling."
"probably the most badass shark ever lived on the Earth"
"Scarred."
"Calm down Clint Eastwood"
"Calvin on Religion."
"Gimme the box."
"Getting home from school on a Friday."
"A Photo of the Most Elite Pilots on Earth Looking Incredibly Badass"
"A Photo of the Most Elite Pilots on Earth Looking Incredibly Badass"
"14 pilots in full pressure suits stand in front of a United States Air Force U-2 reconnaissance aircraft at Beale AFB [3547x2093]"
"The War on Drugs: 40 years of an unchanging 1.3% addiction rate  a $1.5 trillion price tag and counting"
"Whenever I try to change pants without taking off my shoes."
"The day after plowing through half a box of high fibre cereal in one sitting."
"my instant reaction after eating a whole habanero pepper"
"When you buy all your books for college before the class starts and realize you won't use them."
"A long exposure of Earth from the I.S.S by Don Pettit of NASA"
"READY FOR YOU TO TUCK ME IN!"
"How to tie a tie: The Lovecraft"
"My Halloween costume"
"Scumbag Amurrica"
"It all makes sense now."
"My friend's dog was happy about his birthday dinner."
"This gives a whole new meaning to the term &quot;butt shark.&quot;"
"David Bowie  Iggy Pop And Lou Reed"
"How I feel when I get an upvote"
"Winner! (NSFW)"
"Sometimes you just have to go for it"
"I wonder what his prom will be like?"
"If I only had a heart..."
"The Cookie Cup [x-post from r/pics] Yay or Nay?"
"New way to enjoy your coffee [640x424]"
"Soon ..."
"I don't even know if this is classified as a yacht anymore.. (x-post /r/IfIWonTheLottery)"
"Holy fuck! Fuck! Jesus No! [nsfa]"
"Every time I try to Cage someone it turns into an abomination  but this might be my worst..."
"swimming is just fabulous"
"The glittery dress was an apt touch... [gif]"
"I resized some of my favorite wallpapers for the iPhone 5 and thought I would share - Enjoy!"
"Little Brother - 1  Big Sisters - 0"
"james. JAMES!!!"
"Made my first Gif Sound. I'm pretty proud."
"RESPECT."
"Again he strikes!"
"Smashing!"
"If tomatoes are fruit..."
"Asians  Balls and Nyan Cats"
"Draw me like one of your french girls..."
"Double Agent P"
"Do it."
"Nicolas Cage on my newsfeed"
"Happy little bear"
"Walking home after a night at the bar."
"&quot;If I had two bullets...&quot;"
"&quot;If I had two bullets...&quot;"
"Getting hit in the face with a 186 mph gust of wind"
"Whenever I am down I just watch this GIF"
"Day 45: I have earned the Germans' trust..."
"Day 45: I have earned the Germans' trust."
"Day 45: I have earned the Germans' trust."
"They still do not realize.."
"Hugs?"
"LLOOLL"
"Who else has this problem all of the time?"
"This one brings back some memories"
"Robin Skrilliams"
"A happy dachshund."
"I want some free high fives (cyanide &amp; happiness)"
"W-What is this I don't even"
"Nature is awesome; Sandy and the Golden Spiral."
"MFW: Someone reposts my post and they have more upvotes on it."
"stop &amp; sho-wtf?"
"Anti Rape"
"NSFK - Not Safe For Kitty"
"Apple Water ©"
"Seemed different when my grandpa told me about it"
"In the Top 5 Desktop Backgrounds NOT to have while opening your laptop on a packed German train..."
"Slow Motion Lightning"
"Slow motion lightning"
"Don't leave your dark beer alone in the fridge..."
"How I Feel About The End Of Winter"
"The Troll Bowl"
"Tea Rex"
"spongbob is such a playa!"
"Wheeeee!"
"this is hard to look at - ambassador chris stevens killed and paraded around in Libya"
"MY BRAIN"
"The best kind of kitten."
"Great internet  thanks for giving me another fetish (very slightly nsfw)"
"Slow-motion light looks almost like a loading screen..."
"F**K YEAH EATING"
"Man and Nature"
"Just got a little something in my eye..."
"Saw this on Facebook  I hope this is the right place."
"Googled Pokemon Wii game- found this. A wee Pokemon indeed"
"I choose you!"
"Rick Ross and the Power of Long John Silvers"
"I'm a senior in college and everyone's getting married and I'm not getting invited to the ceremonies. This is how I feel..."
"More like ATE the batman"
"Not sure if want."
"How do you tell someone about their bad breath?"
"scary posts on Reddit"
"As a brit i feel [fixed]"
"On my feed right now..."
"Driest. Skin. Ever. [NSFL]"
"The many expressions of Kristin Stewart."
"The women in my ex's family were all...."
"The biggest advantage of living in Switzerland"
"My reaction when I created my first successful post. In /r/creepshots"
"hot dog dog!"
"Bun puppy (Classic)"
"Best costume this year. 65&quot; colored TV"
"Best costume this year. 65&quot; colored TV"
"This may be the single greatest photo I've ever found on the internet."
"Hey guys  I found some Atheist Chocolate for us!"
"Dont fuck with me!"
"When you see a post in &quot;New&quot; already with downvotes"
"The irony"
"When my roomate tries to initiate conversation with hot girls"
"Get of your high horse (reposted from r/funny)"
"I know I'm a bit late to the party"
"Well  there's one futuristic utopia (NSFW)"
"The future will be user friendly"
"Futuristic whores ftw"
"Stereotypes are bad"
"Tax Return"
"... my income tax return form has been sent back to me."
"Just a painting of...uh... Some stuff"
"You can ring his bell"
"seems legit"
"When the ex girlfriend tells me she is over me two months later."
"My face upon reaching 1k karma"
"it's okay  I didn't need that jacket anyway"
"This is how the boyfriend and I feel when his nephew runs into our bedroom  trying to wake us up [FIXED]"
"Bar stool for the kilt-wearers"
"Sexist chair"
"Oh man do I miss these guys"
"When ever I see a &quot;Do Not Enter&quot; sign"
"New species of chameleon found on Madagascar is so tiny it fits on a...."
"Planking  Marine style."
"Kitten Smush Island?"
"Think I am gonna call in sick today..."
"Baby Bard"
"Whats that? Oh just John F Kennedy the Alien Hunter"
"Smashing is way more fun anyhow."
"cosby meets hill"
"Fish Flops"
"After I quit scrambling for my cake day and finally give up the karma quest"
"When Christians try to argue with Atheists but don't quite grasp the science behind it..."
"baseball played backwards look so much more entertaining."
"So my friend gave her Rabbit a Cherry.."
"Tickle Time!!"
"I heard you guys like Bill Murray"
"Reddit  it's my birthday  but that's not important right now. Today is Bill Fucking Murray's birthday. If only I could be so classy."
"Trombama"
"I can run pretty fast."
"ORSOS Island yacht (x-post /r/IfIWonTheLottery)"
"My favorite result from Google-searching &quot;Random Kittens&quot;"
"Clash of the titans."
"Missing stapler."
"Where's baby?"
"DRIFT!"
"Cant touch this!"
"Batty Catty"
"Ron Catswon"
"What's going on in my head when my girlfriend says &quot;We have to talk&quot;"
"Best Cat video EVER"
"Ugh god"
"It's my Cakeday..."
"How I feel about these Armstrong jokes"
"Tree Roots"
"Realizing  after about a minute  that what you posted wasn't actually that funny."
"Where the white man screwed up"
"Indian Wisdom"
"Picture of a little girl. That is all."
"Flanders."
"Daft Flanders"
"Kinda sad i can't do this anymore  now thats it's warm"
"SHITFUCKSHITSHITSHITFUCKSHIT"
"SHITSHITSHITFUCKSHIT (x-post r/WTF)"
"Besides items 4 and 6  this also applies to LoL players [x-post from /r/gaming]"
"I just don't understand why atheists dislike these so much."
"How i feel when eating something i dont like."
"Anyone Else See The Resemblance????????"
"this isn't even practical"
"I just found Rob Dyrdek in the 1990's."
"Oh  Hello."
"4chan on fighting (x-post because amazing)"
"4chan on fighting"
"Whenever my cat decides to walk on me when i'm sleeping"
"SAP goes for a walk"
"Best Escalator Ever!"
"Welcome to organic chemistry."
"She's not coming back"
"How I feel about most posters"
"delightful"
"What a twist!"
"Deal with it"
"Hit me"
"your typical delivery driver.."
"On my Facebook feed this morning. What?"
"Best YouTube comment I have seen yet..."
"You snooze  you lose."
"Whenever my post gets more than 10 upvotes"
"When you're randomly browsing Youtube and notice you have a top comment."
"HIFW I get my first upvote"
"Dog's Diner II"
"One does not simply..."
"Still my favorite GIF of all time"
"So  I went camping this weekend..."
"After browsing reddit today  I can't help but think this is what my attic looks like."
"How I feel when I successfully tell someone off."
"Oh hurro dur!"
"Beep Beep! Derivery!"
"Eric Foreman"
"I've had enough of this malarkey!"
"What a sweet trip"
"Born to raise hell"
"Go on! Be free!"
"Redditor forces stranger in Sears to write a note on a fridge  takes a picture  then uploads. Why? Karma that's why!"
"How not to drive a Corvette"
"This is England"
"How I Feel After Finishing My Finals"
"how my white friends look at my family parties"
"There are angels among us"
"My desktop makes me laugh every time."
"Korean man in tuxedo yells at woman's butt"
"DAT ASS"
"Sometimes I feel the same way Mr. Gangnam Style"
"When Lol cats isn't enough"
"`merica"
"It's called Freedom"
"It's called Freedom"
"Every time I submit something to Reddit"
"Their bromance cannot be matched (fixed)"
"Bad art."
"this is my dream smokespot"
"she just has no idea what to do"
"Come at me  bro"
"WHAT DID YOU SAY?!"
"What did you say??"
"How I feel like after my boss tells me what to do"
"Nothing  just sitting here."
"With the rapture (supposedly) approaching  this is how I expect to wake up tomorrow."
"I'm getting pretty excited...."
"New Dark Knight Rises Poster. Best yet!"
"Hey guy  did you know that.. Uhm.."
"Just finished a couple of big papers. This is how I felt the whole time."
"&quot;When it gets to here  we can drink again.&quot;"
"How I feel on Fridays."
"Envisioning emerging technology for 2012 and beyond."
"Shit is about to get crazy in the technology world."
"Bump.."
"How those with ties to Penn State are reacting today"
"I want to see this version of the Titanic."
"Jar of hearts..."
"Follow it and you'll find a pile of vomit!"
"Stripper Level: White girl with father issues."
"Paul gilbert"
"My friend (a competitive air guitarist) asked me to make a gif for him"
"I put this together. Thought you'd like it."
"ABC pays their respect to Michael Clarke Duncan"
"This is a real thing that exists."
"More of this"
"Bible Banging Homophobes at PRIDE Parade"
"Not a Bad Way to Start"
"This is how I feel about people who say &quot;Yolo&quot; and &quot;swag&quot;."
"Waiting Patiently."
"Fuck bitches..."
"Clams."
"What happens when I try to post to /r/funny"
"I'm sorry  I couldn't resist..."
"annular eclipse"
"What really happened"
"For my cake day  my favorite picture on the internet"
"So I found this..."
"How I felt when I saw my girlfriend taking pictures with Instagram"
"Domata Peko (Defensive Tackel for Cincinnati Bengals) does Gangnam Style"
"caticopter"
"Some people are SO wrong!!!"
"Incredible Military Photo: Smoke Grenades Going Off"
"In soviet russia"
"Dear Diary..."
"Whenever I realize I have work to do"
"When I try to study the night before my finals and realize its hopeless..."
"Too hot to handle"
"How I felt after PAC_GUY said he was andrewsmith"
"Just got married. This is my new motto."
"Mmmmmmmm. Gotta love the people of public transport"
"How i feel about votes"
"Getting on the front page for the first time."
"Reddit... nuff said"
"Just...how?!"
"I have never been a fan of any related scary things  so this picture pretty much sums up my entire Halloween month."
"When I heard about Virtual Reality goggles that actually work"
"When falls come to Johannesburg"
"Me  having just finished my finals  while my roommate needs to study"
"Sex can wait"
"Then and Now (pic)"
"From Kitten to Adult."
"An average couple's night out."
"After 1 year on Reddit"
"View from the Burj Khalifa  world's tallest building"
"How I feel when my facebook friends don't take my SOPA posts seriously (x-post from /r/SOPAfunny)"
"how i feel when someone asks why i care if my post gets up-votes"
"&quot;This... is not meth.&quot;"
"The happiest animals in the world [ALBUM]"
"How do I get my hair to look like this? (I know  please ignore who it is.)"
"Joseph Stalin as a young man"
"A closeup of my hopes and dreams. [5184x3156] [OC]"
"Arsene Wenger let's it all hang out at Anfield today!"
"I wanted waffles  man."
"Busted!"
"Tree boarding"
"Loud roared the dreadful thunder  the rain a deluge showers."
"Hurricane Sandy on New Jersey"
"Thought this belonged here instead. (X-post from r/funny)"
"When a baby is staring at you and the parents aren’t looking:"
"When the morning coffee finally hits at work"
"..oh fuck!"
"A turtle eating a mouse [NSFW/NSFL]"
"Worlds cutest Turtle and Mouse!!"
"Which hole is best...."
"What kind of fudge...?"
"Olde tyme haters gonna hate"
"Payback"
"Man down!"
"Lessons in Centrifugal Force [gif]"
"Lessons in Centrifugal Force"
"When Imgur goes down"
"When I click on a post that leads me to a bunch of words"
"When I'm reading instructions for a DIY project"
"instant oatmeal"
"Google's Homescreen Title today..."
"It's my cake day and I'm feeling all flustered."
"You little bastard!"
"ohh shit i think mom is coming"
"Potatoes Gonna Potate"
"Emo Rob and his Ford Fiesta."
"A House is Not a Home"
"My understanding of international politics"
"Just dropped the kids off at summer camp for the whole week..."
"Real N*ggaz"
"I see your best driveways and raise you 1 undisputed greatest driveway ever."
"Don't feed the animals..."
